POLICY  IMPLICATIONS  OF  PHARMACEUTICAL 

IMPORTATION  FOR  U.S.  CONSUMERS 

S.  HRG.  110–1189 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON INTERSTATE COMMERCE, 

TRADE, AND TOURISM 

OF THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

MARCH  7,  2007 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

77–867 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2013 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Vice  Chairman 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Policy  Director 

MARGARET SPRING,  Democratic  General  Counsel 

CHRISTINE D.  KURTH,  Republican  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

KENNETH R.  NAHIGIAN,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

SUBCOMMITTEE  ON  INTERSTATE  COMMERCE,  TRADE,  AND  TOURISM 

BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota, 

Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 

JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina,  Ranking 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on March 7, 2007  ..............................................................................
Statement of Senator DeMint  .................................................................................
Statement of Senator Dorgan  .................................................................................
Statement of Senator Snowe  ...................................................................................
Statement of Senator Vitter  ....................................................................................

WITNESSES 

Barnett, Nelda, Member, Board of Directors, AARP  ............................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Lutter,  Ph.D.,  Randall  W.,  Acting  Deputy  Commissioner  for  Policy,  Food 
and Drug Administration, HHS  ..........................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Schondelmeyer,  Pharm.D.,  Ph.D.,  Stephen  W.,  Professor  of  Pharmaceutical 
Economics and Director, PRIME Institute, College of Pharmacy, University 
of Minnesota  .........................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
.....................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Tauzin,  Hon.  W.J.  Billy,  President  and  CEO,  Pharmaceutical  Research  and 
Manufacturers of America (PhRMA)  ..................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Vernon,  Dr.  John  A.,  Assistant  Professor,  Department  of  Finance,  University 
of Connecticut School of Business  .......................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

Schultz, William B., Partner, Zuckerman Spaeder, LLP 

APPENDIX 

Page 
1 
4 
1 
6 
5 

73 
74 

8 
13 

65 
68 
56 
58 

31 
34 

60 
62 

95 

97 

Canadian Pharmacists Association, the Ontario Pharmacists’ Association, and 
the Best Medicines Coalition, joint prepared statement  ...................................
Pitts,  Peter,  President,  Center  for  Medicine  in  the  Public  Interest,  prepared 
statement  ..............................................................................................................
Response  to  written  question  submitted  by  Hon.  Byron  L.  Dorgan  to  Randall 

W. Lutter, Ph.D.  ................................................................................................... 100 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

POLICY  IMPLICATIONS  OF  PHARMACEUTICAL 

IMPORTATION  FOR  U.S.  CONSUMERS 

WEDNESDAY,  MARCH  7,  2007 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON INTERSTATE COMMERCE, TRADE, AND 
TOURISM, 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

The  Subcommittee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  9:30  a.m.  in  room 
SR–253,  Russell  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  Byron  L.  Dorgan, 
Chairman of the Subcommittee, presiding. 

Washington, DC. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. BYRON L. DORGAN, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM NORTH DAKOTA 

Senator DORGAN. We’ll call the hearing to order. 
This  is  a  hearing  of  the  Subcommittee  of  the  Commerce  Com-
mittee.  The  Subcommittee  on  Interstate  Commerce,  Trade,  and 
Tourism  is  here  today  to  consider  an  issue  of  importation  of  pre-
scription drugs, FDA-approved prescription drugs. 

I’m joined by the Ranking Member on the Subcommittee, Senator 
DeMint.  Senator  DeMint,  welcome.  And  we  will  have  some  others 
join us momentarily. 

There had previously been two votes scheduled for 10 o’clock this 
morning.  They  have  just  been  postponed  until  this  afternoon.  So, 
we will not now be interrupted by votes. 

Let me ask that the door be closed, please. 
We’re here today to consider a matter that literally can mean the 
difference  between  life  and  death  for  many  Americans,  and  that  is 
the  cost  of  prescription  medicines.  Clearly,  there  are  some  miracle 
drugs  that  are  available  in  this  country,  thanks  to  substantial  re-
search by the National Institutes of Health, by the pharmaceutical 
industry  and  others.  But  miracle  drugs  offer  no  miracles  to  those 
who  can’t  afford  them.  And  the  question  we’re  going  to  ask  today 
is  whether  we  believe  that  American  consumers  ought  to  pay  the 
highest  prices  in  the  world  for  prescription  medicines.  My  answer 
to  that  is,  of  course,  no.  I  don’t  believe  they  should  be  paying  the 
highest prices in the world. I think the American taxpayers already 
heavily  subsidize  research,  through  the  tax  code,  and  we  pay  for 
basic  research  at  the  NIH  that’s  led  to  many  breakthroughs  for 
wonder drugs currently marketed by prescription drug manufactur-
ers. 

Today,  we’re  considering  whether  we  should  continue  to  allow 
the  prescription  drug  companies,  or  the  pharmaceutical  industries, 
to  dictate  the  prices  that  U.S.  consumers  pay  for  prescription 

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

2 

drugs,  or  whether  we  ought  to  allow  a  little  price  competition  into 
the marketplace for prescription drugs. 

Today,  we  will  talk  about  prescription  drugs,  and  we  will  only 

refer to, and mean, FDA-approved prescription drugs. 

Should we allow the safe importation of FDA-approved medicines 
from  Canada  and  other  Western  industrialized  nations?  This  rou-
tinely  has  happened  for  a  couple  of  decades  in  Europe,  through 
parallel trading. If you’re in France and want to buy a prescription 
drug  from  Italy;  or  in  Spain  and  want  to  buy  one  from  Germany, 
the  parallel  trading  system  has  worked  well  for  European  con-
sumers, with no safety issues at all. 

Given  the  substantial  price  differences  between  products  sold  in 
the U.S. and abroad, it will come as no surprise that the American 
people  feel  strongly  about  this  and  already  do  import  some  pre-
scription  drugs.  Let  me  use  a  chart  to  show  the  difference  in  pric-
ing. And I’ll show two bottles of Lipitor. Lipitor is a fairly common 
prescription  drug  in  this  country  for  lowering  cholesterol  levels. 
These two bottles contain exactly the same pill, produced in exactly 
the  same  FDA-approved  plant  in  Ireland.  The  only  difference  is, 
one is shipped to Canada, one is shipped to the United States, one 
is $1.83 per tablet, the other is $3.57 per tablet. Same bottle, same 
pill,  produced  in  the  same  place,  different  prices.  The  American 
taxpayer  is  charged  just  about  double,  and  I  think  that’s  unfair. 
The  same  is  true  with  a  good  many  other  drugs—Prevacid,  Zocor, 
Nexium, Zoloft, and so on. 

[The information referred to follows:] 

Senator  DORGAN.  The  question  before  the  Congress  has  been 
now, for some long while: Can we allow for the safe import of pre-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

.

s
p
e
1
r
o
d

3 

scription  drugs  from  FDA-approved  plants  in  other  countries?  My 
answer to that is yes. I believe that we have produced a bipartisan 
piece  of  legislation—cosponsored  by  many  Members  of  Congress. 
The  Pharmaceutical  Market  Access  and  Drug  Safety  Act  of  2007— 
Senator  Snowe,  Senator  Grassley,  Senator  Kennedy,  Senator 
McCain,  Senator  Stabenow,  and  many,  many  others  have  cospon-
sored this legislation. We believe it puts in place an effective regu-
latory  framework  to  make  the  importation  of  FDA-approved  drugs 
safe for consumers, and gives consumers the opportunity to use the 
market system for FDA-approved drugs, to avoid having to pay the 
highest prices in the world. 

We  have  witnesses  today  with  a  wide  variety  of  views  on  this 
subject.  It  will  be  interesting  to  hear  them.  Some  are  among  the 
most  vigorous  defenders  of  the  pricing  strategy  by  the  prescription 
drug  companies,  others  say  we  ought  to  put  market-price  competi-
tion to work for consumers. 

Let  me  be  clear  that  my  goal  is  not  to  force  Americans  to  go  to 
Canada to purchase prescription drugs, but, rather, to create a lit-
tle  competition  in  the  marketplace  so  that  we  can  put  real  down-
ward pressure on domestic drug prices. I believe that what is hap-
pening currently is wrong. I think it’s unfair. Some say that, ‘‘Well, 
it doesn’t matter. We now have prescription drug coverage for sen-
ior citizens.’’ 

There  are  tens  of  millions  of  citizens—in  fact,  43  percent  of  the 
uninsured American adults, aged 19 to 64—I have a chart to show 
on  that—18  percent  of  insured  adults  did  not  fill  prescriptions  be-
cause  of  cost.  The  result  is  that  paying  the  highest  price  in  the 
world  is  diminishing  opportunities  for  healthcare  for  a  good  many 
Americans,  and  we  believe  the  marketplace  ought  to  be  used  to 
provide a fair break for American consumers. When I say ‘‘we,’’ I’m 
speaking  the  royal  ‘‘We,’’  of  course.  I’m  sure  there  are—well,  I 
know  there  are  some  in  Congress  that  would  disagree  with  that. 

[The information referred to follows:] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

4 

Senator  DORGAN,  Let  me  call  on  the  Ranking  Member,  Senator 

DeMint. 

STATEMENT OF HON. JIM DEMINT, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM SOUTH CAROLINA 

Senator  DEMINT.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  Appreciate  you 
holding these hearings. And I do take Lipitor, and if there are any 
in there you’d let me have, I’d really appreciate that. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator DEMINT. Could save me $300. 
But  I  appreciate  everyone  being  here,  particularly  the  ones  who 
are  going  to  be  on  the  panel.  And  what  I  hope  we  can  have  today, 
maybe, is a little intellectual honesty. There are so many of us who 
are  supportive  of  free  trade  and  the  value  of  that  and  how  that 
keeps prices down, how that keeps competition in this country and 
outside  of  this  country.  It  needs  to  apply  to  prescription  drugs.  It 
doesn’t  make  sense  for  the  Food  and  Drug  Administration  to  say 
it’s OK to import all kinds of food products from all over the world 
that are much more difficult to put in tamper-proof containers than 
pharmaceuticals, and then say that it’s not safe to import pharma-
ceuticals,  particularly  reimport  the  drugs  that  have  been  made 
here  in  blister  packs  that  are  tamperproof.  It  doesn’t  make  sense 
to take that tack. It doesn’t make sense to say it’s dangerous to im-
port  drugs  that  were  made  in  America,  when  a  lot  of  the  ingredi-
ents  for  all  the  drugs  in  this  country  are  imported  in  bulk,  which 
are  much  easier  to  contaminate  than  finished  drugs  that  are  in 
tamperproof  containers.  It’s  very  obvious  to  me  that  safety  is  not 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

.

s
p
e
2
r
o
d

5 

an issue. It’s just a distraction. And I want to hear that explained, 
particularly from Dr. Lutter today. 

We know the issue is with other countries and trade agreements. 
We’re  afraid,  the  pharmaceutical  companies  are,  that  if  they  don’t 
honor the fixed prices in Canada and other parts of the world, that 
these  countries  will  simply  take  their  patents  and  produce  their 
drugs. This is a trade issue which the Administration needs to ad-
dress.  I  hear  folks  say  that,  by  us  reimporting  from  Canada,  that 
we’re importing socialism. In fact, what we’re doing now is, we are 
propping  up  socialism  in  Canada  and  other  parts  of  the  world.  We 
charge  American  consumers  a  higher  price,  and  then  allow  other 
countries to dictate a lower price for their citizens, allowing Ameri-
cans to subsidize and pay for our own drug products in other parts 
of the world. It’s difficult for me to find any intellectual honesty in 
the  arguments  against  allowing  Americans  to  buy  drugs  from  any 
part  of  the  world  that  are  FDA-approved  from  FDA-approved  or 
certified facilities. 

So,  I’m  very  interested  in  the  discussion  today.  And,  again,  all  I 

ask for is some intellectual honesty and consistency. 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Senator DORGAN. Senator Vitter? 

STATEMENT OF HON. DAVID VITTER, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM LOUISIANA 

Senator  VITTER.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  And  thank  you  for 

convening this important hearing. 

I guess I round out the spectrum of opinion on the panel by say-
ing amen to everything that was said before me, because I also am 
a—an ardent supporter of reimportation, which I know can be done 
safely,  completely  protecting  American  consumers.  And  I  say  that 
about  those  of  us  up  here,  because  I  think  it  makes  an  important 
point. We obviously represent different points on the political spec-
trum. Maybe we define the political spectrum, I don’t know. But we 
all agree on this issue, and I think we all share the clear majority 
consensus opinion of the American people. 

I’ve  been  working  on  this  issue  since  I  was  in  the  House.  It’s 
been  a  top  priority  of  mine,  including  as  I  came  to  the  Senate.  I 
want to thank and salute the Chairman for his leadership on this. 
He  and  Senator  Snowe  have  one  of  the  leading  bills,  and  I  appre-
ciate all of their leadership on it. 

I have a separate bill that’s very similar in many ways, and cer-
tainly  has  exactly  the  same  goal,  which  is  supported  by  Senator 
DeMint and others. And I completely agree with the previous com-
ments,  that  this  is  a  matter  of  political  will—not  technology,  not 
what  is  possible,  but  what  is  the—when  will  we  have  the  political 
will  to  get  this  done  for  the  good  of  the  American  people?  Besides 
my  broadbased  reimportation  bill  and  my  work  with  Senator  Dor-
gan and others on their measures, I’ve also been involved in a cou-
ple  of  amendments  that  have  passed.  In  particular,  I  teamed  up 
with  Senator  Stabenow  to  pass  language  prohibiting  trade  agree-
ment  barriers  to  reimportation.  Up  until  that  point,  there  was  a 
very,  very  onerous  practice  which  was  becoming  established  of  the 
Administration  using  bilateral  trade  agreements  to  insert  anti-re-
importation  language  through  those  trade  agreements.  And  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

6 

threat was being posed that even if we were to be able to pass sig-
nificant  reimportation  legislation,  if  you  had  all  these  trade  agree-
ments  out  there,  with  many,  many  countries,  reimportation  would 
still be blocked through that route. I’m happy to say we put an end 
to  that  practice—first,  with  this  amendment  on  an  appropriations 
bill,  and  that  led  to  the  current  USTR  abandoning,  and  stating 
very clearly to me and others that she would abandon this practice 
of trying to negotiate those provisions in trade deals. 

Also,  more  recently,  we  were  able  to  pass  a  significant  amend-
ment,  again,  on  an  appropriations  bill,  to  prevent  the  enforcement 
of  the  law  against  United  States  consumers  who  are  coming  home 
from  Canada  with  amounts  of  prescription  drugs  from  Canadian 
pharmacies  that  were  simply  for  personal  use.  That  passed  the 
Congress  overwhelmingly.  It  has  now  gone  into  law.  And  I  would 
also  note  that,  after  dire  predictions  about  what  that  would  cause, 
the  safety  concerns  and  everything  else  that  would  cause,  I  don’t 
know  of  any  documented  cases  of  problems  that  that  has,  in  fact, 
caused. 

But we do need to go further. We do need a full-blown reimporta-
tion  bill  to  establish  all  of  the  safety  procedures  that  we  need  to 
ensure  the  American  people  safe  drugs  in  a  true  free-market  envi-
ronment. 

And I would certainly echo Senator DeMint’s comments. I believe 
in free trade. I believe in global commerce. I don’t understand why 
all  of  that  stops,  and  all  of  those  rules  go  out  the  window  com-
pletely when we get to prescription drugs. It doesn’t occur when we 
talk about food and other products that clearly have safety implica-
tions.  We  do  things  to  guard  against  safety  violations  in  those 
areas.  It  doesn’t  when  we  talk  about  products  which  may  be  sub-
sidized  in  other  countries.  We  certainly  try  to  fight  that  subsidiza-
tion. But, you know, free trade doesn’t come to a grinding halt with 
regard  to  those  other  products  because  of  those  concerns.  So,  I 
would  echo  Senator  DeMint’s  call  for  intellectual  honesty  and  con-
sistency on this topic. 

Thank you. 
Senator DORGAN. Senator Snowe is the principal cosponsor of the 
Pharmaceutical  Market  Access  and  Drug  Safety  Act  of  2007.  We 
have 31 cosponsors in the United States Senate, spanning the ideo-
logical  spectrum.  My  expectation  is  that  the  Congress  will  have  to 
address, and the Senate will address, this legislation, at long, long 
last, this year. Senator Snowe, thank you. 

STATEMENT OF HON. OLYMPIA J. SNOWE, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM MAINE 

Senator SNOWE. Yes, thank you, Mr. Chairman. And I thank you 
very  much  for  holding  this  hearing,  once  again,  on  a  critical  issue 
facing  so  many  American  consumers.  And  I  want  to  applaud  you 
for the leadership that you provided in shaping the legislation that 
we are considering here in the Senate, and hopefully in the overall 
Congress, and before this Committee. 

It’s unfortunate that we’re at a point that we have not been able 
to  enact  this  legislation.  This  is  about  the  tenth  Senate  hearing 
that’s  been  held  on  the  subject  since  2004.  It’s  been  repeatedly 
studied. One-third of the Senate, as the Chairman indicated, is co-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

7 

sponsoring  this  legislation.  In  fact,  2  years  ago,  the  Commerce 
Committee  adopted  an  amendment  to  the  FCC  reauthorization 
based  on  our  legislation.  But,  despite  that,  we’ve  obviously  faced 
considerable resistance and barriers to enacting this legislation. 

And  what  is  tragic  in  all  of  this  is  that  70  percent  of  the  Amer-
ican  people  support  drug  importation.  And  for  a  very  good  reason, 
because of the skyrocketing increases in the cost of medications, ex-
ceeding two and even three times the rate of inflation. And I think 
that  the  penalties  that  ultimately  are  imposed  by  cutting  off  sup-
plies to pharmacies in Canada, for example, is another way of plac-
ing  tremendous  burdens  on  the  American  consumer,  and  forcing 
them  to  ultimately  look  to  sources  that  might  end  up  being  coun-
terfeit  drugs.  And  so,  we  set  up  a  system  in  this  legislation  that 
I  think  undeniably  provides  for  the  security  of  the  medications 
coming across the border from Canada or from the European Union 
and  other  countries,  that  have  demonstrated,  over  decades,  that 
parallel  trading  can  work,  and  can  work  safely.  And  that’s  what 
our  legislation  is  designed  to  do.  With  FDA-approved,  registered, 
and  inspected,  facilities—and,  the  fact  is,  many  more  inspections 
than  is  required  now  currently  under  law  for  those  FDA-approved 
facilities,  and  then,  second,  setting  up  a  pedigree,  being  able  to 
track  the  medication.  We  also  provide  for  the  financing  for  the  ad-
ministration of this program, as well. 

So,  I  think  that  we  have  identified  every  conceivable  and  legiti-
mate  concerns  about  how  we’re  going  to  import  these  medications, 
and we will do so on a safe basis. We’ve addressed all of those ini-
tiatives  in  this  legislation.  Furthermore,  it  provides  savings  to  the 
consumer, according to Congressional Budget Office. 

In  addition  to  all  of  that,  I  think  the  American  consumer  de-
serves  to  have  a  break  when  it  comes  to  prescription  drug  prices 
in this country. We pay the highest prices of any consumers in the 
world. And I think that is inappropriate, given the investments the 
America  taxpayer  makes  in  research  and  development,  without 
question.  And  the  industry  has  not  had  to  operate  under  the  com-
petition  which  would  ultimately  benefit  the  American  consumer. 
And so the American consumer has paid a price in more ways than 
one. 

And  so,  in  drafting  this  legislation,  we  designed  a  safe  system, 
above  and  beyond  everything  else.  It  is  possible  to  implement.  It 
is  doable,  it  is  reasonable.  And  I  think  that,  frankly,  the  time  has 
come—hopefully  it’s  going  to  be  this  year.  We  can  assure  safety. 
That’s what it’s all about. It’s not simply certifying safety, our leg-
islation  assures  safety  through  a  systematic  process  that  requires 
every  facet  to  be  determined  and  certified  and  monitored  by  the 
FDA.  And  with  the  requirements  that  are  necessary  in  dispensing 
prescriptions  and  certifying  people’s  histories  and  verifying  their 
prescriptions, and also tracking drug shipments, and the entire his-
tory and chain of custody. 

So, with that, Mr. Chairman, I appreciate your leadership on this 
matter.  Hopefully,  we  can  get  above  and  beyond  and  address  the 
questions here today, and hopefully we can pass this legislation. 

Senator DORGAN. Senator Snowe, thank you very much. 
I  don’t  think  there’s  much  question  but  that  there  is  a  majority 
on the Commerce Committee now in support of reimportation legis-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

8 

lation.  It’s  my  intention  to  work  very  hard  to  move  it  out  of  the 
Commerce Committee and get a vote on it, on the floor of the Sen-
ate.  Identical  legislation  has  been  introduced  in  the  U.S.  House, 
and  my  hope  is  that,  at  long,  long  last,  perhaps  the  America  con-
sumers will be treated fairly. 

We are, first, joined by Dr. Randall Lutter, who’s the Acting Dep-
uty Commissioner for Policy at the Food and Drug Administration. 
Dr. Lutter, we appreciate your being here, and you may summa-
rize  your  testimony.  We  have  added  a  copy  of  your  full  testimony, 
which I read last evening. And we appreciate your being here. 

STATEMENT OF RANDALL W. LUTTER, PH.D., 

ACTING DEPUTY COMMISSIONER FOR POLICY, 

FOOD AND DRUG ADMINISTRATION, HHS 

Dr. LUTTER. Thank you very much, Mr. Chairman and members 
of  the  Committee—Subcommittee.  I’m  Randall  Lutter,  Acting  Dep-
uty  Commissioner  for  Policy  at  the  U.S.  Food  and  Drug  Adminis-
tration,  and  I  very  much  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  discuss  the 
important issues relating to importation of prescription drugs. 

At  FDA,  our  statutory  responsibility  is  to  assure  the  American 
public  that  the  drug  supply  is  safe,  secure,  and  reliable.  FDA  re-
mains  deeply  concerned  about  unapproved  imported  pharma-
ceuticals whose safety and effectiveness cannot be assured because 
they originate outside the closed system we’re fortunate to have in 
the United States. 

In  1987,  due  to  widespread  distribution  of  imported  counterfeit 
drugs, including antibiotics and birth control pills, Congress passed 
a  law  that  strengthened  the  oversight  of  domestic  wholesalers  and 
only  allows  a  drug  manufacturer  to  import  a  drug  originally  made 
in  the  U.S.  and  then  sent  abroad.  The  conclusion  of  Congress  re-
flected,  in  current  law,  is  that  the  safety  and  effectiveness  of  im-
ported  drugs  is  best  assured  by  carefully  limiting  how  prescription 
drugs  can  be  imported  into  the  U.S.  as  part  of  a  closed  drug  dis-
tribution system. 

The Department of Health and Human Services convened a task 
force  in  2004  to  examine  issues  related  to  drug  importation  as  it 
was  directed  to  study  by  Congress  as  part  of  the  Medicare  Mod-
ernization  Act.  We  have  copies  of  the  report  available  to  anyone 
here.  The  report  drafted  by  this  task  force  clearly  outlined  signifi-
cant safety and economic issues that must be addressed before the 
widespread  importation  of  unapproved  prescription  drugs  can  be 
permitted.  The  report  is  still,  we  believe,  the  most  comprehensive 
examination  of  the  issue,  and  we  continue  to  find  evidence  sup-
porting some of its findings. 

Key  findings  identified  in  the  task  force  report  include  the  fol-
lowing. There are significant risks associated with the way individ-
uals are currently importing drugs that violate the Food, Drug, and 
Cosmetics  Act.  It  would  be  extraordinarily  difficult  and  costly  for 
personal importation to be implemented in a way that ensures the 
safety and effectiveness of imported drugs. Overall savings from le-
galized commercial importation will likely be a small percentage of 
total  drug  spending,  and  developing  and  implementing  such  a  pro-
gram  would  incur  significant  costs  and  require  significant  addi-
tional authority. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

9 

The  public  expectation  that  most  imported  drugs  are  less  expen-
sive  than  American  drugs  is  not  generally  true,  especially  in  the 
case  of  generic  drugs  marketed  in  the  U.S.  And  legalized  importa-
tion may raise liability concerns for consumers, manufacturers, dis-
tributors, pharmacies, and other entities. 

The  Internet  today  has  created  an  extraordinary  unregulated 
marketplace  for  the  sale  of  unapproved  drugs,  prescription  drugs 
dispensed without a valid prescription, and products marketed with 
fraudulent health claims. Patients who buy prescription drugs from 
a  rogue  website  are  at  risk  of  suffering  adverse  events,  and  some 
of  them  can  be  life-threatening.  These  risks  include,  most  impor-
tantly,  therapeutic  failure  due  to  lack  of  effect  because  the  drug 
doesn’t contain the correct dose prescribed by a physician or active 
ingredients,  and  potential  side  effects  from  inappropriately  dis-
pensed  medications,  dangerous  drug  interactions,  or  drug  contami-
nation. 

Patients  are  also  at  risk  because  they  often  don’t  know  what 
they’re  getting  when  they  purchase  some  of  these  drugs  from 
websites. Although some patients may receive the genuine product, 
others  may  unknowingly  receive  counterfeit  copies  that  contain 
inert or harmful ingredients, drugs that are expired and have been 
diverted  to  illegitimate  resalers,  or  dangerous  subpotent  or  super-
potent products that are improperly manufactured. 

I’d like to show you a couple of slides to illustrate just a few ex-
amples  highlighting  our  concerns  with  imported  drugs,  and  my 
written  statement  further  describes  these  concerns  and  illustrates 
some cases. 

The first slide—I don’t know if you can see it from there, but the 
first slide identifies a phenomenon that we first reported in Decem-
ber of 2005 in a press release called ‘‘Bait and Switch.’’ Consumers 
had  placed  orders  on  Internet  websites  that  appeared  to  be  Cana-
dian,  and  we  intercepted,  at  international  mail  facilities,  parcels 
which  were  coming  into  the  country  from  other  countries—in  par-
ticular,  India,  Israel,  Costa  Rica,  and  Vanuatu.  And  about—nearly 
half  of  the  parcels  coming  in  from  those  countries  had  documenta-
tion indicating that they had been shipped in response to orders on 
apparently Canadian websites, and almost 85 percent of those par-
cels,  in  fact,  originated  from  27  countries  all  over  the  globe.  Con-
sumers were not getting what they thought they were buying. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

10 

The  second  slide  shows  a  scheme  where  consumers  are  sent 
drugs  containing  the  wrong  active  ingredient,  which  is  potentially 
a  very  harmful  practice.  This  was  reported  only  recently,  in,  actu-
ally, February, last month, of 2007. Consumers ordered drug A, for 
example,  for  insomnia,  they  received  a  confirmation  from  a  second 
website,  the  credit  card’s  statement  lists  purchase  from  a  third 
website, and then they received Haloperidol tablets, which are used 
for  the  treatment  of  schizophrenia.  Some  people  sought  emergency 
medical  care  because  they  received  the  wrong  active  ingredient  in 
these instances. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e
.
2
C
P
P

I

I

s
p
e

.

I

1
C
P
P

I

11 

FDA  understands  that  Congress  and  the  public  are  concerned 
about the high price of some prescription drugs. FDA currently has 
a very successful generic drug approval program that brings lower- 
cost  versions  of  brand  name  drugs  to  U.S.  consumers.  In  general, 
FDA-approved generic drugs are less expensive, not only compared 
with the brand name innovator product that are sold in the United 
States,  but  also  generally  less  expensive  than  generic  drugs  avail-
able abroad that would appear to be comparable. 

And  you  may  be  surprised  to  learn—and  this  is  slide  3—that  a 
survey conducted—also in January of 2007—revealed that approxi-
mately half of the drugs intercepted at one international mail facil-
ity  are  available  as  FDA-approved  generics  in  the  United  States. 
And,  even  more  surprising,  of  those  generic  equivalents,  over  40 
percent  are  available  at  some  national  retail  pharmacy  chains  for 
about $5 each. That’s less than the shipping price for most Internet 
sellers. 

Next slide. In this survey, we also saw examples of products that 
U.S.  consumers  ordered  from  foreign  sources  that  cause  us  grave 
concern. Warfarin is a blood-thinner that requires routine and very 
careful  blood  monitoring  by  physicians.  Another  drug  that  was 
intercepted is Amoxicillin. These could—if misused, may contribute 
to  antibiotic  resistance.  Antibiotics  should  only  be  used  if  a  bac-
terial  infection,  as  opposed  to  a  viral  infection,  occurs.  Another 
drug  that  we  intercepted  is  Dipyrone,  an  analgesic  which  was  re-
moved from the U.S. market in 1977, due to serious adverse health 
concerns.  Methotrexate,  a  cancer  drug,  requires  careful  monitoring 
for  potential  serious  toxicities.  These  are  examples  of  some  of  the 
drugs  that  we’ve  found  in  this  survey  that  cause  us  to  think  very 
carefully about safety concerns of Internet purchasing. 

s
p
e

.

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

I

3
C
P
P

I

12 

Consumers  may  be  obtaining  these  types  of  products  without 
valid  prescriptions,  and  without  the  appropriate  supervision  of  a 
physician. 

Slide  5,  the  final  one,  deals  with  a  drug  of  special  importance 
these  days.  We’ve  uncovered  counterfeit  Tamiflu.  This  concerns  us 
greatly,  given  the  implications  not  only  for  seasonal  flu,  which  is 
associated  with  deaths  of  more  than  20,000  Americans  annually, 
but also the Tamiflu may be useful in the event of a pandemic flu. 

As  a  public-health  agency,  we  understand  very  much  the  impor-
tance  of  protecting  public  health,  not  only  through  regulation  and 
enforcement,  but  also  through  education  and  collaboration.  FDA’s 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e
.
5
C
P
P

I

I

s
p
e

.

I

4
C
P
P

I

13 

website  contains  extensive  information  for  consumers  about  drug 
importation,  buying  drugs  online,  counterfeit  drugs,  our  enforce-
ment  activities,  and  potential  public-health  threats.  Our  website 
also  provides  resources  to  report  problems  with  FDA-regulated 
products or websites that could be selling fake or harmful products. 
The  standards  for  drug  review  and  approval  in  the  U.S.  are  un-
surpassed  in  the  world,  and  the  safety  of  our  drug  supply  mirrors 
those high standards. However, despite these very real risks, a sub-
stantial  number  of  Americans  are  obtaining  prescription  medica-
tions  from  foreign  sources.  Many  drugs  purported  to  be  from  Can-
ada  are  actually  from  other  countries  that  lack  regulatory  over-
sight.  And  FDA  cannot  assure  the  safety  or  effectiveness  of  these 
drugs. 

Thank  you  very  much  for  the  opportunity  to  testify,  and  I  look 

forward to responding to questions that you may have. 

[The prepared statement of Dr. Lutter follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF RANDALL W. LUTTER, PH.D., ACTING DEPUTY 

COMMISSIONER FOR POLICY, FOOD AND DRUG ADMINISTRATION, HHS 

Introduction 

Mr. Chairman and Members of the Subcommittee, I am Randall W. Lutter, Ph.D., 
Acting  Deputy  Commissioner  for  Policy  at  the  U.S.  Food  and  Drug  Administration 
(FDA or the Agency). Thank you for the opportunity to discuss with you the impor-
tant issues relating to the importation of prescription drugs. 

At  FDA,  our  statutory  responsibility  is  to  assure  the  American  public  that  the 
drug supply is safe, secure, and reliable. For more than 60 years, the Federal Food, 
Drug,  and  Cosmetic  (FD&C)  Act  has  helped  to  ensure  that  Americans  can  be  con-
fident that when they use an FDA-approved drug, the medicine will be safe and ef-
fective  and  will  work  as  intended  in  treating  their  illness  and  in  preventing  com-
plications.  In  carrying  out  this  responsibility,  we  work,  through  a  variety  of  steps, 
to  do  all  we  can  under  the  law  to  make  medicines  accessible  to  patients  and  help 
doctors  and  patients  use  them  as  effectively  as  possible.  These  include:  expanding 
access to essential unapproved treatments that are being studied under FDA inves-
tigational  new  drug  applications;  approving  generic  medicines;  reducing  the  time 
and  cost  of  showing  that  new  medicines  are  safe  and  effective;  and  providing  up- 
to-date information for health professionals and patients to allow them to obtain the 
benefits and avoid the risks associated with medicines. That is the primary mission 
of  the  thousands  of  dedicated  staff,  including  leading  health  care  experts,  doctors, 
and scientists who work tirelessly at FDA in public service for the American people. 
FDA  remains  immensely  concerned  about  unapproved,  imported  pharmaceuticals 
whose safety and effectiveness cannot be assured because they originate outside the 
closed legal structure and regulatory system we are fortunate to have in the United 
States. 

The  FD&C  Act  requires  that  FDA  approve  each  new  drug  as  safe  and  effective 
before marketing. It also authorizes FDA to oversee the production of drugs that are 
the subject of approved applications, whether manufactured in a facility in the U.S. 
or a foreign country and imported into the U.S. by the manufacturer. By the 1980s, 
Congress  recognized  that  some  foreign  entities  were  importing  counterfeit  drugs  as 
well  as  improperly  handled  and  stored  drugs  into  the  U.S.  For  example,  at  that 
time,  millions  of  counterfeit  birth  control  pills  from  Panama  found  their  way  into 
the U.S. drug distribution system. In another case, a counterfeit version of a widely 
used  antibiotic  entered  the  U.S.  drug  distribution  system  from  a  foreign  source. 
These  types  of  activities  posed  significant  risks  to  American  consumers.  In  1987, 
Congress passed the Prescription Drug Marketing Act (PDMA), which strengthened 
oversight  of  domestic  wholesalers  and  added  the  provision  to  the  FD&C  Act— 
801(d)(1)—that  generally  prohibits  anyone  except  a  drug’s  manufacturer  from  re-
importing  into  the  U.S.  a  drug  originally  manufactured  in  the  U.S.  and  then  sent 
abroad. 

The  conclusion  of  Congress,  reflected  in  current  law,  is  that  the  safety  and  effec-
tiveness  of  imported  drugs  is  best  assured  by  carefully  limiting  how  prescription 
drugs  can  be  imported  into  the  U.S.  as  part  of  a  closed  drug  distribution  system. 
In  the  case  of  legally  imported  drugs,  the  chain  of  custody  is  known  for  an  FDA- 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

14 

approved  drug  manufactured  in  an  FDA-inspected  facility  using  FDA-approved 
methods before it is introduced into the U.S. distribution system. 

In 2003, Congress tasked the Department of Health and Human Services to exam-
ine  issues  related  to  drug  importation.  A  task  force,  chaired  by  then  U.S.  Surgeon 
General Carmona, examined the relevant data, considered testimony from the public 
and  health  experts,  and  then  issued  the  ‘‘Report  on  Prescription  Drug  Importation’’ 
(Task  Force  Report).  This  Task  Force  Report  clearly  outlines  significant  safety  and 
economic issues that must be addressed before the widespread importation of unap-
proved prescription drugs can be permitted. Even though 2 years have passed since 
the  Task  Force  Report  was  issued,  it  is  still  the  most  comprehensive  examination 
of the issue and we continue to find evidence confirming its findings. 

importing drugs that violate the FD&C Act. 

Some of the key findings identified in the Task Force Report include the following: 
• There  are  significant  risks  associated  with  the  way  individuals  are  currently 
• The integrity of the distribution system must be ensured. 
• It  would  be  extraordinarily  difficult  and  costly  for  ‘‘personal’’  importation  to  be 
implemented in a way that ensures the safety and effectiveness of the imported 
drugs.  Regulating  personal  importation  could  be  extraordinarily  costly,  on  the 
order  of  $3  billion  a  year  based  on  2003  estimates  of  the  volume  of  packages 
entering the U.S. 
• Overall  national  savings  from  legalized  commercial  importation  will  likely  be  a 
small percentage of total drug spending, and developing and implementing such 
a  program  would  incur  significant  costs  and  require  significant  additional  au-
thority. 
• The public expectation that most imported drugs are less expensive than Amer-
ican  drugs  is  not  generally  true,  especially  in  the  case  of  generic  drugs  mar-
keted in the U.S. 
• Legalized  importation  of  now-unapproved  drugs  will  likely  adversely  affect  the 
• The effects of legalized importation on intellectual property rights are uncertain 
• Legalized  importation  raises  liability  concerns  for  consumers,  manufacturers, 

future development of new drugs for American consumers. 

but likely to be significant. 

distributors, pharmacies, and other entities. 

Keeping unsafe drugs away from American consumers is an enormous task, as we 
are  faced  with  a  deluge  of  drugs  at  points  of  entry  into  the  U.S.  originating  from 
all  over  the  world.  We  are  continually  assessing  this  issue  to  determine  how  FDA 
can best protect American consumers from this threat. 

The  Internet  has  created  an  extraordinary,  unregulated  marketplace  for  the  sale 
of unapproved drugs, prescription drugs dispensed without a valid prescription, and 
products  marketed  with  fraudulent  health  claims.  Patients  who  buy  prescription 
drugs  from  a  rogue  website  are  at  risk  of  suffering  adverse  events,  some  of  which 
can  be  life  threatening.  These  risks  include  therapeutic  failure  due  to  lack  of  effect 
because the drug does not contain the correct dose or active ingredient and potential 
side  effects  from  inappropriately-prescribed  medications,  dangerous  drug  inter-
actions  or  drug  contamination.  Patients  are  also  at  risk  because  they  often  don’t 
know  what  they  are  getting  when  they  purchase  some  of  these  drugs.  Although 
some  patients  may  receive  genuine  product,  others  may  unknowingly  receive  coun-
terfeit  copies  that  contain  inert  or  harmful  ingredients,  drugs  that  are  expired  and 
have been diverted to illegitimate resellers, or dangerous sub-potent or super-potent 
products that were improperly manufactured. 

Efforts of Federal and state authorities have kept infiltration of counterfeit drugs 
in the U.S. drug supply chain to a minimum. Our success is a result of the extensive 
system  of  laws  and  our  enforcement  efforts.  In  recent  years,  however,  FDA  is  chal-
lenged by efforts of increasingly well-organized counterfeiters who are often located 
overseas,  backed  by  sophisticated  technologies  and  criminal  operations,  intent  on 
profiting  from  drug  counterfeiting  at  the  expense  of  American  patients.  To  respond 
to  this  domestic  emerging  threat,  FDA  has  been  working  with  manufacturers, 
wholesalers,  retailers,  other  Federal  and  state  government  entities,  standards  bod-
ies,  and  others  to  implement  measures  to  further  secure  our  Nation’s  drug  supply. 
When  FDA  learns  of  schemes  intended  to  use  the  drug  supply  to  harm  U.S.  con-
sumers, we actively work to prevent them to the fullest extent of the law. A recent 
case  illustrates  why  American  consumers  ordering  prescription  drugs  from  Cana-
dian sources cause FDA great concern. In August 2006, FDA advised consumers not 
to  purchase  prescription  drugs  from  various  websites,  including  www.RxNorth.com, 
that have orders filled by a firm in Manitoba, Canada, following reports of counter-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

15 

feit  versions  of  prescription  drug  products  being  sold  by  these  companies  to  U.S. 
consumers.  FDA  is  investigating  these  reports  and  is  coordinating  with  inter-
national law enforcement authorities on this matter. Laboratory results to date have 
found  counterfeits  from  these  websites,  destined  for  the  U.S.  market,  of  the  fol-
lowing  drug  products:  Lipitor,  Diovan,  Actonel,  Nexium,  Hyzaar,  Ezetrol  (known  as 
Zetia in the United States), Crestor, Celebrex, Arimidex, and Propecia. 

In addition, just last month, FDA issued an alert to consumers who placed orders 
for  specific  drug  products  over  the  Internet  (Ambien,  Xanax,  Lexapro,  and  Ativan), 
but  instead  received  a  product  that,  according  to  preliminary  analysis,  contains 
haloperidol, a powerful anti-psychotic drug. Reports show that several consumers in 
the  U.S.  have  sought  emergency  medical  treatment,  after  ingesting  the  suspect 
product,  for  symptoms  such  as  difficulty  in  breathing,  muscle  spasms,  and  muscle 
stiffness.  Haloperidol  can  cause  muscle  stiffness  and  spasms,  agitation,  and  seda-
tion.  Identifying  the  actual  sellers  or  websites  has  been  challenging  because  of  the 
deceptive  practices  of  many  commercial  outlets  on  the  Internet.  Currently,  the  ori-
gin  of  these  tablets  is  unknown  but  the  packages  were  postmarked  in  Greece.  Pre-
liminary  investigation  has  identified  some  of  the  responsible  websites  and  we  are 
currently  pursuing  both  domestic  and  foreign  leads.  Details  of  additional  cases  are 
included in an appendix to this testimony. 

In an effort to gauge the volume and scope of drugs coming into the U.S., we rou-
tinely survey international mail facilities. A recent finding confirms our concern that 
buying drugs from foreign sources pose specific risks to U.S. citizens. An FDA oper-
ation in 2005, called ‘‘Bait and Switch,’’ found that nearly half of the imported drugs 
that  FDA  intercepted  from  four  selected  countries  (India,  Israel,  Costa  Rica,  and 
Vanuatu) were shipped to fill orders that consumers believed were placed with ‘‘Ca-
nadian’’  pharmacies.  Of  the  drugs  being  promoted  as  ‘‘Canadian,’’  85  percent  ap-
peared  to  come  from  27  countries  around  the  globe.  Many  of  these  drugs  were  not 
adequately labeled to help assure safe and effective use and some were found to be 
counterfeit. 

FDA  also  works  with  U.S.  Customs  and  Border  Protection  on  their  surveys  at 
international mail facilities. In the last 6 months, FDA has assisted in two such op-
erations.  These  operations  revealed  that  we  are  still  fighting  the  same  issues  we 
have seen in the past: 

to refusal of admission because they violate the FD&C Act. 

• Almost  all  of  the  pharmaceuticals  found  in  mail  parcels  continue  to  be  subject 
• We  continue  to  see  evidence  of  websites  employing  tactics  such  as  those  re-
vealed by FDA’s ‘‘Bait and Switch’’ operation. These suppliers appear to be Ca-
nadian sources, but send U.S. consumers drugs from countries other than Can-
ada. 
• A  survey  conducted  in  January  2007  revealed  that  of  the  462  drug  products 
intercepted  and  examined  at  one  international  mail  facility,  over  half  were 
drugs that are available as FDA-approved generic drug products in the U.S. and 
are  most  likely  cheaper  in  the  U.S.  than  abroad.  Of  those  products  examined, 
with generic equivalents, over 40 percent are available at national retail chains 
that offer certain generic drugs for $4 each. This is less than the shipping price 
of most Internet sellers. 

Last  year,  an  FDA  investigation  found  that  many  foreign  medications,  although 
marketed  under  the  same  or  similar-sounding  brand  names  as  those  in  the  U.S., 
contain  different  active  ingredients  than  the  U.S.  products.  For  example,  in  the 
U.S.,  ‘‘Flomax’’  is  a  brand  name  for  tamsulosin,  a  treatment  for  an  enlarged  pros-
tate,  while  in  Italy,  the  active  ingredient  in  the  product  called  ‘‘Flomax’’  is 
morniflumate, an anti-inflammatory drug. 

FDA also has found 105 U.S. drug brand names that are so similar to drugs mar-
keted  in  foreign  countries  that  consumers  who  fill  such  prescriptions  abroad  may 
receive  a  drug  with  the  wrong  active  ingredient.  For  example,  in  the  United  King-
dom,  ‘‘Ambyen,’’  a  brand  name  for  a  drug  product  containing  amiodarone,  used  to 
treat  life-threatening  abnormal  heart  rhythms,  could  be  mistaken  for  ‘‘Ambien,’’  a 
U.S. brand name for a sleeping pill. Consumers taking medications containing active 
ingredients  not  prescribed  by  their  physician  increase  their  risks  of  unnecessary 
side effects and possibly serious adverse outcomes. 

FDA  also  publishes  Import  Alerts  to  field  personnel  about  potentially  dangerous 
drugs being offered for import into the U.S. Field personnel use this information to 
halt  shipments  of  potentially  dangerous  products  at  the  borders.  For  example,  last 
month FDA added 39 known foreign suppliers of unapproved isotretinoin (known by 
the  brand  name  Accutane)  to  an  existing  Import  Alert,  ‘‘Unapproved  New  Drugs 
Promoted in the U.S.’’ The unsupervised use of isotretinoin carries significant poten-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

16 

tial risks, including birth defects and even fetal death, and may cause serious men-
tal health problems. For this reason, the approved medication should only be taken 
by persons taking part in a specific risk management program closely monitored by 
their  personal  physician.  Consumers  receiving  isotretinoin  from  these  foreign 
sources are not likely taking part in the risk management program. 

As a public health agency, we understand the importance of protecting the public 
health not only through regulation and enforcement, but also through education and 
collaboration.  FDA’s  website  (www.fda.gov)  contains  extensive  information  for  con-
sumers about drug importation, buying drugs online; counterfeit drugs, enforcement 
activities,  potential  public  health  threats,  as  well  as  resources  to  report  problems 
with FDA regulated products or websites that could be selling fake or harmful prod-
ucts. 

FDA  coordinates  with  other  governmental  bodies  and  meets  regularly  with  other 
Federal  agencies  and  state  officials  to  share  information  and  identify  opportunities 
for  partnering  in  enforcement  actions.  Some  of  the  Federal  agencies  that  are  FDA 
partners  include  U.S.  Customs  and  Border  Protection,  U.S.  Drug  Enforcement  Ad-
ministration, U.S. Immigration and Customs Enforcement, U.S. Postal Service, and 
the Federal Bureau of Investigation, just to name a few. We also work with organi-
zations  representing  consumers,  health  care  practitioners,  industry,  and  others. 
These  relationships  are  essential  to  keep  the  Agency  abreast  of  emerging  issues,  to 
leverage resources, and to best protect American consumers. 

FDA understands that Congress and the public are concerned about the high cost 
of prescription drugs. FDA currently has an efficient generic drug approval program 
that brings lower cost versions of brand name drugs to U.S. consumers. In most in-
stances,  FDA-approved  generic  drugs  are  less  expensive  than  generics  sold  abroad. 
Prompt  approval  of  generic  drug  product  applications  is  a  priority  for  FDA.  Re-
sources  for  generic  drug  approvals  have  consistently  increased.  Moreover,  both  the 
number  of  generic  drug  applications  FDA  receives  and  the  number  of  applications 
FDA’s  Office  of  Generic  Drugs  (OGD)  approves  continue  to  increase  each  year  as 
well.  OGD  recently  instituted  many  new  practices  and  procedures  to  help  expedite 
the  generic  drug  application  review  process.  Because  of  these  efforts,  on  the  very 
day  that  the  last  controlling  patents  or  exclusivities  expired  on  an  innovator  prod-
uct,  OGD  has  approved  at  least  one  generic  drug  application  in  most  cases.  Recent 
examples  of  approvals  when  the  exclusivities  expired 
include  pravastatin 
(Pravachol);  sertraline  (Zoloft);  simvastatin  (Zocor);  and  ondansetron  (Zofran).  Mul-
tiple  versions  of  these  products  from  various  manufacturers  are  currently  on  the 
market. 

Last year, 21 applications for meloxicam (Mobic), a product with no patent or ex-
clusivity  protection  blocking  approval,  were  approved.  (This  product  is  used  to  re-
lieve  the  signs  and  symptoms  of  osteoarthritis  and  rheumatoid  arthritis.)  The  cost 
to  consumers  of  this  product  dropped  dramatically  after  these  generic  approvals. 
Using OGD’s ‘‘cluster’’ team approach, many of these applications were approved in 
just  over  9  months.  These  approvals  will  result  in  many  generic  alternatives  avail-
able  for  patients  potentially  saving  millions  of  dollars  in  medication  costs  for  con-
sumers and the Federal Government. 

The standards for drug review and approval in the U.S. are the best in the world, 
and  the  safety  of  our  drug  supply  mirrors  these  high  standards.  However,  despite 
the  very  real  risks,  a  substantial  number  of  Americans  are  obtaining  prescription 
medications  from  foreign  sources.  U.S.  consumers  often  seek  out  Canadian  sup-
pliers,  sources  that  purport  to  be  Canadian,  or  other  foreign  sources  that  they  be-
lieve  to  be  reliable.  Many  drugs  purported  to  be  from  Canada  are  actually  from 
other  foreign  countries  that  lack  regulatory  oversight  and  FDA  cannot  assure  the 
safety or effectiveness of these drugs. 

Thank you for the opportunity to testify. I look forward to responding to any ques-

tions you may have. 

Drug Importation Cases 

APPENDIX 

Provided below are summaries of selected cases FDA investigated that pertain to 

drug importation. 

Counterfeit  Percocet®,  Viagra® and  Cialis® Tablets:  In  January  2007,  an  indi-
vidual in Philadelphia who purchased thousands of counterfeit drugs over the Inter-
net from China, including Percocet, Viagra and Cialis, was sentenced in the Eastern 
District  of  Pennsylvania  on  charges  related  to  trafficking  in  counterfeit  goods  and 
other  counterfeit  prescription  drug  related  charges.  The  defendant  sent  samples  of 
various  medications  to  a  counterfeit  pharmaceutical  manufacturer  in  China  to  be 
copied  and  manufactured.  After  the  counterfeits  were  made  in  China,  the  medica-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

17 

tion  was  then  shipped  to  the  defendant  in  Philadelphia  for  eventual  sale  on  the 
Internet and other venues. The United States Attorney said of this case: ‘‘When you 
go  around  government  safeguards  to  either  the  Internet  or  the  street  to  purchase 
prescription  medication,  you  have  no  idea  what  you’re  getting.  The  reality  is  that 
you  might  wind  up  taking  something  that  is  ineffective,  as  we  saw  in  this  case,  or 
downright dangerous.’’ 

This Office of Criminal Investigations (OCI) case, worked jointly with U.S. Immi-
gration  and  Customs  Enforcement  (ICE),  U.S.  Drug  Enforcement  Administration 
(DEA), U.S. Postal Inspection Service and the Philadelphia Police Department, was 
part of a much larger OCI–ICE counterfeit drug investigation. 

Clandestine  Drug  Manufacturing  of  Internet  Drugs:  In  2006,  eleven  individuals 
and  an  Atlanta,  Georgia-based  company  were  indicted  by  a  Federal  grand  jury  on 
multiple felony charges relating to a scheme to sell adulterated and unapproved new 
drugs  over  the  Internet.  The  defendants  in  this  case  opened  up  a  pharmaceutical 
manufacturing  facility  in  Belize  where  they  made  over  24  different  prescription 
medications.  The  defendants  marketed  the  drugs  through  ‘‘spam’’  e-mail  advertise-
ments where they claimed the drugs were Canadian generic versions of brand name 
drugs.  Some  of  the  drugs  the  defendants  made  were  unapproved  versions  of 
Ambien®, Valium®, Xanax®, Cialis®, Lipitor®, Vioxx® and others. These drugs were 
then purchased by and shipped to U.S. consumers and to various drug wholesalers. 

Dextromethorphan  deaths:  On  April  12,  2006,  two  men  were  sentenced  in  the 
Southern  District  of  Indiana  Federal  Court  to  77  months  incarceration  after  plead-
ing  guilty  to  introducing  a  misbranded  drug  into  interstate  commerce;  specifically, 
dextromethorphan  (DXM),  a  cough  suppressant,  which  they  sold  over  the  Internet 
through their website. 

This  case  started  in  2005  after  five  young  people  died  after  ordering  and  con-
suming DXM from the defendant’s website. DXM is an anti-tussive (cough suppres-
sant),  which  is  approved  for  over-the-counter  cough  medications.  The  defendants 
purchased  the  raw  ingredients  from  a  firm  in  India,  manufactured  the  finished 
product,  and  sold  the  DXM  through  their  website.  The  defendants  marketed  the 
DXM  by  falsely  claiming  that  DXM  was  a  chemical  used  for  research  and  develop-
ment  rather  than  a  drug  for  human  consumption.  DXM  is  often  abused  by  some  in 
order to experience a ‘‘high.’’ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e
.
t
t
u
7
0
3

l

18 

Counterfeit  Viagra®,  Cialis®,  and  Lipitor®:  In  January  2006,  an  individual  from 
the  state  of  Washington  was  convicted  for  his  involvement  in  the  importation  of 
counterfeit  drugs  from  China  including  Viagra,  Cialis  and  Lipitor  and  the  subse-
quent  distribution  of  those  counterfeit  drugs.  In  this  joint  OCI–ICE  investigation, 
cooperation  was  sought  and  received  from  the  Chinese  government.  As  a  result  of 
this  cooperation,  the  Chinese  authorities  arrested  eleven  individuals  in  China  and 
recovered  significant  amounts  of  counterfeit  drugs  and  counterfeit  drug  packaging. 
The defendant was sentenced in October 2006 to 10 month’s incarceration. 

Consumers  Warned  of  Receiving  Incorrect  Medication  in  the  Mail:  In  February 
2007,  FDA  issued  an  alert  to  consumers  who  placed  orders  for  various  medications 
such as Xanax®, Ativan®, Lexapro®, and Ambien®, over the Internet. Instead of re-
ceiving  the  products  they  ordered,  these  consumers  instead  received  a  product  con-
taining  haloperidol,  a  powerful  anti-psychotic.  Some  of  these  consumers  sought 
emergency medical treatments for a variety of symptoms after ingesting the suspect 
product.  In  all  instances,  consumers  received  the  suspect  medication  in  packaging, 
which  was  postmarked  from  Greece.  FDA  is  attempting  to  identify  the  actual  ven-
dors  and  source  of  the  suspect  medication,  but  the  illusive  nature  of  the  Internet 
and the deceptive practices of many Internet pharmaceutical businesses are making 
identification of the actual supplier of these medications problematic. This investiga-
tion is ongoing. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e
.

2

l

t
t
u
7
0
3

s
p
e
.
1
t
t
u
7
0
3

l

19 

Counterfeit  Drug  Arrest  in  Hong  Kong:  In  September  2006,  an  individual  from 
China  was  arrested  by  officers  of  the  Hong  Kong  Customs  and  Excise  Department 
based on a Federal arrest warrant issued by the U.S. District Court for the District 
of Colorado. The defendant was arrested in Hong Kong after meeting with an under-
cover OCI agent who posed as a buyer of over 400,000 counterfeit Cialis and Viagra 
tablets.  This  investigation  also  involved  the  sale  of  several  thousand  counterfeit 
Tamiflu® capsules that were manufactured in China and shipped to the U.S. Infor-
mation  developed  by  OCI  and  ICE  was  shared  with  Chinese  authorities,  which  led 
to  the  August  2006  arrests  of  four  individuals  in  China.  Furthermore,  information 
developed during this joint OCI–ICE counterfeit drug investigation was the basis for 
the  previously  mentioned  counterfeit  Percocet  investigation  in  Philadelphia,  PA.  In 
addition  to  the  arrest  in  Hong  Kong,  three  other  defendants  in  the  U.S.  have  pled 
guilty to counterfeit drug charges. This case is ongoing. 

Counterfeit  Viagra® and  Cialis®:  In  July  2006,  a  man  was  arrested  by  OCI  and 
ICE  agents  after  several  transactions  in  the  Houston,  Texas  area  where  significant 
quantities  of  counterfeit  Viagra  were  sold  to  an  undercover  ICE  agent.  Subsequent 
to  the  arrest,  counterfeit  Viagra  and  Cialis  valued  at  approximately  $600,000  were 
seized.  The  drugs  were  manufactured  in  China  and  sent  to  the  suspect  in  Houston 
for  distribution.  The  suspect  was  charged  with  trafficking  in  counterfeit  goods  and 
other related counterfeit drug charges and remains incarcerated as a potential flight 
risk.  The  defendant  pled  guilty  in  this  case  in  October  2006  but  has  not  yet  been 
sentenced.  Other  defendants  have  been  arrested  and  are  awaiting  judicial  action. 
This joint OCI-ICE investigation is ongoing. 

FDA Warns Consumers of Canadian Website Shipping Counterfeit Medications: In 
August 2006, FDA published a warning to consumers about counterfeit medications 
shipped from RxNorth, a company based in Manitoba, Canada, which operates sev-
eral  websites.  RxNorth,  which  operates  as  Mediplan  Prescription  Plus  Pharmacy 
and  Mediplan  Global  Health,  were  shipping  counterfeit  medications  from  various 
countries  to  American  consumers  who  were  ordering  a  variety  of  medications 
through the RxNorth and affiliated websites. Although this is an ongoing investiga-
tion,  FDA  issued  a  press  release  alerting  consumers  about  these  websites  because 
of the potential dangers of counterfeit medications. 

Counterfeit  Lipitor® Tablets:  In  August  2005  in  the  Western  District  of  Missouri, 
three businesses and eleven individuals were indicted for their involvement in a $42 
million  conspiracy  to  sell  counterfeit,  smuggled  and  misbranded  Lipitor  and  other 
drugs  and  for  participating  in  a  conspiracy  to  sell  stolen  drugs.  These  indictments 
are the result of an ongoing OCI investigation that was begun by OCI in April 2003 
involving  the  manufacturing,  smuggling,  and  the  interstate  distribution  of  counter-
feit  pharmaceuticals.  To  date,  twelve  defendants  have  been  convicted;  one  received 
a nine- year term of imprisonment. Additional defendants are awaiting trial. 

mony. 

Senator DORGAN. Dr. Lutter, thank you for being here. 
It’s hard for me to know where to start with respect to your testi-

The task force you referred to in the first paragraph was largely 
a joke. Creating a task force with Dr. McClellan, Dr. Crawford, and 
so on, to tell us what they think about drug importation? Creating 
a  task  force  of  people  who  largely  oppose  drug  importation  to  tell 
us  that  they  largely  oppose  it?  That  was  a  joke,  in  my  judgment. 
So, I place little credibility in that. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e
.
3
t
t
u
7
0
3

l

20 

Let me just say to you, as well, when Tommy Thompson left gov-
ernment, the Secretary of HHS, we met at the elevator on the sec-
ond  floor  of  the  Capitol  one  day  after  he  had  retired  and  left  gov-
ernment,  and  as  we  greeted  each  other,  he  said,  ‘‘By  the  way’’—to 
me—‘‘By the way, keep on that prescription drug issue, the impor-
tation  issue.  You’re  right  about  that.’’  So—that’s  after  he  left  the 
government. 

But  let  me  ask  you,  did  you  study  the  piece  of  legislation  that 
Senator  Snowe  and  I  have  introduced,  with  respect  to  the  safety 
considerations in that legislation? 

Dr.  LUTTER.  I  have  been  briefed  on  it,  and  I’ve  discussed  it  with 

staff. I have not read it in detail. 

Senator  DORGAN.  But  most  of  your  testimony  had  nothing  to  do 
with  that,  isn’t  that  correct?  Your  testimony  is  about  the  seizure 
of counterfeit medicine or importation from unapproved venues and 
so  on?  So,  your  testimony  had  little  to  do  with  the  legislation  that 
Senator Snowe and I and 31 Senators have introduced. Why is that 
the case? 

Dr.  LUTTER.  The  concerns  that  we  have  with  importation  cur-
rently are related, Senator, to the risks that we see currently, and 
that  is  that  people  are  now  buying  unapproved  products  over  the 
Internet  in  a  manner  that  we  think  is  unsafe.  And  we  think  we 
have a key responsibility to communicate that to the public so that 
they  understand  the  safety  risks  that  they  face  when  buying  un-
regulated, unapproved products from foreign sources. 

Senator  DORGAN.  You’ll  find  no  objection  from  the  four  of  us  on 
this  panel  at  all  about  that.  That’s  not  the  point  of  this  hearing. 
No  one,  that  I’m  aware  of,  has  suggested  that  we  allow  unauthor-
ized  drugs,  drugs  not  approved  by  the  FDA,  drugs  coming  in  from 
Internet  sites  that  have  not  been  approved—I  don’t  think  anyone 
is  suggesting  that.  So,  I  guess  you  have  won—won  a  debate  we’re 
not having. Congratulations. 

But the fact is, we’ve introduced a piece of legislation, with near-
ly one-third of the Senate, that has very specific—very specific safe-
ty  issues.  Would  you  testify  about  your  evaluation  of  those  safety 
issues? 

Dr. LUTTER. I’m sorry, the safety issues pertaining to? 
Senator  DORGAN.  In  the—well,  we  have  introduced  legislation 
that  has  nearly  a  third  of  the  Senate  as  cosponsors  of  the  legisla-
tion.  We  have  included  issues  dealing  with  safety  in  that  legisla-
tion,  because  much  of  your  testimony  dealt  with  safety.  We’ve  in-
cluded  provisions,  that  are  very  significant  provisions,  that  ad-
dress,  for  example,  the  first  time  we  went  through  this,  where 
Donna  Shalala  refused  to  certify,  and  set  out  four  conditions  that 
needed to be met. We meet all these four conditions in this legisla-
tion that responds to the Executive Branch issues. My question for 
you is, how do you respond to those, or do you believe there is not 
the  capability  to  provide  for  safe  reimportation  of  FDA-approved 
drugs  from  FDA-approved  plants  or  FDA-approved  sites?  Do  you 
believe that is impossible? 

Dr. LUTTER. My understanding, Senator, from the invitation was 
that you wanted me to talk about the policy implications of impor-
tation broadly. And if you wish, we will be very happy to offer tech-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

21 

nical  assistance  on  the  legislation,  in  particular,  if  you  request  us 
to do so. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Let  me  ask  it  a  different  way,  then.  As  I  indi-
cated  in  my  opening  statement,  Europe  has  a  system  of  parallel 
trading.  They’ve  had  it  for  a  couple  of  decades.  German  can  buy 
from Spain; an Italian can buy from France, under parallel trading, 
a  prescription  drug  that  is  an  approved  drug.  Let  me  ask  you 
whether  you  think  we  are  as  capable  as  the  Europeans  in  estab-
lishing—providing  you  the  resources,  and  then  establishing  a  sys-
tem  by  which,  with  FDA  approval  and  FDA  certification,  that  a 
U.S. consumer can safely reimport an FDA-approved drug that has 
never left the chain of custody, an FDA-approved chain of custody? 
Do you—— 

Dr. LUTTER. I think, surely, Senator, the Americans are as capa-
ble as Europeans in that regard, but there’s a key distinction with 
respect  to  that  model,  and  that  is  that  Brussels,  as  the  capital  of 
the  European  Union,  can  establish  regulations  which  apply  to  all 
countries. And I believe, Senator, that the form of importation that 
we’re  talking  about  in  the  United  States  lacks  a  clear  parallel,  in 
the  sense  that  the  foreign  countries  from  which  we  would  be  im-
porting  are  ones  that  are  not  governed  by  any  ‘‘international  gov-
ernment,’’  if  you  will,  in  the  way  that  Brussels  governs  countries 
that are members of the European Union. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Well,  that’s  a  novel  answer,  because  the  pro-
posal  in  our  legislation  deals  with  plants  in  foreign  countries  that 
the FDA has already approved. It deals with an Internet seller that 
the  FDA  would  have  approved  and  certified.  So,  we’re  not  talking 
about a regime outside of the FDA’s approval process. My question 
is—the  FDA—the  FDA  approved  the  plant  that  this  Lipitor  was 
produced  in,  in  Ireland.  I  assume  the  FDA  actually  sends  people 
to this plant and says, ‘‘Yes, you can produce this medicine in this 
plant,  and  you  can  ship  this  medicine  to  the  U.S.  consumer,  and 
we believe that is safe.’’ Is that correct? 

Dr. LUTTER. Yes, sir. 
Senator  DORGAN.  All  right.  And  if  the  FDA  approves  a  foreign 
plant that is a production facility for this medicine, and a foreign— 
a  distribution  system  to  move  that,  in  a  closed  system,  to  a  U.S. 
consumer, tell me where the safety implications are. 

Dr.  LUTTER.  Well,  I  think  the  issue,  Senator,  is  that,  when  we 
inspect  a  foreign  facility  that  is  manufacturing  an  FDA-approved 
product,  that  this  is  very  necessary  and  essential  to  ensure  that 
that product meets FDA standards. But there may be another facil-
ity,  even  another  line,  even  another  building  within  that  same 
manufacturing  facility,  which  isn’t  inspected  by  us.  And  the  ques-
tion  is,  if  that  product  is  not  inspected  by  us,  what  is  our  ability 
to  ensure  that  it  meets  our  standards?  And  that’s,  I  think,  a  key 
distinction to follow. 

Senator DORGAN. What about the case today? How do you assure 
this  comes  from  the  line  that  you’ve  inspected,  and  not  the  line 
that you didn’t inspect? 

Dr.  LUTTER.  Well,  I  have  trouble  recognizing  the  bottle  from  its 

distance. 

Senator DORGAN. It’s Lipitor. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

22 

Dr.  LUTTER.  If  that’s  the  Lipitor  which  is  manufactured  in  Ire-
land, then that’s inspected by an FDA inspector at the plant in Ire-
land, and it is shipped from Ireland to the United States. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Well,  let  me—my  colleagues  wish  to  ask  ques-
tions.  Let  me  ask  you  a  simpler  question,  if  I  might.  In  Emerson, 
Canada,  there’s  a  one-room  drugstore.  And  I  went  there  one  day 
with a group of senior citizens from Fargo, North Dakota. And just 
miles across the border, in this little one-room drugstore, they pur-
chased their prescription drugs that, 10 miles on the other—on the 
U.S.  side  of  the  border,  they  would  have  had  to  pay  substantially 
more  money  for.  These  were  citizens  who  didn’t  have  a  lot  of 
money.  And  they  made  their  purchases  in  this  drugstore,  and 
showed me their savings, and were excited about it. And my under-
standing of the chain of custody in Canada is such that you would 
not  be  concerned  about  someone  buying  a  prescription  drug  in  a 
Canadian  drugstore.  Would  you  agree  with  that?  Do  you  believe 
the chain of custody of drugs in Canada, with respect to the drugs 
that go from the producer to the wholesaler to the drugstore, is es-
sentially as safe as the chain of custody in the U.S.? 

Dr.  LUTTER.  FDA  has  no  particular  expertise  in  the  regulatory 

system of Canada. 

affirmatively previously. 

Senator  DORGAN.  The  FDA  has  already  answered  that  question 

Dr.  LUTTER.  But,  in  general,  it  is  very,  very  well  respected  as 

being safe and adequate for Canadians. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Essentially  has  the  same  type  of  chain  of  cus-

tody with the same safety circumstances as the U.S.? 

Dr. LUTTER. It’s widely seen that way. 
Senator  DORGAN.  And  that’s  what  the  FDA  has  previously  said. 
If  that’s  the  case,  then  at  least  you  and  I  can  probably  agree  that 
the  importation  of  that  drug  purchased  in  the  one-room  pharmacy 
in Emerson, Canada, brought back across the border, is not a safe-
ty issue. Is that correct? 

Dr.  LUTTER.  There  are  a  collection  of  safety  issues  that  people 
need  to  be  concerned  about.  In  January  of  last  year,  we  issued  a 
report  on  our  website  dealing  with  confusing  brand  names.  And  it 
illustrates  an  example  that  many  people  don’t—aren’t  aware  of,  of 
a  regulatory  function  performed  by  FDA  in  the  United  States  that 
many  people  recognize  is  valid,  which  isn’t  often  appreciated,  and 
that  is  that  in  the  United  States  when  a  new  product  comes  to 
market,  we  ascertain  whether  or  not  the  proposed  brand  name  for 
that  product  is  one  that  is  similar  to  existing  brand  names,  or  so 
close  that  it  could  be  confused  by  pharmacists  dispensing  medica-
tions.  In  the  case  of  Americans  taking  prescriptions  and  filling 
them  abroad,  there’s  no  such  function  provided  by  FDA  or  any 
other  regulatory  body.  So,  Americans  taking  prescriptions,  even 
crossing  the  border,  if  you  will,  to  a  pharmacist  that  they  think  is 
entirely  reliable  in  other  circumstances,  should  be  aware  that  the 
name  of  the  product  does  not  necessarily  translate  across  the  bor-
der to one that is otherwise equivalent. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Yes.  Well,  that’s  the—a  new  defense,  the  con-
fused-pharmacist  defense,  I  guess.  I  don’t  understand.  I  don’t  un-
derstand,  at  all,  why  the  FDA,  given  the  resources—and  our  legis-
lation  gives  them  the  substantial  resources  they  need—cannot  do 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

23 

what  others  in  the  world  are  able  to  do,  and  that  is  stand  up  for 
the  consumers  of  this  country,  give  them  a  safe  supply  of  drugs, 
allow  a  little  market—a  little  bit  of  the  market  system  to  play  a 
role in putting downward pressure on market prices. What you are 
supporting, Dr. Lutter, is a circumstance in which we do have price 
controls  in  this  country.  The  price  controls  are  imposed  by  the 
pharmaceutical  industry.  They’re  the  ones  that  impose  the  price 
controls.  And,  by  the  way,  they  say,  ‘‘Well,  we  really  can’t  make 
any  money,  except  in  the  U.S.  That’s  why  we  have  to  charge  the 
U.S.  consumer  the  highest  prices.’’  Well,  why  did  they  repatriate 
60-plus-billion  dollars  when  this  Congress,  regrettably,  gave  them 
a five and a quarter percent—gave all industry a five and a quarter 
percent sweetheart tax rate if they could—if they would repatriate 
money  from  abroad.  The  pharmaceutical  industry  repatriated  60- 
plus-billion  dollars.  Clearly,  they’re  making  money  elsewhere  by 
charging much lower prices. 

And I—you probably detect I’m enormously frustrated, have been 
for  a  long  while,  with  the  FDA  coming  here,  telling  us  what  they 
can’t do. I’m very interested in finding out what they can do to try 
to  help  consumers.  And  I  think,  you  know,  your  first  consumer’s 
‘‘bait  and  switch’’—I  think  yours  was  ‘‘bait  and  switch.’’  You  came, 
talking  about  counterfeit  drugs.  There’s  nothing  in  legislation  that 
any of the four of us have been talking about that has anything to 
do  with  counterfeit  drugs.  It  has  to  do  with  safe  reimportation  of 
FDA-approved drugs. 

Senator DeMint? 
Senator DEMINT. Dr. Lutter, I, too, am disappointed in the testi-
mony.  We  all  know  that  the  status  quo  is  not  acceptable,  and  we 
know  denying  importation  and  not  having  any  kind  of  approval  or 
certification  is  not  working.  The  whole  point  of  this  legislation  is 
to create a safe system. 

Am  I  right  in  saying  that  the  FDA  oversees  the  importation  of 
fruits,  vegetables,  meats,  fruit  juice,  beer,  wine  from  all  over  the 
world? Do you have a system that does that? 

Dr.  LUTTER.  We  inspect  those  products  at  the  border,  yes,  Sen-

Senator  DEMINT.  But  you’re  responsible  for  the  health  of  the 
American people when it comes to products coming in from all over 
the world that we eat and drink. 

Dr.  LUTTER.  We  are  responsible  for  the  safety  of  food  and  bev-

erages that we regulate, yes. 

ator. 

Senator DEMINT. And I would assume that’s a very complex sys-
tem of understanding points of origin and what is brought in, who 
the  suppliers  are.  I  assume  the  FDA  is  very  involved  with  making 
sure that these products are safe. 

Dr.  LUTTER.  These  products,  unlike  drugs,  do  not  contain  active 
pharmacological  ingredients  that  are  being  prescribed  to  sick  peo-
ple. 

Senator  DEMINT.  But  they  could  have  disease,  they  could  be 

tainted, there could be a lot of dangers, right? 

Dr. LUTTER. There are problems of food-borne illness, and we ac-

tively fight that domestically in imported products. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

24 

Senator  DEMINT.  OK.  Are  you  aware  that  most  of  the—or  a  lot 
of the drugs that are made in this country are made from imported 
ingredients? 

Dr.  LUTTER.  I’m  aware  that  there’s  active  trade,  if  you  will,  in 

active pharmaceutical ingredients. 

Senator  DEMINT.  Does  the  FDA  inspect  these  foreign  plants 

where these ingredients are made? 

Dr. LUTTER. We inspect facilities where active pharmaceutical in-

gredients are manufactured. 

Senator  DEMINT.  Well,  isn’t  it  possible  that  the  line  you  inspect 
is  not  the  line  they  actually  ship  these  ingredients  to  the  United 
States? 

Dr.  LUTTER.  I  suppose  it’s  possible.  The  question  is  whether  or 
not  it  would  be  violating  our  regulations.  And  I’d  have  to  get  back 
to you on that. 

Senator DEMINT. Is it not the exact same situation you’re saying 

you can’t do with finished products? 

Dr. LUTTER. I’m not sure I follow your questioning. 
Senator  DEMINT.  Is  not  the  situation  with  finished  products,  as 
far as developing some international safety system, very similar, if 
not exactly the same, as assuring that the ingredients for the same 
pharmaceuticals—— 

Dr. LUTTER. Yes—— 
Senator DORGAN.—are safe? 
Dr. LUTTER.—Senator, let me try—if I could try and answer your 
question, and that of Chairman Dorgan, in a slightly different way. 
And  I’m  sorry  that  you’re  disappointed  with  the  testimony.  I 
thought I was being invited to talk about policy implications of im-
ported  drugs,  broadly,  rather  than  the  particular  bill  that 
you’re—— 

Senator  DEMINT.  We’re  well  aware  of  the  Administration’s  posi-
tion, and we really didn’t need that repeated today. And we have— 
there are several good proposals, with a lot of detail, which the Ad-
ministration is very aware of. There’s no reason that we can’t have 
some  testimony  as  to  what  the  possibilities  are  of  creating  these 
safety—or  safeguards  that  we’ve  got  in  this  legislation.  So,  I—for-
give me for being impatient, but I see a lot of inconsistency in what 
we’re  talking  about.  If  the  drugs  that  are  made  in  this  country 
come from ingredients from inspected plants, you’re telling me that 
you  can  somehow  guarantee  that  safety,  but,  if  they’re  made  here 
and  put  in  tamperproof  containers  and  sent  to  some  other  country 
that is within an FDA-inspected distribution system, that somehow 
that’s  not  safe.  It—I  hope  you  realize  that  what  you’re  saying  is 
very difficult to absorb. 

Dr.  LUTTER.  A  key  concern  that  we  have  with,  I  think  broadly 
speaking, the type of proposal that you’re endorsing is, the implica-
tions  for  FDA  of  having  to  approve  the  foreign  products,  because 
you’re  asking  me  to  speak  particularly  about  the  legislation.  I’m 
not  prepared  to  offer  technical  assistance,  but  I  have  been  briefed 
on the broad theme, so let me speak a little bit about—— 

Senator  DEMINT.  You  do  know  what  we’re  doing  now,  as  far  as 
inspecting  plants  for  the  ingredients  of  pharmaceutical  products 
that are made in this country—foreign plants. I mean you’re aware 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

25 

of your policies and procedures, and how that’s done—I’m assuming 
you are. 

Dr. LUTTER. Yes. 
Senator DEMINT. OK. 
Dr.  LUTTER.  But  then  if  the  proposal  were  for  the  FDA  to  allow 
commercial  importation  of  FDA-approved  products  that  are  made 
abroad, presumably it’s the foreign versions of FDA-approved prod-
ucts that are already for sale in the United States. If that were the 
legislative  proposal  that’s  being  considered,  then  I  think  the  ques-
tion  is,  what  does  this  really  mean  for  FDA  program  management 
and the review of such applications? And one way of thinking about 
this  is,  really  it  amounts  to  a  substantial  new  FDA  program  that 
would review applications for foreign products to see if they’re safe, 
effective,  and  equivalent  to  U.S.  products.  So,  it  looks  a  little  bit 
like  our  generic  drugs  program.  And  our  generic  drugs  program 
currently has roughly 200 employees who are approving 500 abbre-
viated  new  drug  applications  annually.  And  that  gives  you  some 
idea  of  the  magnitude  of  the  task  that  we  would  be  faced  with  if 
one  were  to  set  up  a  program  wherein  we  would  have  to  approve 
foreign products as safe and effective and equivalent to U.S.—— 

Senator DEMINT. You realize what we’re asking—— 
Dr. LUTTER. We believe this is a very, very significant expansion 

of an existing FDA program. 

Senator DEMINT. But you realize what we’re asking is not to ap-
prove  a  drug  that’s  made  in  another  country,  but  just  to  create  a 
safety loop of distribution, that we can oversee, that’s primarily re-
importing  products  that  were  made  in  the  United  States,  under 
FDA approval and certified plants, that are—— 

Dr. LUTTER. But it’s—— 
Senator DEMINT.—reimported into this country. 
Dr. LUTTER. Senator, I’m not familiar with the details of the leg-
islation that we’re discussing. If you want technical assistance—on 
it, I’m very happy to come and offer that at a later time. 

Senator  DEMINT.  Well,  I  think  that’s  probably  what  we’re  going 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman. I yield. 
Senator  DORGAN.  Let  me  call  on  Senator  Snowe,  as  the—OK, 

to need to do. 

Senator Vitter. 

Senator VITTER. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Dr. Lutter, I take it that your testimony comes out of the FDA’s 
central  mandate  to  protect  safety,  including  of  prescription  drugs. 
Is that correct? 

Dr. LUTTER. Yes, sir. 
Senator  VITTER.  Is  there  any  greater  mandate  or  responsibility 

that FDA has? 

Dr. LUTTER. Our overall mission is to protect and promote public 

health, and that’s our overall mission. 

Senator  VITTER.  So,  is  there  any  other—is  there  any  greater 

mandate than that safety—— 

Dr. LUTTER. No. 
Senator  VITTER.—concern  that  you  have?  And  so,  these  sort  of 
problems  and  dangers  are  very  concerning  to  you  because  of  that 
mandate, I assume. Is that correct? 

Dr. LUTTER. Yes, sir. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

26 

Senator  VITTER.  So,  what  regulatory  regime—what  solution  are 

you putting in place in light of these dangers? 

Dr.  LUTTER.  These  dangers  are  very  problematic  from  the  view-
point  of  protecting  Americans  and  promoting—their  public 
health—— 

Senator  VITTER.  That’s  my  point.  So,  what’s  the  FDA’s  solution 

to this? 

Dr.  LUTTER.  Our  key  solution—I  need  to  back  up  and  say  why 
this  is  so  problematic,  and  then  I’ll  elaborate  on  the  solution.  This 
is  very  problematic  precisely  because  there’s  a  huge  volume  of  im-
ported  parcels  coming  into  international  mail  facilities,  which  con-
tain  unapproved  products.  We  don’t  know  where  they’re  from,  we 
don’t  know  what  they  are,  and  we  lack  the  resources,  we  lack  the 
ability  to  identify  what  they  are  at  the  border,  and  to  stop  them. 
Therefore,  our  key  program  is  to  emphasize,  instead,  public  edu-
cation,  to  tell  consumers  what  risks  they  face  buying  these  prod-
ucts on the web. Everybody has a home computer, they think they 
can  click  on  the  keyboard,  they  think  they  can  find  an  inter-
national  website,  they  see  somebody  reassuring,  wearing  a  white 
coat  and  with  a  stethoscope,  and  they  think  they  can  buy  some-
thing  that  is  what  their  doctor  really  wants  them  to  have  and  is 
equivalent  to  what  their  U.S.  trained  and  licensed  pharmacists 
would  give.  And  they  discover,  instead,  that  that’s  not  the  case. 
And  we  think  that  our  key  job,  and  one  of  the  most  effective  ways 
that  we  can  communicate  these  risks  is  to  go  public  with  them. 
And that’s why what you see here is a collection, if you will, of the 
messages  that  we’ve  communicated  to  the  public  and  to  you. 
They’re  on  our  website,  they’re  in  our  press  releases  over  the  last 
year  and  a  half,  indicating—in  fact,  going  way  back  before  then, 
about the risks that Americans face when they buy these drugs on 
the Internet—— 

Senator  VITTER.  So  protecting  safety  is  your  top  mandate.  This 
sort  of  stuff  is  happening.  You  have  highlighted  that.  That’s  a  big 
danger.  And  so,  the  FDA  response  is  to  tell  people,  ‘‘Don’t  do  it.’’ 
That’s basically the solution, the FDA’s solution. 

Dr. LUTTER. That has been the—— 
Senator VITTER. How has that strategy been working? How effec-
tively  have  you  reduced  the  activity  of  getting  drugs  from  abroad? 
What are the statistics there? 

How’s that strategy working? 
Dr.  LUTTER.  We  wish  we  had  statistics  on  that.  We  do  not.  The 
best  available  statistics  that  we  have  to  date  are  the  ones  that  we 
released in December 2004, and we have no updates since then. It’s 
very  difficult  for  us  actually  to  count  the  volume  of  drugs  coming 
in  at  the  border,  because  we  don’t  always  know  what  parcels  are 
containing pharmaceutical products. 

Senator  VITTER.  And  what  were  those  statistics  from  December 

Dr.  LUTTER.  December  2004,  we  estimated,  given  the  data  that 
we  had,  that  there  were  10  million  parcels  arriving  annually  at 
international mail facilities, and they contained roughly 25 million 
prescriptions. 

Senator VITTER. And was that on the rise, or was—— 

2004? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

27 

Dr. LUTTER. That had definitely been rising over—relative to re-

cent years. 

Senator VITTER. OK. You get the sense that, in light of your solu-
tion  to  the  problem,  that  that  trend  has  been  reversed?  Do  you 
think it’s declining right now? 

Dr. LUTTER. The broad perception is that it has declined, but it’s 
unclear as to why. The key reason that it may have declined is the 
success  of  Medicare  Part  D,  which  provides  prescription  drug  cov-
erage to elderly Americans over 65. 

Senator  VITTER.  Well,  maybe  I’m  just  out  of  step  with  the  broad 
perception.  It  is  not  my  perception  that  it  has  declined.  It  is  my 
perception  that  it’s  increased  50-fold,  up  to  the  point  that  you  are 
talking  about,  and  has  continued  to  grow  from  that  point.  I  don’t 
know  at  what  rate.  I  don’t  know  if  the  pace  has  slowed.  But  my 
perception is that it is a curve that is going up and up. 

So,  I  would  just  suggest  that,  when  the  FDA’s  top  mandate  is 
safety,  when  the  FDA  knows  there  are  problems  out  there,  and 
dangers,  and  your  only  solution  is  press  releases  that  say,  ‘‘Be-
ware,’’  I  would  propose  that  it’s  patently  clear  that  that  is  a  failed 
strategy  and  that  if  you  take  your  mandate  seriously,  you’d  better 
do  something  else,  like  a  regulatory  regime.  What’s  your  response 
to that? 

Dr. LUTTER. Well, the regulatory regimes that we implement are 
under  the  authority  of  the  laws  that  we’ve  been  entrusted  to  ad-
minister.  And  the  key  challenge  here  with  respect  to  the  inter-
national  mail  facilities,  it’s  virtually  impossible.  My  predecessor 
testified  it  would  take  an  army  to  actually  identify  what  are  the 
problems—what parcels at the border contain pharmaceutical prod-
ucts  and  what  they  are,  given  the  procedures  and  the  due  process 
that we’re asked to follow. We cannot stop these at the border with 
the  resources  that  we  have.  And  the  key  reason  for  that  is  essen-
tially  the  impossibility  of  identifying  what  each  parcel  contains, 
and  then  examining  them  to  see  what  they  may  contain  before 
making decisions on what to do with them. 

Senator  VITTER.  Well,  I  would  just  end  by  saying  I  agree  with 
you, it’s impossible to set up that system to stop parcels at the bor-
der. What is possible is to regulate the sources that are allowed to 
come  into  the  country  to  advertise  those  to  the  American  people, 
so  the  American  people  have  confidence  in  those  sources,  and  use 
those  sources.  That’s  the  sort  of  regulatory  regime  I’m  talking 
about,  which,  of  course,  the  FDA,  right  now,  has  full  authority  to 
implement. 

Thanks. I have no further questions. 
Senator DORGAN. Senator Snowe? 
Senator SNOWE. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
You  were  saying  that  you  don’t  have  the  resources.  I  think  the 
point  of  this  legislation  is  that  we  provide  you  the  resources,  and 
the  funding  provided  in  our  bill  was  estimated  by  CBO  as  being 
more  than  adequate  to  implement  this  legislation  and  allow  FDA 
to  do  what  you  would  be  required  to  do.  So,  if  you  had  these  re-
sources,  would  you  be  able  to  do  what  is  required  in  this  legisla-
tion? 

Dr. LUTTER. We believe there are a variety of technical issues as-
sociated  with  the  legislation,  as  I  understand  it,  and  we  probably 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

28 

should look forward to a different opportunity to offer the technical 
assistance  that’s  been  provided.  But  I  think  a  key  question  is  the 
ability  to  stop  the  imports  at  the  border,  at  the  international  mail 
facilities; in particular, the ability to stop them, provided that there 
is  a  implicit  message  being  conveyed  through  legalization  of  com-
mercial  imports  about  the  safety  of  foreign  products  themselves. 
And  the  question  is,  even  if  one  had  a  regulatory  system  that  al-
lowed  for  FDA  review  of  the  foreign  equivalents  to  ensure  that 
those  were  safe  and  effective,  and  we  were  given  adequate  re-
sources to ensure that, and then, of course, we’d have to see what-
ever resources—whether these were, in fact, adequate—but, even if 
we  had  that,  there’s  a  question  of,  how  do  you  actually  stop  the 
problem that Senator Vitter has just alluded to at the border? 

Senator  SNOWE.  Well,  I  don’t  think  there’s  anything  magical 
about  it.  It’s  really  having  the  will  to  do  it.  I’m  sensing  you’re  ei-
ther  unable  or  unwilling.  If  we  gave  you  the  resources  and  gave 
you  the  statutory  authority—and  that’s  what  we  have  outlined  in 
this  legislation,  you  know,  that  we  import  from  manufacturers  in 
more  than  40  countries,  where  you  may,  on  average,  inspect  a 
plant once every 7 years? In our legislation, we require inspections 
randomly,  but  not  less  than  12  times  a  year—12  times  a  year  for 
wholesalers  which  import,  as  well  as  for  those  exporting  phar-
macies which would directly serve consumers. So, you know, I just 
don’t understand why we’re hearing here today, I think, you know, 
bureaucratic  intransigence  about  coming  up  with  a  way  in  which 
to  allow  it  to  happen.  And,  while  you’re  talking  about  American 
consumers  misled  by  buying  drugs  from  ‘‘bait  and  switch’’  and  Ca-
nadian websites. Well, FDA could list which ones are legitimate for 
consumers.  I  mean,  why  isn’t  there  the  can-do  spirit?  Instead  it’s 
can’t-do,  and  we’re  seeing  everything  done  to  deny  consumers  ac-
cess  to  affordable  medications.  And  we  are  talking  about  brand 
name  drugs.  You  were  referring  to  generics  earlier.  What  we’re 
talking  about  is  brand  names,  frankly,  because  consumers  don’t 
have  access  to  affordable  brand  name  medications.  So,  that’s  what 
our legislation addresses. 

Can  you  tell  me,  in  the  incidence  of  counterfeiting,  what  do  you 
have  for  statistics  here  in  the  United  States?  Do  you  have  a  rate 
of counterfeiting? Because there’s obviously a serious problem with-
in  our  borders.  Do  we  have  a  rate  of  incidence  regarding  counter-
feiting? 

Dr. LUTTER. Senator, if I could just go back to one—— 
Senator SNOWE. Yes. 
Dr. LUTTER.—comment you made a moment—— 
Senator SNOWE. Yes. 
Dr.  LUTTER.—ago,  about  why  we  don’t  list  legitimate  foreign 
websites,  and  that’s  really  that  we  have  no  ability  to  know  which 
ones  are  legitimate,  because  they  can  take  down  their  websites, 
they can change the names, we don’t have authority to inspect for-
eign pharmacies to see what they’re doing. So, as much as—— 

Senator SNOWE. Well, we would give you that, under our legisla-

Dr.  LUTTER.  We’d  be  happy  to  review  that  legislation  in  detail 

tion. See, that’s the—— 

and get back to you on that. 
Senator SNOWE. So—OK. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

29 

Senator  SNOWE.  Well,  it  is  amazing  that  you  weren’t,  because 
this  has  been  an  outstanding  issue,  frankly,  for  a  decade  here.  I 
mean,  this  is  not  a  new  issue.  I  think  Senator  Dorgan  introduced 
that bill, back in 1999—and in 2000 we saw the MEDS Act passed. 
Now we have, you know, run the gamut on establishing the stand-
ards and getting advice from all, you know, corners on this debate, 
and perspectives, and getting the very best advice how to go about 
certifying it. 

So,  on  the  rate  of  incidence  of  counterfeiting  within  our  borders, 

do you have any idea what the magnitude is? 

Dr.  LUTTER.  We  had  a  public  meeting  as  part  of  a  counterfeit 
drug  task  force  in  February  of  last  year.  We  were  very  concerned 
about  developing  an  estimate.  We  asked  that  of  all  the  attendees 
in the public meeting, and we got no reliable estimates of the prev-
alence  of  counterfeit  drugs  in  the  United  States.  That’s  essentially 
because it’s extremely difficult even for a trained pharmacist to dis-
tinguish  between  an  authentic  and  a  counterfeit  product.  We  have 
opened,  last  year,  54  new  criminal  investigations  into  counter-
feiting  in  the  United  States.  That’s  a  significant  increase  in  the 
rate of newly opened counterfeit cases relative to about 6 years ago, 
around 2000. We’d had several years in a row where we were open-
ing  less  than  ten  cases  annually.  So,  in  that  sense,  what  we  per-
ceive  is  that  there’s  increased  sophistication,  increased  networks 
establishing counterfeit drugs in the United States, but we have no 
estimates  on  the  prevalence.  We  believe  that  it’s  very  low.  We  be-
lieve  that  the  overwhelming  share  of  all—of  finished  pharma-
ceutical  products  sold  in  the  United  States  are  safe  and  effective, 
genuine FDA-approved articles. 

Senator  SNOWE.  Well,  we  wrote  a  letter  to  the  Commissioner  of 
FDA, back in October, asking for details upon which blanket warn-
ings  are  issued  regarding  counterfeit  drugs.  Do  you  have  any  spe-
cific  data  on  seizures  of  prescription  drugs  at  the  border?  Do  you 
have any data so that we know specifically what the basis was for 
claims of counterfeiting? 

Dr.  LUTTER.  Well,  I  think  it  depends  a  little  bit  on  the  nature 
of  the  seizure.  Some  of  them  are  ongoing  criminal  investigation 
cases, so I’m not sure that’s something that we wish to talk about. 
In  other  instances,  we  have  conducted  blitzes  of  intercepting  all 
products,  and  partly  to  motivate  the  public  health  messages,  that 
we  think  are  so  important  to  communicate  to  the  American  public 
the risks of imported drugs. And, in those instances, we undertake 
some analysis of the nature of the products, yes. 

Senator  SNOWE.  Well,  the—first  of  all,  I  think  that  would  obvi-
ously  be  helpful  to  everybody  to  know  exactly  what  was  the  basis 
for  the  seizure,  what  was  the  information  and  data  to  support  it, 
what  was  it  all  about,  because  it  would  be  helpful  to  everybody  to 
know  exactly,  you  know,  what  issues  were  involved,  useful  to  all 
of  us  in  this  process.  But  I  guess  the  point  here  is  the  need  to  be 
setting  up  a  system.  And,  you  know,  I  sense  that  if  you  have  the 
resources, and the statutory authority, it could be done. I mean, we 
do oversight in over 40 countries, in terms of manufacturing medi-
cations that come in use here in the United States. 

So, what’s the issue, really? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

30 

Dr.  LUTTER.  The  letter  accompanying  the  December  2004  HHS 
Task  Force  Report  on  Importation  was  signed  by  Secretaries 
Thompson  and  Evans  of  Commerce,  and  it  outlined  conditions 
under  which  commercialized  drug  importation,  could  in  principle, 
would  have  to  be  satisfied  in  order  for  it  to  be  done  safely.  And 
those  are  available  there.  I  think  you’re  familiar  with  several  of 
them. It’s included that it should be limited to Canada, and it said 
that  it  should  be  limited  only  to  a  set  of  drugs  that  was  relatively 
high  volume  and  where  there  was  reason  for  there  to  believe  that 
there  would  be  significant  savings.  And  it  also  limited  it  to  prod-
ucts where there are no special handling concerns, such as biologics 
or  injectables,  which  are  relatively  easy  to  counterfeit,  that  these 
are issues that were outlined there, and that we share as being im-
portant to address in any potential legislation. 

Senator  SNOWE.  Yet,  on  the  other  hand,  you  know,  we  can  talk 
about the European Union being engaged in parallel trading for 30 
years  without  consequence,  without  incidence.  There  has  been  a 
truly  remarkable  track  record.  There’s  no  reason  why  we  can’t  im-
port, based on the safety standards that have been included in this 
legislation  and  the  resources  which  the  bill  provides  to  do  it,  and 
the  requirement  for  numerous  inspections  on  the  part  of  the  FDA. 
So, I think that, when you consider all of that, it’s a very different 
system.  We  just  don’t  employ  a  simple  certification,  we  set  which 
standards have to be in place, and the resources in which to do it. 
And I think that’s the critical difference from other approaches. 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Senator DORGAN. Thank you. 
Dr.  Lutter,  because  of  the  confusion  here,  what  I’d  like  to  do  is 
send you a series of questions about the legislation that I have de-
scribed,  and  ask  for  the  FDA’s  response  to  those  questions,  giving 
us your evaluation of the safety provisions in the legislation. So, we 
will  do  that—with  your  willingness  to  respond  to  them,  we’ll  do 
that within the next week, get those questions to you. 

Dr. LUTTER. Thank you. 
Senator DORGAN. All right. Thank you for being here, Dr. Lutter. 

Thank you for your testimony. 

The second panel today that we will hear from will be Billy Tau-
zin, CEO of PhRMA. Bill Tauzin is a former colleague of ours who 
served  in  the  U.S.  House  for  many  years.  John  Vernon  is  a  Pro-
fessor  of  Finance  at  the  University  of  Connecticut.  He  has  a  Ph.D. 
from  the  City  University  of  London,  and  a  Ph.D.  in  Health  Policy 
and Management from the Wharton School of Business, University 
of  Pennsylvania.  Stephen  Schondelmeyer  is  Professor  and  Head  of 
the  Department  of  Pharmaceutical  Care  &  Health  Systems,  Uni-
versity  of  Minnesota.  William  Schultz  is  a  Partner  at  Zuckerman 
Spaeder,  LLP,  previously  was  Deputy  Commissioner  for  Policy  at 
the  Food  and  Drug  Administration.  And,  finally,  Nelda  Barnett,  a 
Member of the Board of Directors of the AARP. 

We thank the five of you for being with us today. And I—we will 

begin with our former colleague, former Congressman Tauzin. 

Mr. TAUZIN. Mr. Chairman, thank you very much. 
Senator DORGAN.—if you will pull that microphone closer to you, 

we’d appreciate it—you may proceed. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

31 

STATEMENT  OF  HON.  W.J.  BILLY  TAUZIN,  PRESIDENT  AND 
CEO,  PHARMACEUTICAL  RESEARCH  AND  MANUFACTURERS 
OF AMERICA (PHRMA) 
Mr. TAUZIN. Thank you very much, Senator. 
I  haven’t  had  the  chance  to  be  on  this  side  of  the  podium  for  a 
while,  so  let  me  first  thank  you,  Senator,  for  allowing  me  to  come 
and  visit  with  you  today  on  this  important  topic.  You’ve  pinned  it 
correctly, it is a matter of life and death. And I want to talk a little 
bit about that today. 

I’ve  given  you  an  extensive  written  testimony.  I  won’t  read  that, 
but I’ll call your attention to parts of it, beginning on page 2, which 
tell the story about where we’ve been, so that we can get some idea 
about where you and others might want to go, or not go, in the fu-
ture, when it comes to drug safety in our country. 

I was in the Congress in 1987 when Chairman John Dingell exe-
cuted  a  series  of  hearings  on  this  important  topic.  I  was  then  a 
Democrat,  working  with  Chairman  Dingell  on  the  issue,  and  we 
had  some  extraordinary  hearings.  It  was  prompted  by  a  discovery, 
in  1984,  that  nearly  2  million  counterfeits  of  G.D.  Searle’s  Ovulen 
21 birth control pills had been brought into our country as counter-
feits.  And  there  was  a  great  deal  of  information  developed  in  that 
series of hearings. I call it to your attention. You ought to go back 
and read it. It basically describes why the 1988 PDMA was passed, 
why  Congress,  in  1988,  decided  to  prevent  the  reimportation  of 
drugs  that  have  left  the  control  of  the  manufacturer  and  had  gone 
out  into  the  marketplace  in  other  countries,  and  might  be  part  of 
the  process  of  reimporting  those  products  into  our  own  country 
after they’ve left that chain of control. 

The  Commerce  Committee,  in  that  series  of  hearings,  concluded, 
and  I  quote,  that  the—‘‘permitting  reimportation  of  U.S.-origin 
goods  prevents  effective  control  of  even  routine  knowledge  of  the 
true  sources  of  merchandise  in  a  significant  number  of  cases.’’  It 
went on to say that, ‘‘the reimportation resulted in pharmaceuticals 
which  had  been  mislabeled,  misbranded,  improperly  stored,  or 
shipped.’’ As you know, it’s not just whether the drug contains the 
right  content,  it’s  how  well  it’s  been  handled,  whether  it’s  been  re-
frigerated properly, handled properly, stored properly, labeled prop-
erly.  In  fact,  we  concluded  that  reimportation  resulted  in  those 
pharmaceuticals entering the country that had exceeded their expi-
ration dates or were flat-out, bald counterfeits, and that they were 
being  injected  into  the  national  distribution  system  for  ultimate 
sale to American consumers. 

The  Committee  further  concluded—and  this  is  very,  very  impor-
tant,  Mr.  Chairman—that  the  very  existence  of  the  market  for  re-
imported  goods  here  provides  the  perfect  cover  for  foreign  counter-
feits, and, as a result of those findings, Chairman Dingell, the Con-
gress,  in  the  House  and  the  Senate,  concurred  in  the  adoption,  in 
1988, of the prohibition against reimportation. There was an excep-
tion. The exception was, as you described it today, for the manufac-
turer, the original manufacturer in a foreign country, to be able to 
ship  into  this  country.  However,  in  those  cases,  the  manufacturer 
controlled  the  chain  of  custody,  from  the  plant  inspected  by  the 
FDA all the way through the market into the United States. In ef-
fect, we, in 1988, said, ‘‘Look, we’re not going to let drugs that have 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

32 

gone  out  of  the  chain  of  custody  come  back  into  this  country,  be-
cause  we  can’t  trust  it.  Counterfeiting  is  too  serious,’’  in  1988,  ‘‘for 
us  to  trust  that  system.’’  We  said,  ‘‘We’re  going  to  put  it  on  the 
backs  of  the  pharmaceutical  industry  to  be  responsible,  from  the 
manufacturing plant overseas to the consumer in America, for that 
chain  of  custody,  and  the  FDA  will  manage  that  inspection  and 
that  safety  system.’’  We,  in  effect,  created  a  closed  regulatory  sys-
tem  to  protect  American  consumers  from  the  dangers  of  these  im-
ports. 

Now, that was 1988. And the simple question I ask you today is, 
have things gotten better or worse? Madam Snowe, you asked that 
question, just a minute ago, ‘‘What’s the status? Is it getting better 
or worse?’’ Mr. Vitter, you asked it, ‘‘What’s the status in this coun-
try?’’ I call your attention to two articles, one of which I’ll send over 
to the desk, which is an article that was included in Parade maga-
zine  in  The  Washington  Post  on  March  5.  What  I  want  to  quote 
from, a New York Times article that came out on February 20 enti-
tled  ‘‘In  the  World  of  Life-Saving  Drugs,  a  Growing  Epidemic  of 
Deadly  Fakes.’’  For  a  long  time  in  this  debate  in  Congress,  the 
question has been, show us the bodies, where are the bodies? Well, 
the  bodies  are  piling  up  all  over  the  world.  Read  the  article.  Ac-
cording to this article, estimates of deaths now caused by fakes run 
from  the  tens  of  thousands  a  year  to  200,000  or  more.  The  World 
Health Organization has estimated that a full fifth of the 1 million 
annual  deaths  from  malaria  would  be  prevented  if  the  medicines, 
in  fact,  were  genuine  and  were  taken  properly.  China  is  obviously 
the  biggest  problem,  the  source  of  most  of  these  counterfeits.  The 
article goes on to say that the counterfeiters in China are not sell-
ing  them  to  the  Chinese.  They’re  smarter  than  that.  They  under-
stand  they’d  get  hauled  off  to  jail  if  they  start  killing  Chinese  citi-
zens  with  fake  drugs.  The  article  goes  on  to  say  they  don’t  want 
anybody beating down the door in the middle of the night, dragging 
them  away,  so  they  make  their  drugs  for  sale  outside  the  country. 
It  goes  on  to  say  that  not  only  do  the  pills  look  correct,  as  did  the 
cardboard boxes and the blister packaging and the foil backing, but 
they found 12 versions of tiny holograms added to prevent forgery, 
even  a  secret  X–52  logo  visible  only  under  ultraviolet  light  was 
present. 

What  they’re  basically  saying  is,  they  can’t  tell  the  counterfeits 
from  the  real  products  anymore.  When  they’re  out  of  that  chain  of 
custody, when you permit them into this system, you’re literally al-
lowing an open door for those types of products to come into Amer-
ica. 

The most frightening aspect of what’s going on in the world, Mr. 
Chairman, is that these counterfeiters are beginning to make drugs 
that appear to work. For example, they’ll contain drugs that appar-
ently fool the patients into thinking the pills are working. The Pa-
rade article tells the real story. It’s not necessarily the toxic chemi-
cals that are found in a counterfeit drug that are killing people. It’s 
the fact that they’re getting drugs that don’t contain the active in-
gredients  that  you’re  supposed  to  have  to  get  people  healthy  and 
to battle disease. 

Now,  it’s  one  thing  for  your  constituents  to  walk  across  the  bor-
der  and  to  buy  a  drug  if  they  really  want  to  take  that  chance  in 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

33 

Canada. By the way, I’ve got a letter from Canada saying they will 
not,  and  cannot,  be  responsible  for  the  safety  of  drugs  imported 
from  Canada  into  the  United  States.  That’s  our  job,  over  here,  to 
make  sure  it’s  safe.  And  it’s  one  thing  for  a  citizen  to  voluntarily 
walk  across  the  border  and  buy  those  drugs;  it’s  another  thing  for 
me  to  bring  my  child  to  a  hospital,  in  America,  where  those  coun-
terfeit drugs have been brought in and mixed in with the safe sys-
tem we have, and for me not to even know that my child is getting 
a drug that is not only doesn’t contain the ingredients necessary to 
save  his  life,  but,  in  some  cases,  may  be  diluted,  polluted—even 
contain  pond  water,  in  some  cases,  we’ve  discovered.  So,  it  is  a 
matter of life or death, Mr. Chairman. 

Now, as I said, some things have changed since 1988. You know, 
I’m no longer a Democrat. I became a Republican. I’m no longer in 
Congress. I left. Some people say both of those are good things. But 
the bad thing is, this is getting worse, not better. And opening the 
door to it, to American consumers, who unknowingly will be taking 
these  fake  products  in  increasing  numbers,  is  the  scariest  thing  I 
can think of right now. 

Look  at  the  Parade  article.  The  Parade  article  talks  about 
600,000 Lipitor tablets that were discovered, counterfeited, received 
by  patients  like  you,  taking  them,  thinking  they’re  taking  the  car-
diovascular medicine they need, and taking nothing but cornstarch. 
Fake  products.  Look  at  it,  and  you’ll  see  some  numbers,  Senator 
Snowe  and  Mr.  Vitter,  40  million  estimated  by  the  National  Asso-
ciation of Boards of Pharmacy in this country—40 million fake pre-
scriptions  already  in  America,  getting  worse.  And  we’re  only  a  1 
percent  problem,  according  to  them.  In  the  world,  it’s  becoming  a 
20-percent  problem.  In  the  parallel  trade  in  Europe,  it’s  growing 
rapidly. Three countries in the former Soviet Union are now in the 
EU,  and  the  counterfeits  in  those  countries  are  enormous.  In 
Borat’s  Kazakhstan,  for  example,  our  researchers  tell  us,  50  per-
cent  of  the  drugs  there  are  likely  counterfeit.  The  same  is  true  in 
Mexico today. 

Open those borders, given our closed regulatory system, and open 
it up to those drugs, that’s what the FDA’s trying to tell you would 
be  a  serious  mistake  for  consumers  in  America.  That’s  the  life-or- 
death decisions we have to make here. 

Let me conclude. When I officially retired from Congress in 2005, 
I was already gone. I had left in 2004, when I was diagnosed with 
cancer, as you know. 

I  didn’t  leave  to  take  a  job  with  the  pharmaceutical  companies 
or the Motion Picture Association. I left to go to Johns Hopkins and 
M.D.  Anderson  to  battle  for  my  life.  And  there  were  some  tough 
moments. I took the last sacrament and said goodbye to my family 
during  that  process.  I  got  a  very  generous  finding  at  M.D.  Ander-
son,  that  I  had  a  five  percent  chance  to  live.  Thanks  a  lot.  But 
somehow I survived. 

And in that worst year of cancer, of surgery and treatments and 
chemo and radiation, they gave me 3 weeks off. I took one of those 
weeks  to  come  to  work  here  in  Congress.  That’s  the  one  week  I 
spent  working  with  you  in  2004,  when  I  left  for  cancer  treatment. 
And  I  gave  one  speech  to  Congress.  I’ve  got  a  copy  with  me  today. 
That  speech  I  gave  was  to  the  Appropriations  Committee  on  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

34 

House  side.  It  was  a  Cassandra  warning.  I  brought  it  to  you.  I’ll 
give  it  to  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  It  was  a  warning.  It  was  a  plea  to 
Congress  to  please  end  the  filibuster  in  the  Senate  and  pass  the 
energy  bill  that  contained  $20  billion  for  my  City  of  New  Orleans, 
Mr.  Vitter,  to  save  us  from  what  happened.  I  talked  about  going 
down  and  seeing  the  simulation  of  the  storm  that  was  coming.  I 
talked  about  the  fact  that  New  Orleans  was  about  to  drown.  And 
I  begged  Congress,  in  that  one  appearance  in  2004,  not  to  have  to 
come back one day with a red-faced commission and admit that we 
could  have  stopped  it  and  we  didn’t  do  anything  about  it  before  it 
happened. I concluded with these words, ‘‘Please help me place into 
law  some  system  that  the  Corps  and  the  great  people  of  my  state 
can collectively work to begin doing something about the 35 square 
miles  of  wetlands.  That’s  the  only—that  the  critical  land  mass— 
that’s the barrier between us—life and death. That’s the barrier be-
tween  us  and  the  storms  that  churn  in  the  Gulf  that  are  about  to 
destroy not only the cities and the communities, but the lives of the 
people  I  represent.’’  That  was  the  one  speech  I  gave  in  2004.  No-
body listened. 

I’m  going  to  ask  you,  please,  Mr.  Chairman,  as  one  who’s  just 
gone  through  it,  who’s  had  to  count  on  a  medicine  to  save  my  life, 
whatever  you  do  on  this  issue,  take  seriously  the  admonitions  of 
Donna  Shalala,  take  seriously  the  admonitions  of  Tommy  Thomp-
son, take seriously the admonitions of the current Secretary, when 
they  tell  you  that  they  cannot—they  cannot,  today,  stop  this  flood 
of  imports  that  is  only  a  one  percent  problem  in  America  today, 
that’s a 20 percent problem in the world. 

Senator DORGAN. Mr. Tauzin—— 
Mr. TAUZIN. It is a matter of life or death. Don’t accept responsi-
bility for the consequences of opening that door wide open to all of 
these fakes. 

Senator DORGAN. Mr. Tauzin—— 
Mr. TAUZIN. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Senator DORGAN.—thank you very much. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Tauzin follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. W.J. BILLY TAUZIN, PRESIDENT AND CEO, 
PHARMACEUTICAL RESEARCH AND MANUFACTURERS OF AMERICA (PHRMA) 

Mr. Chairman, Senator DeMint, and Members of the Subcommittee: 
Thank  you  for  the  invitation  to  participate  in  today’s  hearing  on  pharmaceutical 
importation.  My  name  is  Billy  Tauzin  and  I  am  the  President  and  Chief  Executive 
Officer  of  the  Pharmaceutical  Research  and  Manufacturers  of  America  (PhRMA). 
PhRMA  is  the  Nation’s  leading  trade  association  representing  research-based  phar-
maceutical and biotechnology companies that are devoted to inventing new, life-sav-
ing medicines that help achieve longer, healthier, more productive lives. 

Much  has  changed  since  the  debate  over  legalizing  importation  began  nearly  a 
decade ago. Unlike the situation in 2000, millions of seniors who lacked prescription 
drug  insurance  and  were  paying  for  their  medicines  out-of-pocket  now  have  com-
prehensive  prescription  drug  insurance  through  Medicare  Part  D.  Today,  we  know 
much  more  than  we  did  in  2000  about  the  growing  problem  of  counterfeiting  and 
the  seriousness  of  the  problem.  Moreover,  we  have  evidence  that  foreign  govern-
ments  are  not  willing  or  interested  in  taking  responsibility  for  assuring  the  safety 
of drugs imported into the U.S. 

My  testimony  today  begins  by  reviewing  current  law  governing  drug  safety  and 
importation.  This  portion  of  my  testimony  also  explains  that  importation  would  ef-
fectively  circumvent  the  other  drug  safety  provisions  carefully  constructed  over  the 
course  of  nearly  a  century.  My  testimony  then  focuses  on  five  main  points:  (1)  Im-
portation  opens  our  borders  to  drugs  from  anywhere  in  the  world  and  there  is  no 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

35 

plausible way of limiting importation to Canada or Western Europe; (2) Safety test-
ing,  inspections,  chain  of  custody  requirements  and  other  attempts  to  ‘‘guarantee’’ 
safety provide no assurances that imported drugs will be safe; (3) Projections of po-
tential  cost-savings  from  importation  are  very  small  and  the  largest  beneficiaries 
are arbitrageurs; (4) Importation is not free trade, it is price controls which lead to 
delays  and  denials  in  patients’  access  to  medicines;  and  (5)  There  are  better,  safer 
alternatives  for  patients  to  access  needed  medicines,  including  the  Partnership  for 
Prescription Assistance (PPA) and Medicare Part D for seniors and the disabled. 
Overview of Current Law Related to Importation 

Over the years, a number of bills have been proposed that would legalize the com-
mercial  and  personal  importation  of  unapproved  prescription  drugs  from  foreign 
countries.  It  is  my  belief  that  opening  our  closed  system  in  this  way  would  cir-
cumvent  a  system  that  was  carefully  constructed  and  developed  over  the  years  to 
protect the health and safety of the American public. 

The regulatory system that governs development, approval, and marketing of new 
drugs  in  the  United  States  is  the  most  complex  and  comprehensive  in  the  world. 
To  ensure  that  Americans  have  the  safest  drug  supply  in  the  world,  it  has  become 
increasingly  comprehensive  and  more  robust  over  time.  As  far  back  as  1938,  the 
Federal  Food,  Drug,  and  Cosmetic  Act  (FDCA) 1—which  remains  in  place  today— 
prohibited the marketing of any drug not shown to be ‘‘safe for use under the condi-
tions prescribed, recommended, or suggested’’ in its labeling.2 In 1962, the Food and 
Drug Administration (FDA) obtained explicit authority to demand proof that a drug 
is  effective  and  to  prescribe  the  tests  that  a  manufacturer  must  perform  before  its 
product can be approved for marketing.3 Since that time, several amendments have 
expanded, strengthened, and refined the regulatory scheme.4 These include the Pre-
scription Drug Marketing Act of 1987 (PDMA), under which Congress, following an 
investigation  of  incidents  of  counterfeit  drugs  reaching  American  consumers,  closed 
the U.S. prescription drug supply to products that have circulated overseas, beyond 
the jurisdiction of FDA and outside the control of the manufacturer. 

As  a  consequence  of  this  comprehensive  framework,  FDA  currently  regulates  vir-
tually  every  stage  in  the  life  of  a  prescription  medicine  sold  in  the  U.S.,  from  pre- 
clinical testing in animals and human clinical trials before the medicine can be mar-
keted, to manufacturing, labeling, packaging, and advertising when the drug is mar-
keted, to monitoring actual experience with the drug after its sale to consumers. In 
particular,  the  FDCA  prohibits  the  introduction  into  interstate  commerce  of  any 
‘‘new  drug’’  (which  covers  virtually  every  prescription  drug)  that  is  not  the  subject 
of a FDA-approved new drug application (NDA) or abbreviated new drug application 
(ANDA).5 

Importation  of  a  prescription  medicine  constitutes  introduction  of  that  medicine 
into  interstate  commerce  and  thus  is  subject  to  the  FDA  approval  requirement.6 If 
a  company  that  holds  an  approval  for  a  drug  manufactures  a  version  of  that  drug 
product in a plant that is not listed in the relevant NDA or ANDA or fails to manu-
facture  according  to  specifications  in  the  approved  application,  FDA  considers  that 
version an unapproved drug, and it cannot be imported or otherwise introduced into 
interstate  commerce.7 Foreign  versions  of  drugs  that  are  approved  in  the  United 
States  often  are  manufactured  by  companies  that  do  not  hold  an  approved  NDA  or 
ANDA. Even if the foreign version is made by a company with a U.S. approval, the 
foreign version often does not comply with the terms of the approved NDA or ANDA 
and  thus  is  unapproved.  That  is  because  the  U.S.  has  some  of  the  toughest  drug 
approval  requirements  in  the  world.  For  these  reasons,  the  importation  of  a  drug 
purchased  in  a  foreign  country  will  usually  violate  the  statutory  requirement  for 
FDA  approval—requirements  that  have  been  established  to  protect  consumers  and 
that no one would advocate repealing. Yet permitting importation of drugs not meet-
ing these standards would have the same effect as repealing current consumer pro-
tections,  since  these  unapproved  drugs  would  be  mixed  into  the  U.S.  drug  supply. 
There  are  occasions  where  some  drugs  that  are  available  overseas  are  manufac-
tured  in  the  United  States  and  then  exported.  But  in  those  instances,  the  FDCA 
prohibits the importation (or ‘‘reimportation’’) of these drugs, even if they are manu-
factured  in  full  compliance  with  the  approved  NDA.8 Congress  added  this  prohibi-
tion  on  reimportation  to  the  law  in  the  PDMA,  following  a  series  of  hearings  that 
documented  adulterated  and  counterfeit  drugs  entering  the  U.S.  In  1984,  for  in-
stance, nearly two million counterfeits of G.D. Searle’s Ovulen 21 birth control pills 
were  found  to  have  been  shipped  to  Miami  and  New  York  from  Panama.  Based  on 
a  robust  record  and  exhaustive  investigation,  the  U.S.  House  of  Representatives 
Committee  on  Energy  and  Commerce  concluded  that  permitting  reimportation  of 
U.S.-origin  goods  ‘‘prevents  effective  control  or  even  routine  knowledge  of  the  true 
sources  of  merchandise  in  a  significant  number  of  cases.’’ 9 The  Committee  further 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

36 

found that reimportation resulted in ‘‘pharmaceuticals which have been mislabeled, 
misbranded,  improperly  stored  or  shipped,  have  exceeded  their  expiration  dates,  or 
are bald counterfeits, are injected into the national distribution system for ultimate 
sale to consumers.’’ 10 

The  Committee  also  concluded  that  ‘‘the  very  existence  of  the  market  for  re-
imported  goods  provides  the  perfect  cover  for  foreign  counterfeits.’’ 11 As  a  result  of 
these  findings  and  the  conclusion  that  reimportation  posed  a  grave  risk  to  con-
sumers, Congress prohibited the reimportation of approved drugs that have left the 
United States.12 

There  is  an  exception  for  the  original  manufacturer,  who  is  an  integral  part  of 
this  closed  regulatory  system  and  subject  to  FDA  authority  and  oversight  at  all 
times.13 However,  in  such  instances,  the  manufacturer’s  own  importation  of  drugs 
that  have  never  been  outside  its  control  is  comparable  to  shipments  between  its 
manufacturing  plants  and  warehouses  within  the  United  States.  It  is  entirely  dif-
ferent  from  the  importation  of  drugs  that  have  been  placed  into  the  wholesale  and 
retail  distribution  systems  of  foreign  countries,  where  they  are  no  longer  subject  to 
FDA jurisdiction. 

Notably,  FDA  has  a  very  limited  exception  to  the  statutory  prohibition  on  impor-
tation of unapproved drugs which it developed in the early 1990s when it announced 
a  policy  of  ‘‘enforcement  discretion’’  with  respect  to  personal  importation  of  certain 
unapproved  drugs.14 Under  this  policy,  FDA  personnel  may  permit  the  importation 
of  a  drug  if:  (1)  it  is  clearly  intended  for  personal  use;  (2)  the  intended  use  of  the 
drug  is  clearly  identified;  (3)  the  drug  is  intended  for  treatment  of  a  serious  condi-
tion for which satisfactory treatment is not available in the U.S.; (4) the drug is not 
known  to  present  a  significant  health  risk;  and  (5)  the  drug  is  not  approved  in  the 
U.S.  FDA  officials  will  presume  commercial  use,  rather  than  personal  use,  if  the 
supply exceeds what one person might take in three months. FDA guidelines direct 
agency  personnel  to  look  for  either:  (a)  the  inclusion  of  the  name  and  address  of  a 
doctor licensed in the U.S. and responsible for the patient’s treatment with the prod-
uct,  or  (b)  evidence  that  the  product  is  intended  for  the  continuation  of  treatment 
begun  in  the  foreign  country.  However,  the  personal  use  policy  does  not  apply  to 
the  importation  of  unapproved  foreign  versions  of  drugs  available  in  the  United 
States, or to reimportation of drugs in violation of the PDMA. Rather, it applies only 
to  the  personal  importation  of  drugs  for  which  there  is  no  approved  U.S.  source. 
This kind of importation remains technically illegal. The policy represents a limited 
exercise  of  enforcement  discretion  in  the  interest  of  individual  patient  treatment.15 
In  2000,  Congress  authorized  an  additional  exception  to  the  prohibition  on  re-
importation.  The  Medicine  Equity  and  Drug  Safety  Act  (MEDS  Act)  added  a  new 
section  804  to  the  FDCA  under  which  pharmacists  and  wholesalers  would  be  per-
mitted  to  import  drugs  from  a  list  of  designated  countries,  including  Canada  and 
the  countries  of  the  European  Union.16 During  the  debate  on  the  MEDS  Act,  how-
ever,  concerns  were  voiced  that  section  804  would  be  ineffective  (at  reducing  con-
sumer  prices)  and  unsafe  (by  allowing  the  influx  of  counterfeit  and  adulterated 
products). Congress responded to these concerns in part by delaying implementation 
until  the  Secretary  of  HHS  could  ‘‘demonstrate’’  that  the  law  would  pose  no  addi-
tional  risk  to  public  health  and  safety  and  that  it  would  result  in  a  significant  re-
duction  in  the  cost  of  covered  products.  Secretary  Donna  Shalala  concluded  on  De-
cember  26,  2000,  that  it  was  ‘‘impossible  . . .  to  demonstrate  that  [importation]  is 
safe and cost effective.’’ 17 Similarly, Secretary Tommy Thompson, citing an analysis 
by  FDA  on  the  safety  issues  and  an  analysis  by  his  planning  office  on  the  cost 
issues, decided not to ‘‘sacrifice public safety for uncertain and speculative cost sav-
ings.’’ 18 

As  part  of  the  Medicare  Prescription  Drug,  Improvement  and  Modernization  Act 
of  2003,  Congress  replaced  the  MEDS  Act  with  a  new  section  804.  Reimportation 
language  was  included  in  the  drug  benefit  legislation—despite  enactment  of  a  pre-
scription  drug  benefit  for  Medicare  beneficiaries—primarily  because  proponents  of 
importation were working separately from the Medicare conferees to address access 
issues. Notably, however, the drug benefit that became available to seniors in 2006 
provides  much  safer  and  effective  ways  for  Americans  to  access  affordable  medi-
cines.  Company  and  state  patient  assistant  programs  that  can  help  the  under  and 
un-insured  also  exist.  These  options  are  all  safer  than  the  importation  of  foreign 
products. 

This reimportation language in section 804 of the FDCA differs markedly from ex-
isting  legislative  proposals.  The  legislation  would  only  permit  reimportation  from 
Canada  and  it  would  require  reimported  drugs  to  comply  with  sections  501,  502, 
and  505  of  the  FDCA.  In  other  words  the  drugs  could  not  be  adulterated,  mis-
branded, or unapproved new drugs.19 Most importantly, the provisions require that 
the  Secretary  determine  importation  would  be  safe  and  create  significant  cost  sav-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

37 

ings before it can proceed. To date, no Secretary has been able to make such a deter-
mination. 
Importation  of  Medicines  into  the  U.S.  That  Have  Been  Outside  the 

Jurisdiction of the FDA Is Inherently Unsafe 

Importation  of  medicines  into  the  U.S.  that  have  been  outside  the  jurisdiction  of 
FDA is inherently unsafe. There is no assurance that an imported drug meets FDA’s 
stringent  requirements  for  quality,  purity,  safety,  effectiveness  or  proper  labeling. 
As  FDA  has  documented,  many  of  these  imported  drugs  are  unapproved,  contami-
nated, counterfeit, or have been stored, handled or shipped under substandard con-
ditions. 

The current system has been effective in the U.S. for protecting public health, but 
it  faces  increased  threats  with  the  proliferation  of  Internet  pharmacies  outside  the 
U.S.  and  outside  the  jurisdiction  of  FDA.  The  safety  concerns  that  exist  today  are 
many.  A  recent  example  illustrates  the  potential  dangers  and  reinforces  concerns 
over proposals to legalize importation. According to FDA, recently patients ordering 
drugs online for depression and insomnia instead received schizophrenia medication 
that caused them to seek emergency medical treatment for breathing problems. Side 
effects  ranged  from  muscle  spasms  to  difficulty  breathing.  According  to  FDA,  while 
none of the cases resulted in death, in at least three cases, patients required a trip 
to  the  emergency  room.20 Legislation  that  would  legalize  the  importation  of  medi-
cines would place significant, additional burdens on our current system and will in-
crease safety concerns that exist today. 

Proponents  of  importation  believe  that  with  certain  modifications—such  as  end 
product testing, chain of custody provisions, requiring the use of anti-counterfeiting 
technology, or limiting importation to Canada—importation can be done safely. The 
fact  is  no  modification  can  guarantee  safety  that  equals  the  safety  of  the  current 
closed system that Congress established in 1987 precisely to protect consumers from 
the  dangers  of  importation—dangers  that  have  not  abated  in  the  intervening  20 
years. 
Limitations on Safety Testing 

The  safety,  quality,  and  authenticity  of  pharmaceutical  products  that  are  im-
ported  into  the  United  States  cannot  be  assured  by  inspection  and/or  testing  pro-
grams to meet the levels of safety, quality and authenticity achieved in today’s sys-
tem.  Although  terminal  testing  (i.e.,  testing  a  product  after  it  has  been  manufac-
tured)  may  provide  some  useful  information  about  product  quality  and  safety,  such 
testing is inherently limited and can never, by itself, guarantee the safety and qual-
ity of products as complex as pharmaceuticals. As the FDA and other experts recog-
nize,  the  only  way  to  assure  the  safety  and  quality  of  pharmaceutical  products  is 
to  strictly  control  the  conditions  under  which  they  are  manufactured  and  distrib-
uted. 
cGMP Requirements: Safety and Quality Cannot Be ‘‘Tested Into’’ A Product 

FDA’s  current  Good  Manufacturing  Practice  (cGMP)  regulations  are  based  upon 
the  fundamental  quality  assurance  principle  that  quality,  safety,  and  effectiveness 
‘‘cannot  be  inspected  or  tested  into  a  finished  product’’  but  instead  ‘‘must  be  de-
signed and built into a product.’’ 21 FDA has reiterated this bedrock principle on nu-
merous  occasions,  most  recently  in  connection  with  its  2003  initiative  to  modernize 
the cGMP regulations.22 

Consequently, those regulations impose strict controls on all aspects of the manu-
facturing  process,  including  (1)  the  qualifications  and  responsibilities  of  employees 
and consultants; (2) the design and maintenance of manufacturing facilities; (3) the 
design, construction, cleaning and maintenance of manufacturing equipment; (4) the 
receipt, storage, testing and acceptance of pharmaceutical raw materials and compo-
nents,  including  containers  and  closure  systems;  (5)  the  manufacturing  process 
itself,  including  reprocessing  procedures;  (6)  the  packaging  and  labeling  of  finished 
drug products; (7) the storage and distribution of final products; (8) required labora-
tory testing procedures; and (9) recordkeeping requirements.23 Failure to satisfy any 
of  these  cGMP  requirements  renders  the  affected  drug  product  ‘‘adulterated’’  and 
thus  illegal  in  the  United  States—even  if  testing  fails  to  reveal  any  obvious  defi-
ciencies in the product.24 

The  cGMP  regulations  recognize  that  routine  end-product  testing  is  inherently 
limited  and  cannot  be  relied  upon  as  the  sole  basis  for  assuring  quality  and  safety 
for a number of reasons. First, many end-product tests have limited sensitivity and 
may  fail  to  detect  substances,  such  as  impurities  or  degradants  that  are  present  in 
a  drug  product  at  low  levels.25 If  these  substances  are  dangerous  at  low  levels  or 
have  an  adverse  effect  on  product  quality  (e.g.,  accelerate  degradation  of  active  in-
gredient), the end-stage testing will fail to reveal that the drug product may be un-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

38 

safe,  unstable  or  ineffective.  In  essence,  such  testing  would  yield  an  unacceptably 
high  rate  of  ‘‘false  negatives,’’  i.e.,  finding  no  quality  or  safety  problems  when  such 
problems actually exist. 

Second,  drug  products  often  are  extremely  complex,  and  end-product  testing  does 
not  reveal  all  variations  that  may  occur  in  the  product  that  may  impact  on  safety 
and  effectiveness.  Even  seemingly  minor  changes  in  manufacturing  process  or  stor-
age conditions may introduce variations in the product, such as new impurities, that 
cannot be predicted or easily tested. Oftentimes, these variations can have a signifi-
cant  impact  on  safety  and  effectiveness.  For  example,  testing  might  be  conducted 
to demonstrate that a drug product contains the proper strength of a specific active 
ingredient;  however,  such  testing  would  not  detect  other  variations  in  the  product 
caused by manufacturing changes, such as increased pill hardness or contamination 
with  cleaning  chemicals,  that  could  have  a  significant  impact  on  safety  and  effec-
tiveness.  While  dissolution  and  impurity  testing  might  be  added  to  the  battery  of 
tests  conducted  on  the  drug  product,  such  testing  still  would  not  detect  meaningful 
variations  in  the  drug  product,  such  as  new  or  different  impurities  or  changes  in 
the drug’s stability profile. Because of the complexity of drug products, end-product 
testing simply cannot measure all of the possible variations that could affect safety 
and effectiveness. 

Because  of  these  significant  limitations,  FDA  does  not  rely  upon  terminal  testing 
alone to assure the safety and quality of drug products. Instead, through application 
of  the  cGMP  regulations,  FDA  seeks  to  minimize  the  variability  in  the  manufac-
turing process itself. As FDA recognizes, safety and quality cannot be ‘‘inspected or 
tested  into’’  a  drug  product;  they  must  be  built  into  the  product  through  rigorous 
approval requirements and strict controls over the conditions under which drugs are 
manufactured and distributed. 
Limitations of Safety Testing of Imported Drug Products 

These  significant  limitations  on  the  use  of  end-product  testing  to  assure  safety 
and  quality  are  not  restricted  to  the  manufacturing  context  but  apply  with  even 
greater  force  to  the  importation  context  as  well.  Safety,  quality,  and  authenticity 
cannot  be  ‘‘inspected  or  tested  into’’  imported  drug  products  any  more  than  it  can 
be  inspected  or  tested  into  domestic  drug  products.  These  attributes  instead  must 
be  built  into  imported  drugs  by  strictly  controlling  the  distribution  system.  The 
greatest assurance that drug products are safe, effective, and authentic comes from 
maintaining a closed, closely-controlled distribution system. 
Testing for Counterfeits 

Counterfeit drug trafficking is one of the primary safety concerns associated with 
importation.  FDA  estimates  that  counterfeits  make  up  10  percent  of  the  global 
medicines market.26 The latest estimates by the World Health Organization (WHO), 
the  Organisation  for  Economic  Co-operation  and  Development  (OECD),  and  the 
Pharmaceutical  Security  Institute  (PSI)  show  that  ‘‘. . .  50  percent  of  illegal  Inter-
net  sales  are  counterfeit.’’  According  to  the  WHO,  ‘‘. . .  the  message  for  now  is:  do 
not take the risk of buying your medicines from unknown sources, such as the Inter-
net.  If  you  must  buy  from  the  Internet,  ensure  that  the  website  is  that  of  a  phar-
macy you know and trust.’’ 27 

A recent article in the Financial Times reinforces concerns with counterfeit medi-
cines.  A  report  by  the  International  Narcotics  Control  Board,  which  monitors  com-
pliance with U.N. drug conventions, cited ‘‘growing concerns’’ about the unregulated 
market for medicines that is exposing patients to ‘‘serious health risks’’. The report 
‘‘expresses  concern  about  the  rise  in  counterfeit  drugs  . . .’’  and  the  health  risks  of 
the  Internet  medicines  market.  Financial  Times  reports  that,  ‘‘The  findings  mark 
the latest escalation in international concern about the mixing of criminal, narcotic 
and prescription medicines, and heightened worries about counterfeit drugs.’’ 28 

According to a February 2005 Business Week report, ‘‘The global counterfeit busi-
ness is out of control, targeting everything from computer chips to life-saving medi-
cines.’’  The  story  reported  that,  ‘‘Chinese  police  last  year  conducted  raids  confis-
cating everything from counterfeit Buick windshields to phony Viagra. In Guam, the 
Secret  Service  uncovered  a  network  selling  bogus  North  Korean-made  pharma-
ceuticals, cigarettes and $100 bills.’’ The report also found that Pakistan and Russia 
are ‘‘huge producers of fake pharmaceuticals.’’ 29 

And, the problem is expected to grow quickly over the next several years. In fact, 
a study by the Center for Medicine in the Public Interest estimates that counterfeit 
drug  sales  will  reach  $75  billion  in  2010,  a  92  percent  increase  from  2005.30 Both 
the  FDA  and  industry  have  grappled  with  this  problem  for  years  and  have  devised 
many  strategies  for  combating  the  problem  both  domestically  and  internationally. 
Indeed,  FDA  issued  its  final  report  detailing  new  strategies  for  keeping  counterfeit 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

39 

drug products from entering the U.S. drug supply. Significantly, none of these strat-
egies  relies  upon  end-product  testing  as  the  sole,  or  even  a  significant,  weapon  in 
the  fight  against  counterfeits,  effectively  illustrating  why  such  reliance  on  testing 
can not achieve adequate levels of safety in the importation context. 

This  is  because  end-product  testing  simply  is  not  adequate  to  identify  counterfeit 
drugs or prevent them from entering the U.S. drug supply. While random sampling 
and  inspection  might  be  acceptable  in  the  manufacturing  context,  it  will  never  be 
sufficient to detect counterfeit drugs entering the U.S. from abroad. This is because 
‘‘counterfeits  can  easily  be  commingled  with  authentic  product,  either  by  the  case, 
by the bottle, or by the pill . . .’’ 31 Consequently, as FDA itself concludes, ‘‘[n]o ran-
dom sampling plan will be able to detect and protect against such criminal conduct 
since  the  threat  does  not  depend  upon  the  nature  of  the  reimported  product,  but 
upon the integrity of those handling it.’’ 32 

This would suggest that in order to identify counterfeits, an inspection and testing 
program requiring authentication of all drug products offered for importation would 
be  necessary.  Such  inspection  and  testing  would  be  extremely  cumbersome  and  ex-
pensive.  Large  shipments  would  need  to  be  removed  from  shipping  containers  and 
broken  down  into  individual  units  for  inspection.  Then  each  individual  unit  would 
need to be inspected or analyzed separately before being repacked into shipping con-
tainers. 

Yet  even  if  a  100  percent  inspection  program  were  feasible  from  a  practical  per-
spective  (which  it  is  not),  it  still  would  not  be  sufficient  to  assure  the  safety  and 
authenticity  of  imported  drug  products.  This  is  because  both  visual  inspection  and 
product testing have significant practical and scientific limitations. 
Visual Inspection 

Visual inspection of drug packaging and labeling is not a viable method for accu-
rately  identifying  counterfeits.  From  a  practical  standpoint,  drug  packaging  and  la-
beling—and the overt counterfeit resistant features incorporated therein (e.g., color- 
shifting inks, holograms)—are too varied and numerous to provide for the real time 
verification  of  drug  products.  It  simply  is  not  realistic  to  expect  inspectors  to  be  fa-
miliar  with  the  wide  variety  of  overt  features  used  on  the  thousands  of  different 
drug  products  likely  to  be  imported.  This  problem  will  be  exacerbated  by  the  need 
to  rotate  overt  features  on  a  regular  basis  to  stay  one  step  ahead  of  the  counter-
feiters. 

Second,  packaging  and  labeling,  and  even  counterfeit  resistant  technologies,  can 
themselves  be  counterfeited,  often  within  12–18  months.  The  counterfeiters  are  be-
coming  increasingly  sophisticated  and  are  making  use  of  advanced  technologies  to 
duplicate  the  packaging  and  labeling  of  authentic  drugs.  As  a  result,  counterfeit 
products are becoming increasingly difficult to detect, even to trained experts. Given 
the  sophistication  of  today’s  counterfeiters,  visual  inspection  can  no  longer  be  ex-
pected to reliably detect counterfeit products presented for import. 

Finally,  visual  inspection  is  of  little  or  no  value  when  a  drug  product  has  been 
repackaged.  Such  repackaging  removes  or  destroys  the  drug’s  original  packaging 
and  labeling  as  well  as  any  counterfeit  resistant  technologies  incorporated  by  the 
manufacturer.  In  such  situations,  inspectors  conducting  a  visual  inspection  would 
have little or no basis for determining whether a product is authentic because they 
would  have  no  authentic  product  against  which  to  compare  it.  This  likely  will  be 
a  major  problem  because  virtually  all  drugs  that  are  imported  have  foreign  pack-
aging  and  labeling  and  thus  would  need  to  be  repackaged  prior  to  importation.  Re-
packaging is subject to minimal oversight, and it was implicated in a recent counter-
feiting incident, including one that led to the recall of 200,000 bottles of counterfeit 
cholesterol-reducing medicine. 
Chemical Analysis and Authentication of Covert Features 

Covert  features  and  chemical  analysis  offer  more  accurate  methods  of  authen-
ticating drug products, but they have their own limitations. Most significantly, such 
methods  do  not  provide  real  time  verification  of  a  drug’s  authenticity.  Covert  fea-
tures and taggants typically require specialized equipment or testing to authenticate 
and  can  and  should  be  authenticated  only  by  the  manufacturer.  These  tests  often 
cannot  be  performed  onsite  or  require  a  manufacturer’s  representative  to  travel  to 
the  site.  In  addition,  tests  for  taggants  may  take  up  to  several  days  to  perform  in 
order  to  accurately  determine  whether  the  drug  is  counterfeit  or  not.  This  may  be 
problematic  if  a  large  amount  of  drug  is  of  questionable  authenticity  as  it  would 
have to be withheld from commerce until the testing is completed. 

Chemical analysis of imported drugs has another problem. Since random sampling 
methods  likely  could  not  be  employed  (for  the  reasons  discussed  above),  chemical 
analysis  would  need  to  be  performed  on  all  drug  products  offered  for  importation. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

40 

This  not  only  would  be  prohibitively  expensive  but  also  counterproductive,  since 
such testing would destroy the very products being tested. 

Further, according to the Department of Health and Human Services’ Task Force 
report  on  importation,  issued  in  December  2004,  while  a  number  of  new  anti-coun-
terfeiting  technologies  show  potential  for  assuring  the  safety  and  authenticity  of 
prescription  medicines,  until  they  are  universally  adopted  they  cannot  be  relied 
upon  to  secure  the  safety,  efficacy,  and  integrity  of  the  global  market.  The  report 
also found that ‘‘widespread adoption of authentication technologies, while theoreti-
cally  able  to  secure  the  U.S.  drug  supply,  is  a  daunting  task  that  could  raise  the 
cost  of  imported  drugs  thereby  reducing  any  expected  savings  from  importation.’’ 33 
Estimates  from  the  Congressional  Budget  Office  (CBO)  suggest  a  counterfeit-resist-
ant  technology  mandate  could  substantially  increase  the  cost  of  any  importation 
scheme.  The  mandate  in  H.R.  2427  (an  importation  bill  introduced  in  the  108th 
Congress) could ‘‘raise the cost of prescription drugs by as much as $2 billion in the 
first year.’’ CBO found that the cost of such a mandate would be ‘‘significant.’’ 34 

Finally,  the  identities  of  covert  features  and  chemical  taggants  incorporated  into 
drug  products  are  (for  good  reason)  closely  held  secrets  by  manufacturers.  In  addi-
tion, for the many drug products that do not incorporate taggants, there is no simple 
laboratory  test  that  can  verify  authenticity.  Consequently,  authenticity  testing 
would either have to be conducted by the manufacturer or would require the disclo-
sure  of  trade  secret  information  by  the  manufacturer  to  the  laboratory  or  facility 
conducting the test. 
Safety Testing 

Safety testing for imported products suffers from many of the same limitations as 
authenticity testing and has some additional limitations as well. Visual inspections, 
for example, would be even less effective at identifying safety problems than authen-
ticity problems. This is because most safety problems do not leave overt visual clues. 
Accordingly,  visual  inspection  likely  would  not  detect  dangerous  impurities  in  a 
drug product; stability problems caused by improper storage conditions; or degrada-
tion  of  the  active  ingredient.  On  the  contrary,  visual  inspection  is  likely  to  identify 
only the most obvious safety problems, such as opened or water-damaged drug prod-
ucts. 

Likewise,  chemical  testing  does  not  provide  an  adequate  assurance  of  the  safety 
or  quality  of  imported  drug  products.  As  discussed  above,  end-product  testing  has 
significant limitations because of the complexity of many drug products and the lack 
of sensitivity of many tests. Just as in the manufacturing context, end-product test-
ing  of  imported  drugs  simply  cannot  measure  all  of  the  possible  variations  that 
could affect safety and effectiveness. 

For  all  of  these  reasons,  the  safety,  quality,  and  authenticity  of  pharmaceutical 
products  that  are  imported  into  the  United  States  cannot  be  assured  by  inspection 
and/or testing programs but instead must be based on strictly controlling the condi-
tions under which they are manufactured and distributed. This means maintaining 
to  the  greatest  extent  possible  the  closed  distribution  system  in  the  U.S.  that  Con-
gress enacted to reduce risks to U.S. consumers. 
Chain  of  Custody  Requirement  Does  Not  Guarantee  Safety  of  Imported 

Drugs 

The inclusion of a chain of custody provision, otherwise known as a drug pedigree 
requirement,  also  does  not  equate  to  today’s  closed  system  and  the  level  of  safety 
it  provides.  In  testimony  on  July  9,  2002,  before  the  Senate  Special  Committee  on 
Aging, FDA stated: 

‘‘Because  we  could  not  go  certify  and  look  in  the  other  countries,  the  bill  that 
they refuse to implement or decline to implement would have replaced the nor-
mal quality control system with a testing process with a paper or so-called pedi-
gree process that attempted to follow the trail of the drugs, but both Secretaries 
[Shalala  and  Thompson]  found  that  the  paper  process  could  be  forwarded  by 
faking  documents  and  that  you  really  couldn’t  adequately  test  these  products, 
either economically or feasibly.’’ 35 

It  is  inappropriate  and  dangerous  to  rely  solely  on  chain  of  custody  or  pedigree 
papers to authenticate an imported medicine. Such documents can be easily forged, 
for  example.  According  to  the  HHS  Task  Force  report  on  importation,  ‘‘Paper  pedi-
grees,  which  are  in  use  today,  have  significant  limitations.  They  are  subject  to  fail-
ures  to  keep  adequate  records  and  can  be  forged,  thus  making  them  an  unreliable 
means for documenting the chain of custody.’’ 36 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

Limiting Importation to Canada Does Not Guarantee Safe Importation 

41 

On  its  face,  limiting  importation  to  drugs  imported  from  Canada  appears  to  be 
safe.  In  practice,  a  drug  could  be  imported  from  anywhere  in  the  world,  as  long  as 
it  entered  into  the  U.S.  through  Canada.  There  is  no  effective  way  to  prevent  the 
transshipment  of  drugs  from  Third  World  countries  into  Canada  and  then  into  the 
U.S.  The  FDA  has  already  warned  that  if  importation  from  Canada  were  enacted 
into law, Canada could become a gateway for counterfeit drugs. 

First, the Canadian government is on record saying that while it regulates drugs 
manufactured  for  its  citizens,  it  cannot  vouch  for  the  safety  of  medicines  that  are 
then  exported  to  the  U.S.  According  to  its  then-Assistant  Deputy  Minister,  Health 
Canada, ‘‘The Government of Canada has never stated that it would be responsible 
for  the  safety  and  quality  of  prescription  drugs  exported  from  Canada  into  the 
United States, or any other country for that matter.’’ 37 

Second,  buying  medicines  from  a  Canadian  website  does  not  guarantee  the  prod-
uct  actually  came  from  Canada  or  that  it  is  safe  and  effective.  For  example,  last 
August, the FDA issued an advisory to consumers warning them against purchasing 
prescription  drugs  from  websites  that  have  orders  filled  by  Mediplan  Prescription 
Plus  Pharmacy  or  Mediplan  Global  Health  in  Manitoba,  Canada  (pharmacies  that 
were ‘‘certified’’ by the Canadian International Pharmacy Association), following re-
ports  of  counterfeit  versions  of  prescription  drug  products  being  sold  by  these  com-
panies to U.S. consumers. Lab analysis of the intercepted products found counterfeit 
versions  of  several  popular  medications,  including  medicines  for  high  cholesterol, 
gastroesophageal  reflux  disease  (GERD),  arthritis-related  pain,  high  blood  pressure 
and breast cancer.38 

According  to  FDA,  ‘‘In  our  experience,  many  drugs  obtained  from  foreign  sources 
that  purport  and  appear  to  be  the  same  as  U.S.-approved  prescription  drugs  have 
been  of  unknown  quality.  We  cannot  provide  adequate  assurance  to  the  American 
public that the drug products delivered to consumers in the United States from for-
eign countries are the same products approved by FDA.’’ 39 A FDA analysis of three 
commonly  prescribed  drugs  purchased  from  a  website  advertised  as  Canadian 
showed that so-called ‘‘Canadian Generics’’ bought from the website were fake, sub-
standard  and  potentially  dangerous.  One  was  a  controlled  substance.  According  to 
FDA,  ‘‘This  firm  shipped  drugs  that  were  the  wrong  strength,  including  some  that 
were  substantially  super-potent  and  that  pose  real  health  risks  as  a  result,  drugs 
that  didn’t  dissolve  properly,  drugs  that  contained  contaminants,  and  drugs  that 
should  not  have  been  given  because  of  potentially  dangerous  drug  interactions.’’ 40 
In a series of ‘‘blitz exams’’ FDA discovered that drugs were being imported from 
alleged Canadian websites that were in fact from other parts of the world. According 
to then-FDA Commissioner, Mark McClellan, ‘‘During the import blitz, we have ex-
amples where our examinations revealed that products were manufactured in coun-
tries  other  than  Canada,  yet  were  exported  from  Canada.  For  example,  at  the  Dal-
las, Seattle and Buffalo mail facilities, imported drugs were encountered which were 
manufactured  in  Canada,  Mexico,  Costa  Rica,  India,  Pakistan,  New  Zealand,  Tai-
wan,  Thailand,  and  a  host  of  other  countries.  However,  in  some  cases,  the  drugs 
that  had  obviously  been  manufactured  in  other  countries  were  exported  from  Can-
ada.’’ 41 

A  more  recent  FDA  investigation  reconfirmed  the  fact  that  many  drugs  being  or-
dered from so-called Canadian pharmacies are in fact from other parts of the world. 
In  December  2005,  FDA  announced  the  results  of  an  operation  in  August  of  that 
year to confiscate parcels containing pharmaceuticals from India, Israel, Costa Rica 
and Vanuatu—43 percent of which had been ordered from Canadian Internet phar-
macies. Of the drugs being promoted as ‘‘Canadian,’’ 85 percent actually came from 
27  countries  around  the  globe.  Then-acting  FDA  Commissioner  Andrew  C.  von 
Eschenbach stated, ‘‘These results make clear there are Internet sites that claim to 
be Canadian that in fact are peddling drugs of dubious origin, safety and efficacy.’’ 42 
Recent  news  reports  have  found  that  some  Canadian  pharmacies  now  acknowl-
edge  that  they  are  going  to  foreign  countries  to  get  their  drugs  to  sell  to  U.S.  con-
sumers. An April 6, 2006, New York Times article reported that the Canadian online 
pharmacy industry is selling foreign drugs, instead of Canadian drugs, to American 
patients.43 The  article  states  that,  ‘‘At  their  peak  in  2004,  the  online  pharmacies 
employed  about  4,000  Canadians.  That  number  has  decreased  to  3,000  with  the 
squeeze in profits, company closings and the purchasing and stockpiling of supplies 
in  Europe,  Australia  and  New  Zealand.’’  According  to  Daren  Jorgenson,  founder  of 
Winnipeg-based  Canadameds.com,  ‘‘We’re  filling  50  percent  of  our  prescriptions 
[from international pharmacies].’’ Jorgensen’s website boasts, ‘‘Not just from Canada 
any more! Choose your country and your savings!’’ 44 

The President and Owner of CanadaRx.net has also confirmed that his medicines 
are not coming from only Canada. According to Harvey Organ, ‘‘I can get drugs from 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

42 

all over the world.’’ 45 A Bloomberg news article reported that CanaRx Services Inc., 
‘‘has  joined  other  Canadian  Internet  pharmacies  in  finding  sources  of  drugs  from 
partners  in  the  U.K.,  Continental  Europe,  Israel,  Australia  and  India.’’ 46 This  is 
particularly  troubling  since  according  to  a  study  by  Temple  University  for  Pharma-
ceutical  Health  Service  Search,  India  is  a  worldwide  leader  in  the  production  of 
counterfeit drugs with as much as 35 percent of the world’s drug counterfeiting orig-
inating in that country.47 

This  is  confirmed  by  data  from  Industry  Canada,  which  shows  significant  in-
creases in pharmaceutical imports into Canada in 2006 from the previous year. For 
example,  according  to  the  data,  imports  of  pharmaceutical  products  into  Canada 
were up significantly from many countries, including, for example: Singapore up 165 
percent; Argentina up 913 percent; Bulgaria up 255 percent; Jordan up 823 percent; 
and Mexico up 284 percent, to name a few.48 
Expanding importation beyond Canada presents additional safety concerns 
If  importation  were  to  be  legalized  beyond  Canada,  further  safety  concerns  exist. 
While  proponents  of  importation  point  to  parallel  trade 49 in  the  European  Union 
(EU) as evidence that importation beyond Canada can be done safely, they often ig-
nore the problems that exist with parallel trade in terms of safety. Specifically, EU 
member states have struggled with counterfeit drugs, safety issues arising from im-
proper  storage  and  handling,  and  safety  issues  arising  out  of  repackaging  and  re- 
handling. 
Parallel Trade and Introduction of Counterfeit Drugs 

First, parallel trade in Europe has facilitated the introduction of counterfeit medi-
cines in the destination countries. For example, in January 2005, the Council of Eu-
rope  (CoE)  released  a  report  on  counterfeit  medicines  in  the  EU.  According  to  the 
CoE report, ‘‘Based on the results of the surveys conducted by the CoE, the counter-
feit medicine problem is not insignificant in Western Europe and estimates provided 
by  several  respondents  indicate  that  the  problem  is  not  likely  going  away  in  the 
foreseeable future. It affects all countries of the world. It is no longer safe to assume 
that the problem does not exist to any real extent in Western Europe and thus can 
safely be ignored by authorities in the latter. Although it can be assumed that West-
ern Europe is relatively less affected by the counterfeit medicine problem than East-
ern Europe, it has to be borne in mind that counterfeit medicines probably regularly 
transit  through  and  exit  Western  Europe.’’ 50 If  importation  were  legalized,  these 
counterfeit medicines could then make their way into the U.S. 

The  CoE  report  found  that  parallel  trade  in  the  EU  provides  for  the  inadvertent 
entry  of  counterfeit  drugs.  According  to  the  report,  ‘‘The  existence  of  a  significant 
level of parallel trade in the EU, in the absence of adequate controls on repackaging 
and  relabeling,  provides  an  opportunity  for  the  inadvertent  entry  of  counterfeit 
medicines  into  the  market.  . . .  Furthermore,  parallel  trade  means  that  any  coun-
terfeit  product  within  the  legitimate  distribution  chain  in  one  MS  [Member  State] 
can easily contaminate other MSs.’’ 51 

European health officials have discovered counterfeit versions of a cholesterol-low-
ering  medicine  in  the  supply  chains  of  the  U.K.  and  Netherlands.  A  parallel  trader 
illegally  purchased  the  counterfeits  from  outside  Europe  and  sold  it  to  a  large 
wholesaler  within  the  U.K.  Dutch  health  authorities  also  found  counterfeit  choles-
terol-lowering medicines in their own country’s pharmacies.52 

At  a  meeting  of  the  WHO’s  International  Medical  Products  Anti-Counterfeiting 
Taskforce  in  2006,  the  European  Commission  announced  that  in  the  past  years,  it 
had witnessed 27 cases of counterfeit drugs in the legitimate supply chain. In addi-
tion, the EC saw another 170 cases through the Internet and what it calls the ‘‘ille-
gal’’ supply chain.53 

According  to  an  investigation  into  the  links  between  organized  crime,  terrorism 
and  counterfeit  medicines  conducted  for  the  Stockholm  Network  by  a  former  detec-
tive  superintendent,  ‘‘There  is  no  effective  method  within  the  U.K.—or  to  a  greater 
or  lesser  extent  across  Europe—of  identifying  counterfeited  pharmaceuticals  before 
they  are  dispensed.’’  The  report  also  found  that  the  ‘‘rapid,  legal  growth  in  the 
movement of medicines around the world via parallel trade in Europe and re-impor-
tation  into  the  United  States  provides  more  opportunities  for  counterfeit  and  sub- 
standard medicines to enter the legitimate distribution chain.’’ 54 A study by Patricia 
Danzon,  a  health  care  economist  from  the  Wharton  School,  University  of  Pennsyl-
vania, found, ‘‘Although parallel importers are required to obtain a license, chemical 
testing for equivalence is not performed, and instances of counterfeit products have 
occurred.’’ 55 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

43 

Importation  from  any  EU  Country  Would  Open  the  U.S.  to  Drugs  from  Every  EU 

Country 

Because of the free flow of goods between members of the EU, any legislation that 
permits  the  importation  of  pharmaceuticals  from  any  country  in  the  EU  is  essen-
tially  permitting  the  entry  of  drugs  from  every  country  in  the  EU—it  simply  is  not 
possible  to  prevent  importation  that  includes  any  EU  country  from  including  every 
one of the EU countries. This would include, for example, a number of Eastern Eu-
ropean  countries  with  either  known  counterfeiting  problems  or  neighbors  with 
known counterfeiting problems. Many of these countries do not have pharmaceutical 
infrastructures even roughly comparable to ours. The WHO, in their 2006 estimates, 
warned  that  the  countries  in  the  former  Soviet  Union  have  counterfeit  rates  up  to 
20  percent.56 As  of  2007,  there  are  three  former  Soviet  Union  countries  in  the  27 
member  European  Union,  this  number  will  grow.  As  the  EU  expands,  the  risk  of 
counterfeits from countries with weaker regulatory systems, such as the Ukraine is 
likely.57 
EU Countries Not Willing to Police Drugs Exported to the U.S. 

Aside from growing concerns over counterfeit medicines in the EU, there also does 
not appear to be a willingness among countries in the EU to implement protections 
to  ensure  the  safety  of  drugs  exported  to  the  U.S.  if  importation  were  legalized  in 
the  U.S.  As  part  of  the  HHS  Task  Force’s  investigation  into  the  feasibility  of  pre-
scription  drug  importation,  it  requested  comment  from  foreign  health  agencies  on 
their willingness or ability to implement new or additional protections to ensure the 
safety of exported or transshipped drugs. However, no comments from foreign health 
agencies directly addressed this point. Further, none outlined a specific strategy for 
new steps to collaborate with the U.S. Government on the effective oversight of im-
portation. The Task Force report stated, ‘‘Foreign governments have little incentive 
and  limited  resources  to  ensure  the  safety  of  drugs  exported  from  their  countries, 
particularly when those drugs are transshipped or are not intended for import . . . 
If  foreign  health  agencies  were  willing  to  ensure  the  safety  and  effectiveness  of 
drugs  exported  from  their  countries  to  the  U.S.,  one  would  expect  a  greater  global 
response.’’ 58 
Parallel Trade and Improper Storage of Medicines 

Significant health issues are associated with improper storage of medicines during 
transit.  Parallel  imported  goods  must  pass  through  the  hands  of  various  inter-
national  trading  organizations,  and  it  is  not  always  possible  for  regulatory  authori-
ties  to  ensure  sufficient  physical  monitoring  and  sampling  of  these  products.  A 
WHO/World  Trade  Organization  (WTO)  Workshop  paper  found,  ‘‘while  parallel  im-
porters may themselves be required to comply locally with stringent drug wholesale 
regulations, there are many ways to circumvent drug regulations.’’ 59 
Parallel  Trade  and  Safety  Problems  Associated  with  Repackaging  and  Re-Labeling 
Parallel  trade  requires  both  repackaging  and  re-labeling,  which  can  introduce  a 
variety of safety problems. For example, parallel traders often discard the anti-coun-
terfeiting measures that some packaging now incorporates. One member state medi-
cines agency commented on a safety problem with parallel imports, which it attrib-
uted  to  relabeling.  In  its  report  for  the  years  1998–2002,  the  German  Medicines 
Agency (BfArM) states: 

Events worth mentioning in connection with parallel trade: 
2001–2002 
Complaints from consumers and diabetics associations related to reduced activ-
ity  of  imported  insulin  preparations;  Results  of  the  investigation:  insulin  con-
tent  of  the  checked  products,  which  are  about  to  be  administered  by  means  of 
a pen, is in order, but possibly the functionality of the pens is affected by inap-
propriate relabeling of the vials; In essence products that are centrally approved 
in  the  EU  are  involved;  Consequence  of  parallel  import  approval  procedure:  di-
rections for proper labeling.60 

Importation  Violates  the  Entire  Approach  to  Ensuring  the  Safety  of  the  U.S. 

Pharmaceutical Distribution System 

The cornerstone of the U.S. pharmaceutical distribution system is total control of 
the  process—from  selection  of  raw  materials,  design  of  the  manufacturing  process, 
packaging  of  a  final  product,  evaluation  of  storage  conditions  and  careful  selection 
of the distribution pathway. Importation is at odds with this system, increasing the 
chances for substandard, adulterated and counterfeit medicines to enter our system. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

44 

Clearly, no one would propose relaxing the current system for drugs produced under 
FDA jurisdiction, yet importation effectively does just that. 

The examples mentioned here, and countless others not mentioned here, illustrate 
that  legalizing  importation  opens  an  avenue  for  unscrupulous  counterfeiters.  In 
order to continue assuring American patients that the medicines they take are safe 
and effective, and meet the highest standards, the current system for manufacturing 
and  distribution  of  pharmaceuticals  must  be  maintained.  Only  the  current  system, 
with its full battery of quality testing conducted by the manufacturer, coupled with 
complete knowledge of the domestic distribution process can assure the safety Amer-
icans expect. 
Evidence Suggests Minimal Cost-Savings from Importation 

While  importation  is  often  identified  as  a  way  to  reduce  the  cost  of  medicines  for 
patients, the evidence suggests otherwise. Savings are not as significant as claimed 
for several reasons, including the fact that middlemen—or arbitrageurs—often ben-
efit  considerably  more  than  patients  and  price  differentials  between  the  U.S.  and 
other countries are often exaggerated. 
Government Reports Find Cost-Savings from Importation Minimal 

The  HHS  Task  Force  report  on  prescription  drug  importation  found,  ‘‘Total  sav-
ings  to  drug  buyers  from  legalized  commercial  importation  would  be  one  to  2  per-
cent  of  total  drug  spending  and  much  less  than  international  price  comparisons 
might  suggest.  The  savings  going  directly  to  individuals  would  be  less  than  1  per-
cent  of  total  spending.  Most  of  the  savings  would  likely  go  to  third  party  payers, 
such as insurance companies and HMOs.’’ 61 

Similarly,  according  to  an  April  2004  CBO  analysis  of  H.R.  2427  (an  importation 
bill that would have allowed importation from 25 countries), savings would amount 
to  approximately  1  percent  of  total  projected  spending  on  drugs  between  2004  and 
2013.  Most  of  these  projected  savings  don’t  even  materialize  for  more  than  half  a 
decade. Permitting importation only from Canada, according to CBO, would produce 
a ‘‘negligible reduction in drug spending.’’ 62 
State Importation Experiments Have Failed to Show Savings 

Several  states  and  localities  that  have  examined  importation  have  caste  addi-
tional  doubts  on  potential  savings  that  may  accrue  from  importation.  For  example, 
the  State  of  Illinois  began  its  I-SaveRx  program  in  October  2004  to  allow  people  to 
refill  prescriptions  using  foreign  pharmacies.  The  state  worked  with  pharmacies  in 
Canada,  the  UK,  Australia  and  New  Zealand  and  the  program  was  later  expanded 
to four other states. According to the Chicago Tribune, in the first 19 months of the 
operation, the program served only 3,689 Illinois residents—and another 1,265 indi-
viduals  in  four  other  states,  despite  a  massive  promotional  campaign  by  the  state 
that utilized 521 workers in 28 state agencies at a cost of nearly $1 million.63 

According to a January 2005 Washington Post article, Montgomery County, Mary-
land’s  plans  to  make  Canadian  prescription  drugs  available  to  employees  has  ‘‘hit 
a  snag’’  after  an  analysis  by  the  county  school  system  concluded  that  importation 
of prescription drugs from Canada wouldn’t save as much money as hoped and could 
be  more  expensive  than  domestic  sources  for  drugs.  In  reaction  to  the  findings,  Su-
perintendent Jerry D. Weast, in a confidential memo to the Board of Education (de-
tailed by the Washington Post) wrote, ‘‘In many cases, purchasing medications from 
Canada would prove to be more costly.’’ 64 

In  November  2003,  the  Massachusetts  Group  Insurance  Commission,  the  insur-
ance  administrator  for  state  employees  and  retirees,  examined  importation  from  a 
state  perspective  and  found,  ‘‘the  potential  savings  [of  importation]  would  not  be 
worth the liability risks and the disruption of existing insurance contracts.’’ 65 
European  Experience  with  Parallel  Trade  Demonstrates  Profits  to  Middlemen,  Not 

Savings to Patients 

The  European  experience  with  parallel  trade  has  demonstrated  that  the  practice 
financially  benefits  middlemen  rather  than  patients.  According  to  a  study  by  the 
London  School  of  Economics  (LSE)  and  Political  Science,  profits  from  parallel  im-
ports  accrue  mostly  to  the  benefit  of  the  third  party  companies  that  buy  and  resell 
the medicines, not to patients. Specifically, the LSE study found that, ‘‘Although the 
overall number of parallel imports is continuing to increase, healthcare stakeholders 
are  realizing  few  of  the  expected  savings  . . .  profits  from  parallel  imports  accrue 
mostly  to  the  benefit  of  the  third-party  companies  that  buy  and  resell  these  medi-
cines.’’  The  study  found  savings  to  insurance  organizations  ranged  from  .3  percent 
to 2 percent, while parallel trader mark-ups ranged from 12 percent to 54 percent.66 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

Prescription  Drug  Price  Comparisons  Between  the  U.S.  and  Other  Countries  are 

Often Deeply Flawed and Exaggerated 

45 

Supporters  of  importation  often  point  to  retail  prices  in  the  U.S.  and  compare 
those  prices  to  government  controlled  prices  in  Canada  and  various  other  countries 
as  evidence  that  importation  will  provide  a  means  to  lower  prices  for  U.S.  con-
sumers. As with all products, prices vary from country to country for a host of rea-
sons including income differences and exchange rates. For pharmaceuticals, govern-
ment-imposed  reimbursement  and  price  controls  in  other  developed  countries  are 
another  factor  generating  cross-national  price  differences.  While  the  price  paid  for 
a  given  medication  may  be  cheaper  in  a  foreign  country  than  it  is  in  the  U.S.,  it 
is  not  always  the  case  and  such  comparisons  are  flawed  for  a  number  of  reasons. 
Before  addressing  these  flaws,  I  note  that  the  current  debate  sometimes  seems 
to  incorrectly  assume  that  medicines  are  the  only  product  for  which  prices  vary 
internationally,  and  that  this  suggests  manufacturers  somehow  engage  in  inappro-
priate  practices.  In  fact,  prices  for  computers,  food,  cars  and  other  consumer  goods 
in  the  U.S.  are  not  priced  the  same  as  they  are  in  Italy,  Canada,  France,  or  any 
other country. This has been graphically illustrated in the new car market. An arti-
cle  published  in  the  Associated  Press,  ‘‘Auto  Industry  Attacks  Canadian  ‘Gray  Mar-
ket’  Discounts,’’  illustrates  this  point.  The  article  notes  that,  ‘‘Savings  from  the 
cross-border  trade  can  be  substantial.  For  example,  a  loaded  Dodge  Caravan  costs 
$31,000  in  the  U.S.,  but  just  $21,000  in  U.S.  dollars  in  Canada,  said  David  Pierce, 
owner  of  Pierce’s  Superstores  in  Great  Falls,  Mont.’’  Mr.  Pierce  went  on  further  to 
say, ‘‘[T]hat even his wholesale cost is $6,500 more than is charged a retail customer 
in  Canada  . . .  even  when  he’s  charged  a  customer  $2,000  for  an  aftermarket  war-
ranty,  the  Caravan  he  has  bought  from  Canadian  exporters  will  cost  $8,000  less 
than the same model meant for American showrooms.’’ 67 

Most  price  comparisons  also  ignore  the  fact  that  pricing  differentials  on  other 
health care services vary more from country to country than do pricing differentials 
for  medicines.  According  to  a  study  by  Patricia  M.  Danzon  and  Michael  F. 
Furukawa  that  compared  average  price  levels  for  pharmaceuticals  in  eight  coun-
tries—Canada, Chile, France, Germany, Italy, Japan, Mexico and the U.K.—relative 
to  the  U.S.,  U.S.-foreign  price  differentials  are  roughly  in  line  with  income  and 
smaller  for  drugs  than  for  other  medical  services.68 In  fact,  when  looking  just  at 
health care, drugs account for only about 7 percent of the lower per capita spending 
in Canada than the U.S., while other health care services account for about 93 per-
cent of the lower health care costs paid by Canadians.69 

Further, only a small minority of consumers in the U.S. pay the ‘‘retail’’ price for 
prescription  drugs.  The  overwhelming  majority  pay  substantially  discounted  prices 
through pharmacy benefit managers (PBMs) and health plans, many of which nego-
tiate on behalf of tens of millions of patients and are part of the way that U.S. im-
poses  market-based  cost  containment  in  contrast  to  the  government  price  controls 
imposed  in  parts  of  Europe  and  Canada.  As  mentioned  above,  for  Medicare  bene-
ficiaries,  passage  of  the  Medicare  prescription  drug  benefit  has  increased  the  num-
ber  of  Medicare  beneficiaries  with  comprehensive  prescription  drug  coverage  from 
24.3  million  (or  59  percent)  in  2005  to  39  million  (or  90  percent)  today.  This  cov-
erage  has  amounted  to  average  savings  of  $1,200  per  beneficiary.  According  to  a 
January 2006 investigation by AARP, Medicare drug plans that cover all of a bene-
ficiary’s  drugs  can  cost  less  than  buying  the  same  drugs  across  the  border.  The 
AARP calculation, which took into account premiums, deductibles, and copayments, 
was  based  on  real  combinations  of  drugs  taken  by  beneficiaries  living  in  different 
parts of the country, as well as the cost of six commonly used brand name drugs.70 
Like Medicare beneficiaries, insured Americans enjoy significant discounts on the 
medicines  they  purchase  as  a  result  of  large,  powerful  purchasers  (often  rep-
resenting tens of millions of Americans) such as pharmacy benefit managers (PBMs) 
and  managed  care  organizations.  A  PBM  ‘‘can  negotiate  discounts  at  both  ends  of 
the pricing chain: from the manufacturer and from the retail pharmacy.’’ 71 A study 
in  Health  Affairs  found  ‘‘to  the  extent  ‘list’  prices  fail  to  report  the  impact  of  dis-
counts  and  rebates  in  the  United  States,  alleged  price  advantages  in  Canada  are 
overestimated.  It  is  likely  that  only  Americans  who  find  themselves  without  pre-
scription drug coverage are charged prices that exceed Canadian prices.’’ 72 

Even  those  consumers  who  buy  at  retail  can  save  considerably  depending  on 
where they buy their drugs in the U.S. For example, according to the New York City 
Council’s  Investigations  Committee  Chair  Eric  Gioia,  ‘‘At  a  time  when  Americans 
are  flocking  to  Canada  for  cheap  prescription  drugs,  New  Yorkers  could  be  saving 
more  than  50  percent  on  their  prescription  drug  purchases  just  by  traveling  to  a 
different  borough.’’  An  investigation  conducted  by  Council  Member  Gioia’s  com-
mittee  staff  found  that  by  traveling  to  a  pharmacy  perhaps  only  a  few  blocks  away 
from where they usually shop, consumers could save up to $80 on a single prescrip-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

46 

tion.’’ 73 Similar  studies  have  been  done  in  other  parts  of  the  country  and  have  re-
sulted in similar findings.74 

Finally,  generics  now  make  up  about  60  percent  of  all  prescriptions  in  the  U.S., 
a  much  higher  percentage  that  in  most  developed  countries.  Generic  medicines  are 
often  priced  at  significant  discounts  in  the  U.S.  compared  to  Canada  and  represent 
a viable option for patients looking to lower their health care costs. FDA conducted 
an  analysis  of  prices  actually  charged  on  customer  invoices  for  a  sample  of  the  de-
tained  foreign  generic  medications  encountered  in  the  shipments.  FDA  converted 
the  price  paid  to  U.S.  dollars  and  checked  the  prices  at  four  U.S.  pharmacies.  In 
every  instance,  a  U.S.  pharmacy  price  for  the  FDA-approved  generic  drug  was  less 
than  what  consumers  had  paid  for  the  foreign  generic  drug  ordered  from  Kohler’s 
Drugstore in Canada.75 In light of the heavy use of generics in the U.S., price com-
parisons  that  focus  on  only  a  few  brand  drugs  while  excluding  generics  also  exag-
gerate cost differences experienced by consumers. 
Importation  Is  Not  Free  Trade,  it  Is  the  Importation  of  Foreign  Price 

Controls 

Some  who  support  importation  have  argued  that  importing  prescription  drugs 
from other countries is a means to utilize the free market to bring lower cost medi-
cines  to  American  consumers.  Apart  from  the  likelihood  that  for  the  reasons  speci-
fied  above  importation  will  not  achieve  the  cost  reductions  claimed  by  its  pro-
ponents,  this  argument  also  ignores  the  fact  importation  would  promote  trade  in 
medicines that are subject to government price controls—the antithesis of free trade. 
Economists  and  trade  experts  have  argued  that  importation  is  not  a  free  market 
principle, but rather is a mechanism to ‘‘import’’ a foreign government’s price control 
regime.  For  example,  according  to  John  E.  Calfee,  American  Enterprise  Institute 
(AEI),  ‘‘Congress  should  dismiss  all  possibility  of  these  scenarios  by  rejecting  the 
drug importation legislation. It should not fall into the trap of thinking that as long 
as controls over U.S. prices were introduced by the government of a foreign country 
we would still have a free market. We wouldn’t have a free market, and we wouldn’t 
get the benefits of one.’’ 76 

Commentary  in  The  Wall  Street  Journal  explained,  ‘‘In  effect,  re-importation  of 
drugs  would  import  something  else  to  the  U.S.:  price  controls,  where  the  lack  of 
such  practices  is  the  oxygen  that  allows  pharmaceutical  research  to  thrive.  Drug- 
price  controls  are  pernicious.  While  controls  on  oil  and  other  products  tend  to  be 
short-lived, as voters eventually object to the resulting shortages, the effects of drug 
regulations  are  more  difficult  to  observe  since  they  mainly  affect  medicines  that 
haven’t been invented yet.’’ 77 

The lack of a free market in Europe has led to a decline in the European pharma-
ceutical  market  and  an  exodus  of  the  pharmaceutical  industry  from  Europe  to  the 
U.S. The exodus from Europe results in part from the more hospitable business cli-
mate in the U.S.—for example, the science and technology base in the U.S. and the 
opportunity  for  public-private  research  partnerships—the  European  pharmaceutical 
industry and the European Commission, however, concluded that the exodus results 
primarily  from  the  price  control  policies  and  cost-containment  measures  that  lead 
to a lack of competition in the European market. The European Federation of Phar-
maceutical  Industries  and  Associations  (EFPIA)  has  explained  that  the  ‘‘European 
pharmaceutical  industry  has  lost  its  competitiveness  because  there  is  a  problem  of 
price—and  innovation  is  not  compensated.’’ 78 EFPIA  adds,  ‘‘Europe  lacks  a  climate 
which  favours  and  rewards  innovation.  . . .  Compared  to  the  U.S.,  Europe  is  seen 
as a less attractive R&D investment location in terms of market size and incentives 
for the creation of new biotech companies.’’ 79 

According  to  a  report  by  the  U.S.  Department  of  Commerce,  price  controls  main-
tained  by  OECD  countries  reduce  the  amount  of  global  pharmaceutical  R&D  below 
what it would otherwise be under market conditions similar to those in the U.S. The 
study estimates that this reduction falls in the range of $5 billion to $8 billion annu-
ally, once prices were fully adjusted. Based on an estimated cost of developing a new 
drug,  an  increase  in  R&D  of  $5  billion  to  $8  billion  could  lead  to  three  or  four  new 
molecular entities annually once markets fully adjust.80 

By  using  simulation  experiments  under  multiple  price  control  scenarios,  John  A. 
Vernon, an economist at the University of Connecticut, estimated that the pharma-
ceutical industry’s output of new medicines under price controls would significantly 
decline.  Regulation  of  pharmaceutical  prices  in  the  U.S.,  similar  to  what  is  done  in 
Europe,  could  have  a  ‘‘precipitous  effect  on  pharmaceutical  innovation  in  the  long 
run.’’ 81 Importation of prescription drugs could also have significant implications for 
U.S.  intellectual  property  rights  for  prescription  drugs,  potentially  upsetting  the 
careful  balance  between  encouragement  of  innovation  and  ensuring  patient  access 
to new medical discoveries. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

Price Controls Often Lead to Delays and Denials in Access to New Medicines 

47 

As nearly all would agree, new medications are a critical element of quality health 
care. Yet many patients in countries that employ cost-containments measures, such 
as  price  controls,  often  wait  years  before  gaining  access  to  breakthrough  drugs.  Ac-
cording to the Department of Commerce report, ‘‘Such controls can also delay or re-
duce the availability of some innovative medicines in foreign countries, with the ef-
fect of limiting competition and requiring national health systems to forego the ben-
efits of these innovations in reducing health care costs.’’ 82 These restrictions on pa-
tients’  access  to  medicines  through  government  price  controls  in  not  an  approach 
that would benefit U.S. patients. 

While  drug  approval  is  handled  in  the  European  Union  by  a  centralized  body 
called  the  European  Medicines  Agency  (EMEA),  each  Member  State  of  the  EU  has 
control  over  price  and  reimbursement  decisions.  In  the  majority  of  Member  States, 
a  marketing  authorization  alone  is  not  sufficient  to  enable  a  prescription  drug  to 
actually  be  sold.  The  medicine  will  only  appear  on  the  market  once  the  competent 
authorities have set a price and/or the medicine has been registered on the positive 
list defining the conditions under which it is covered by public health care insurance 
for residents of the particular Member State. According to a report by the G10 Medi-
cines  Group,  ‘‘The  price  negotiating  systems  and  reimbursement  structures  in  a 
number of Member states can lead to significant delays.’’ 83 

This was corroborated by a February 2003 report in Business Week, which stated, 
‘‘Once  a  drug  is  approved  by  the  European  Agency  for  the  Evaluation  of  Medicinal 
Products,  national  governments  must  debate  whether  to  make  the  drug  available 
through their health systems and at what price. The process, which usually involves 
negotiations with manufacturers, who are under pressure to extend deep discounts, 
can drag on for several years. . . . As a result of price controls, European consumers 
are heading toward second-class citizenship when it comes to access to medicine.’’ 84 
In some markets, patients must wait more than 2 years after marketing approval 
before  gaining  access  to  a  new  medicine  (if  at  all).85 European  Union  Directive  89/ 
105 requires that applications to the competent authorities to secure a price or reim-
bursement  for  new  medicines  must  be  decided  within  90  days,  or  180  days  where 
it is necessary to agree price before applying for reimbursement.86 Only 7 countries 
presently  comply  with  the  requirement  for  countries  to  provide  decision  within  180 
days:  U.K.,  Germany,  Denmark,  Sweden,  Ireland,  Cyprus  and  Estonia.  Poland  has 
approved  only  a  handful  of  new  medicines  for  the  past  8  years,  and  Austria,  Bel-
gium,  France,  Greece,  Czech  Republic,  Italy  and  Slovenia  have  delays  of  over  300 
days.  Again,  this  approach,  which  is  inherently  part  of  government  price  control 
schemes, is a poor precedent of policy in the U.S. 

An  ongoing  analysis  by  the  European  Federation  of  Pharmaceutical  Industries 
and  Associations  (EFPIA)  indicates  that  many  EU  Member  states  are  not  meeting 
the  standard  set  out  in  the  EU  Directive  89/105  as  of  June  2006.  For  example,  pa-
tients in very few EU countries have access to all new medicines that received mar-
keting authorization from EMEA between January 1, 2002 and December 31, 2005. 
In  fact,  doctors  in  only  2  of  18  EU  countries  monitored  can  prescribe  all  medicines 
approved  during  this  time  period  to  their  patients.  In  the  other  16  countries  be-
tween  55  percent  and  79  percent  of  EMEA  approved  medicines  are  available.  The 
average waiting time for these medicines becoming available varies widely.87 
Government  Price  Controls  and  Related  Policies  Lead  to  Less  Diffusion  of  New 

Medicines 

A 2002 survey entitled, ‘‘Diffusion of Medicines in Europe,’’ found shortfalls in the 
diffusion  of  state-of-the-art  medicines  between  European  countries  for  20  key  dis-
eases. The study noted that the shortfalls in diffusion of new medicines was in large 
part  the  result  of  European  price  containment  measures.  According  to  the  study, 
‘‘The  most  important  factors  for  the  diffusion  of  innovative  medicines  are  policy  re-
lated. Some examples are drug pricing policies, insufficient recognition of the (global 
and  long  term)  economic  effects  of  innovative  medicine,  inadequate  governmental 
planning and last but not least cost containment strategies of every kind.’’ 88 
For example: 

Cardiovascular  Disease—In  Germany,  87  percent  of  all  patients  with  coronary 
heart disease there was a lack of provision of modern lipid-lowering drugs. 
In Italy, 83 percent of eligible patients did not receive statins. 
Diabetes—In Germany, 30 percent of at least 4 million diabetes patients are not 
treated with drugs at all. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

48 

Multiple  Sclerosis—In  France,  ‘‘less  than  50  percent  of  patients  [with  Multiple 
Sclerosis]  eligible  for  treatment  with  beta  interferons  actually  receive  it  (only 
10,000 from about 25,000 to 30,000).’’ 
Schizophrenia—In  France  it  is  estimated  that  there  are  4.4  schizophrenia  suf-
ferers for every 1,000 people aged between 31 and 50 years, but only 2.4 people 
for every 1,000 are treated. For the treated patients the level of the use of inno-
vative second generation drugs continues to be at a very low level. 
Depression—‘‘The European average shows that only 18 percent of patients with 
severe depression received treatment with antidepressants.’’ 
In  Germany,  of  the  percent  of  patients  treated  with  antidepressants,  ‘‘only  one 
in  three  received  an  up-to-date  treatment  with  modern  antidepressants  (SSRIs). 
The other 8 percent are treated with older substances with more side effects or 
less effective drugs like herbal preparations.’’ 
In  France,  ‘‘recent  studies  have  shown  that  50  to  70  percent  of  patients  with 
symptomatic  depression  are  not  treated  at  all,  either  with  interpersonal  or 
behavioural  psychotherapies  nor  with  antidepressant  medication  or  a  combina-
tion of both.’’ 

Safe Alternatives in the U.S. for Those That Cannot Afford Their Medicine 
While  importation  is  often  hailed  as  the  only  solution  for  individuals  who  lack 
prescription  drug  coverage  and  cannot  afford  their  medicines,  in  fact  there  are  bet-
ter, safer ways to ensure that patients have access to affordable medicines. 

PhRMA  member  companies  have  long  offered  patient  assistance  programs  to  ex-
pand  access  to  medicines  for  patients.  In  2005,  PhRMA  joined  with  public  and  pri-
vate  voluntary  organizations  to  create  the  Partnership  for  Prescription  Assistance 
(PPA),  which  offers  a  single  point  of  contact  to  about  475  patient  assistance  pro-
grams and sources of government assistance. So far, the PPA has helped more than 
3  million  patients  find  programs  that  provide  free  or  nearly  free  medications.  In 
2005,  pharmaceutical  companies  gave  away  $5  billion  in  medicines  to  patients  in 
need.  More  than  1,300  partners  make  up  the  PPA,  including  groups  such  as  the 
American  Academy  of  Family  Physicians,  the  American  Cancer  Society,  Easter 
Seals and the National Association of Chain Drug Stores. 

In  addition  to  the  PPA,  since  January  1,  2006,  Medicare  beneficiaries  have  had 
access to comprehensive prescription drug insurance. They have a wide range of cov-
erage  choices  at  various  price  points,  including  prescription-drug  only  plans  and 
‘‘Advantage’’  plans  that  also  cover  hospital  and  physician  services.  The  new  Medi-
care  benefit  has  greatly  expanded  access  to  prescription  drugs  for  older  Americans, 
many  of  whom  have  substantial  medicine  needs.  First  year  indications  show  that 
the results are even better than anticipated—for seniors and for the health care sys-
tem.  For  example,  according  to  an  Amundsen  Group  study,  average  out-of-pocket 
costs  for  beneficiaries  who  had  no  drug  coverage  in  2005  and  who  have  enrolled  in 
coverage  through  Medicare  Part  D  have  been  reduced  by  half,  despite  an  increase 
in  the  number  of  medicines  used.  Further,  the  percentage  of  previously  uninsured 
patients  who  spend  more  than  $50  out-of-pocket  per  month  fell  from  34  percent  in 
2005 to 18 percent in 2006.89 

State  PAP  programs,  Medicaid  and  SCHIP  are  also  options  available  to  patients 
who  cannot  afford  their  medicines.  Today,  there  are  millions  of  people  eligible  for, 
but not taking advantage of such programs. Helping to ensure patients are enrolled 
in such programs, which provide coverage for all services, not just medicines, would 
be a step toward better care for millions of patients. 

The solutions detailed above provide practical options for many individuals to ac-

cess affordable medicines that will not risk their health and safety. 
Conclusion 

Importation  schemes  are  unsafe.  At  a  time  when  we  are  struggling  to  combat 
counterfeit  drugs  and  tighten  security  at  our  borders,  we  should  be  searching  for 
ways  to  close  existing  loopholes  in  the  drug  distribution  chain,  not  creating  new 
ones  by  opening  up  the  borders  to  foreign  imports.  While  some  believe  importation 
can  be  done  safely,  even  FDA  recognizes  that  there  is  no  technological  ‘‘magic  bul-
let’’ or inspection process that can protect against adulterated or counterfeit foreign 
drugs.  Consequently,  implementing  importation  would  jeopardize  the  safety  of  mil-
lions of American consumers. 

Importation  would  not  result  in  cost  savings.  There  is  no  indication  that  imple-
menting  importation  would  result  in  cost  savings.  The  costs  of  counterfeit-resistant 
technologies and industry and government testing and inspections likely would run 
billions of dollars each year. If the experience in Europe is any guide, any cost sav-
ings resulting from foreign importation will be captured by the parallel traders rath-
er than passed on to consumers. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

49 

Importation  is  poor  public  policy.  Importation  of  foreign  drugs  is  nothing  more 
than  importation  of  foreign  price  control  practices.  These  have  been  a  disaster  for 
patients  in  foreign  countries,  limiting  access  to  new  medicines  and  significantly  re-
stricting research and development activities in foreign countries. American patients 
deserve  better.  For  individuals  who  lack  prescription  drug  coverage  and  cannot  af-
ford their medicines, there are better and safer ways to obtain needed medications, 
including the Medicare drug benefit, other government programs such as Medicaid, 
SCHIP and State PAPs, PPA, and shopping for lower prices in safe, legal U.S. phar-
macies. 
Endnotes 

1 Pub. L. 75–717, 52 Stat 1040 (1938). 
2 21 U.S.C. § 355(d)(1). 
3 Pub. L. 87–781, 76 Stat. 780 (1962), codified at 21 U.S.C. § 355(d)(5). 
4 See,  e.g.,  the  Durham-Humphrey  Act,  Pub.  L.  82–215,  65  Stat.  648  (1951)  (con-
cerning prescription requirement); the Drug Listing Act of 1972, Pub. L. 92–387, 86 
Stat. 559 (1972); the Orphan Drug Act, Pub. L. 97–414, 96 Stat. 2049 (1983) (subse-
quently amended); the Drug Price Competition and Patent Term Restoration Act of 
1984,  Pub.  L.  98–417,  98  Stat.  1585  (1984);  the  Drug  Export  Amendments  of  1986, 
Pub. L. 99–660, 100 Stat. 3743 (1986), the Prescription Drug Marketing Act of 1987, 
Pub. L. 100–293, 102 Stat. 95 (1988) (subsequently amended); the Generic Drug En-
forcement  Act  of  1992,  Pub.  L.  102–282,  106  Stat.  149  (1992);  and  the  Prescription 
Drug User Fee Act, Pub. L. 102–571, 106 Stat. 4491 (1992). 

5 See 21 U.S.C. §§ 331(d), 355(a). 
6 See 21 U.S.C. § 321(b). 
7 21 U.S.C. §§ 331(d), 355. 
8 21 U.S.C. § 381(d). 
9 H.R. Rep. 76, 100th Cong., 1st Sess. 6–7 (1987). 
10 Id. 
11 ‘‘Dangerous Medicine: The Risk to American Consumers from Prescription Drug 

Diversion and Counterfeiting,’’ 99th Cong., 2d Sess. 22 (Comm. Print 99–2 1986). 

12 The record supporting the PDMA was extensive and unambiguous, and the pro-
hibition on reimportation was not controversial. In June 1985, the staff of the Sub-
committee on Oversight and Investigations of the House Committee on Energy and 
Commerce  published  its  first  report  on  the  drug  diversion  problem.  Staff  of  Sub-
committee on Oversight and Investigations of the House Committee on Energy and 
Commerce,  99th  Cong.,  Report  on  Prescription  Drug  Diversion  and  the  American 
Consumer:  What  You  Think  You  See  May  Not  Be  What  You  Get  (Comm.  Print  99– 
R  1985).  This  report  discussed  the  Ovulen  21  incident  and  laid  the  groundwork  for 
the PDMA provision prohibiting reimportation. The subcommittee convened the first 
of eight public hearings on drug diversion and counterfeiting on July 10, 1985. Over 
2 years, the committee would hear from state and Federal law enforcement officers, 
private  investigators,  state  drug  and  narcotic  agents,  Customs  officials,  FDA  offi-
cials,  pharmacists,  diverters,  U.S.  attorneys,  pharmacy  and  pharmaceutical  trade 
associations,  pharmaceutical  sales  representatives,  and  senior  enforcement  officials 
from  state  regulatory  agencies.  Two  more  Subcommittee  reports  were  released, 
‘‘Dangerous  Medicine:  The  Risk  to  American  Consumers  from  Prescription  Drug  Di-
version  and  Counterfeiting,’’  99th  Cong.,  2d  Sess.  (Comm.  Print  99–2  1986),  and 
‘‘Uncertain  Returns:  The  Multimillion  Dollar  Market  in  Reimported  Pharma-
ceuticals,’’  99th  2nd.  Cong.,  Sess.  (Comm.  Print  99–GG  1985).  Final  legislation 
passed  in  early  1987.  As  Mr.  Waxman  pointed  out  on  the  day  it  passed  the  House, 
the PDMA ‘‘is a very important public health measure. It will provide additional as-
surances  to  American  consumers  that  drugs  they  purchase  will  always  be  safe  and 
effective. . . . The bill was developed after one of the most extensive investigations 
the  Energy  and  Commerce  Committee  has  conducted  on  a  health-related  matter. 
. . . [The Subcommittee] discovered that all the efforts of the FDA to approve drugs 
for safety and effectiveness could be for naught if the wholesale distribution system 
didn’t handle drugs properly or allowed counterfeit drugs to be passed along to con-
sumers.’’ 133 Cong. Rec. 10962 (May 4, 1987). He added, ‘‘[t]he bill is not controver-
sial and has enjoyed bipartisan support.’’ 

13 21 U.S.C. § 381(d). 
14 See  FDA  Regulatory  Procedures  Manual,  ‘‘Coverage  of  Personal  Importations.’’ 
15 FDA has repeatedly expressed concerns about the safety of mail-order personal 
imports, and in 2001 the agency recommended that the policy be rescinded. See Let-
ter  from  FDA  Acting  Principal  Deputy  Commissioner  to  Secretary  of  Health  and 
Human  Services  (requesting  that  HHS  Secretary  revoke  the  personal  importation 
mail  policy)  (May  24,  2001);  see  also  Examining  Prescription  Drug  Importation:  A 
Review of a Proposal to Allow Third Parties to Reimport Prescription Drugs, hearing 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

50 

before  the  Subcommittee  on  Health  of  the  Committee  on  Energy  and  Commerce  of 
the  U.S.  House  of  Representatives,  107th  Cong.  2d  Sess.  40  (July  25,  2002)  (‘‘[W]e 
stand  by  that  recommendation  and  believe  that  we  should  work  with  the  Congress 
to  develop  legislation  that  would  indeed  give  FDA  the  ability  to  screen  these  drugs 
and  turn  them  back.’’)  (William  K.  Hubbard,  Senior  Associate  Commissioner);  Con-
tinuing Concerns over Imported Pharmaceuticals, Hearing before the Subcommittee 
on  Oversight  and  Investigations  of  the  Committee  on  Energy  and  Commerce  of  the 
U.S.  House  of  Representatives,  107th  Cong.  1st  Sess.  48,  62,  72,  76  (June  7,  2001) 
(Hubbard). 

16 Pub. L. 106–387, 114 Stat. 1549, 1549A–35 (2000). 
17 Letter from Secretary Donna Shalala to the Hon. William J. Clinton (December 

26, 2000). 

2001). 

18 Letter  from  Secretary  Tommy  G.  Thompson  to  Senator  James  Jeffords  (July  9, 

19 21 U.S.C. § 384(c). 
20 Gregory Lopes, ‘‘Patients Get Wrong Drugs Online; Anti-Psychotics Substituted 

for Depression, Insomnia Medicine,’’ The Washington Times: February 17, 2007. 

21 61 Fed. Reg. 20104, 20105 (May 3, 1996). 
22 See  Draft  Guidance  for  Industry:  PAT—A  Framework  for  Innovative  Pharma-
ceutical Manufacturing and Quality Assurance (August 2003); see also Guideline on 
General Principles of Process Validation (May 1987). 

23 See 21 CFR Part 211. 
24 21 U.S.C. § 351(a)(2)(B). 
25 See Guideline on General Principles of Process Validation at 3. 
26 See  FDA,  Counterfeit  Drugs  Questions  and  Answers,  available  at:  http:// 

www.fda.gov/oc/initiatives/counterfeit/qa. 

27 World  Health  Organization,  ‘‘WHO  and  partners  accelerate  fight  against  coun-
terfeit medicines; Up to 50% of medicines sold through rogue websites are fake,’’ No-
vember 15, 2006. 

28 ‘‘Internet  Medicines  Market  ‘Poses  Risk  to  Patients’  Health,’’  Financial  Times 

Online, March 1, 2007. 

29 Business Week, ‘‘Fakes!’’ February 7, 2005. 
30 21st  Century  Health  Care  Terrorism:  The  Perils  of  International  Drug  Counter-

feiting, Center for Medicine in the Public Interest, September 20, 2005. 

31 Letter dated July 17, 2002, from FDA to the Honorable Thad Cochran. 
32 Id. 
33 Report on Prescription Drug Importation, HHS Task Force on Drug Importation, 

U.S. Department of Health and Human Services, December 2004. 

34 Congressional  Budget  Office,  ‘‘Would  Prescription  Drug  Importation  Reduce 

U.S. Drug Spending,’’ April 29, 2004. 

35 Statement of William K. Hubbard Senior Associate Commissioner, Policy, Plan-
ning and Legislation FDA before the Special Committee on Aging U.S. Senate: July 
9, 2002. 

36 Report on Prescription Drug Importation, HHS Task Force on Drug Importation, 

U.S. Department of Health and Human Services, December 2004. 

37 Diane Gorman, Assistant Deputy Minister, Health Canada, Letter to The Wash-

ington Post, May 9, 2003. 

38 FDA  News,  FDA  Warns  Consumers  Not  to  Buy  or  Use  Prescription  Drugs  from 
Various Canadian Websites that Apparently Sell Counterfeit Products, P06–123, Au-
gust 20, 2006. 

39 Letter  from  FDA  to  Robert  P.  Lombardi,  Esq.  of  The  Kullman  Firm: 

February 12, 2003 http://www.fda.gov/ora/import/kullman.htm. 

40 FDA  Test  Results  of  Prescription  Drugs  from  Bogus  Canadian  Website  Shows 
All Products are Fake and Substandard, FDA Press Release, P04–65, July 13, 2004. 
41 ‘‘Recent  FDA/U.S.  Customs  Import  Blitz  Exams  Continue  to  Reveal  Potentially 
Dangerous  Illegally  Imported  Drug  Shipments,’’  FDA  Press  Release,  P04–07,  Janu-
ary 27, 2004. 

42 FDA News, ‘‘FDA Operation Reveals Many Drugs Promoted as ‘Canadian’ Prod-

ucts Really Originate From Other Countries,’’ December 16, 2005. 

43 Clifford  Krauss,  ‘‘Kinks  in  Canada  Drug  Pipeline,’’  New  York  Times:  April  6, 

2006. 

44 Leonard  Zehr, 

February 6, 2005. 

‘‘Internet  Pharmacies  Aim  Overseas,’’  Globe  and  Mail: 

45 Christopher  Rowland, 

‘‘Drugs  from  Anywhere;  As  Importation  Networks 
Spread,  Concerns  for  Consumer  Safety  Grow,’’  The  Boston  Globe:  December  16, 
2004. 

46 ‘‘FDA  Seizes  Drugs  Imported  Under  States’  Program,  Supplier  Says,’’ 

Bloomberg: March 9, 2005. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

51 

47 ‘‘Pharmacists  React  to  CanaRx  Exploring  Importation  of  Drugs  from  India, 
Bloomberg  Article  Reveals  Canadian  Internet  Pharmacy  is  Considering  Use  of 
Drugs  From  Country  Associated  with  Counterfeits,’’  Yahoo  News:  March  16,  2005. 
48 Industry  Canada,  Trade  Data  Online,  Canadian  Imports,  Pharmaceutical  and 
Medicine  Manufacturing,  2005–2006,  available  at:  http://strategis.ic.gc.ca/ 
sclmrkti/tdst/tdo/tdo.php. 

49 Parallel  trade  is  a  legal  practice  in  the  EU  and  involves  a  supplier  who  buys 
drugs in low-cost member states, often in Southern Europe, and sells them at a dis-
count  in  countries  where  prices  for  that  product  are  higher,  often  in  Northern  Eu-
rope.  The  essential  purpose  of  this  practice  is  arbitrage  between  countries  with  dif-
ferent prices. 

50 Jonathan Harper; MB ChB, BSc (hons), MBA, ‘‘Harmonised provisions for legis-
lative  and  administrative  procedures  applicable  to  counterfeit  medicines  in  the 
Council of Europe Member States,’’ nuary 2005. 

51 Id. 
52 http://safemedicines.org/resources/documents/Pfizercftwo-pager.pdf. 
53 Dr.  Nils  Behrndt,  Deputy  Head  of  Pharmaceuticals  Unity,  DG  Enterprise  and 
Industry,  ‘‘Combat  Counterfeit  Medicines—Views  From  a  Regional  Organisation 
(EU),’’ WHO Conference, Rome 16–18 February 2006, slide 4. 

54 Graham  Satchwell,  ‘‘A  Sick  Business—Counterfeit  Medicines  and  Organised 

Crime,’’ Press Release, November 8, 2004. 

55 P. Danzon, The Economics of Parallel Trade, PharmacoEconomics (1998). 
56 World  Health  Organization,  ‘‘WHO  and  Partners  Accelerate  Fight  Against 
Counterfeit  Medicines;  Up  to  50  percent  of  Medicines  Sold  Through  Rogue  Web 
Sites are Fake,’’ November 15, 2006. 

57 ‘‘Parallel Trade in Medicines,’’ Social Market Foundation, May 2004. 
58 Department  of  Health  and  Human  Services  (HHS)  Task  Force  on  Drug  Impor-
tation,  chaired  by  Surgeon  General  Richard  H.  Carmona,  ‘‘Report  on  Prescription 
Drug Importation,’’ December 21, 2004. 

59 Guy Woods, Lacuna Research Limited, ‘‘Session V—Market Segmentation: tech-
niques,  actors,  and  incentives;  Governmental  Measures:  Role  of  regulatory  authori-
ties,’’ 
http:www.wto.org/English/tratople/tripsle/hosbjorlpresentationsle/26 
woodsle.pdf. 

60 BfArM report on the activities for the years 1998–2002 on page 39 (see: http:// 

www.bfarm.de/de/DasBfArM/publ/BfArMlBerichtlBd01.pdf.) 

61 Department  of  Health  and  Human  Services  (HHS)  Task  Force  on  Drug  Impor-
tation, chaired by Surgeon General Richard H. Carmona, ‘‘Report on Drug Importa-
tion,’’ December 21, 2004. 

62 ‘‘Would  Prescription  Drug  Importation  Reduce  U.S.  Drug  Spending,’’  Congres-

sional Budget Office, April 29, 2004. 

63 Crystal  Yednak  and  Rick  Pearson,  ‘‘Audit  Slams  State  Drug  Plan:  But 

Blagojevich Plans Expansion,’’ Chicago Tribune: September 20, 2006. 

64 Tim Craig, ‘‘Savings Uncertain in Import Drug Plan,’’ Washington Post: January 

14, 2005. 

65 Christopher Rowland, ‘‘Drug plan isn’t worth the savings: Canada imports seen 

bringing liability risks,’’ Boston Globe: November 21, 2003. 

66 London  School  of  Economics  and  Political  Science,  ‘‘The  Economic  Impact  of 

Parallel Trade,’’ November 2003. 

Press, May 31, 2002. 

67 ‘‘Auto  Industry  Attacks  Canadian  ‘Gray  Market’  Discounts,’’  The  Associated 

68 P.  Danzon  and  M.  Furukawa,  ‘‘Prices  and  Availability  of  Pharmaceuticals:  Evi-

dence from Nine Countries,’’ Health Affairs, Web Exclusive, 29 October 2003. 

69 OECD  Health  Data  2003—2nd  ed.  (Table  9:  Total  Expenditure  on  Health,  Per 
capita  US$  PPP,  available  at:  http://www.oecd.org/dataoecd/1/33/2957325.xls. 
Table  14:  Total  expenditure  on  pharmaceuticals  and  other  medical  non-durables, 
percent  Total  expenditure  on  health,  available  at:  http://www.oecd.org/dataoecd/ 
12/58/2957414.xls.) 

70 ‘‘The  New  Math  Cheaper  than  Canada?  The  Drug  Benefit  May  be  the  Better 
Deal,’’  Accessed  on  February  1,  2006  at  http://www.aarp.org/bulletin/Medicare/ 
newlmath.html. 

71 ‘‘Report to the President, Prescription Drug Coverage, Spending, Utilization and 

Prices,’’ Department of Health and Human Services, April 2000. 

72 S.  Morgan,  M.  Barer  and  J.  Agnew,  ‘‘Whither  Seniors’  Pharmacare:  Lessons 

from (and for) Canada,’’ Health Affairs, Vol. 22, No. 3, May/June 2003. 

73 ‘‘City  Council  Reviews  Legislation  Allowing  Consumers  to  Compare  NYC  Pre-
scription  Drug  Costs  Online,’’  Press  Release,  The  Council  of  the  City  of  New  York, 
Office of Communications, October 12, 2004. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

52 

21, 2003. 

74 Associated  Press  Newswires,  ‘‘Cost  of  prescription  drugs  vary  statewide,’’  June 
24,  2003;  Associated  Press,  ‘‘Survey  finds  price  differences  in  prescription  drugs,’’ 
September  25,  2003;  ‘‘Prescription  drug  prices  vary  at  area  pharmacies,’’  St  Louse 
Business Journal: May 2003; City Council Reviews Legislation Allowing Consumers 
to Compare NYC Prescription Drug Costs Online,’’ Press Release, The Council of the 
City  of  New  York,  Office  of  Communications,  October  12,  2004;  Mary  Massingale 
‘‘Advocates:  Shop  around  for  prescription  drugs,’’  The  State  Journal-Register 
(Springfield, IL), June 27, 2003. 

75 U.S./Canadian Price Comparisons, U.S. Food and Drug Administration, October 

2004, http://www.fda.gov/oc/opacom/hottopics/importdrugs/canadrx.html. 

76 John  E.  Calfee,  ‘‘The  High  Price  of  Cheap  Drugs,’’  The  Weekly  Standard:  July 

77 James  K.  Glassman  and  John  R.  Lott,  Jr.,  ‘‘The  Drug  World’s  Easy  Riders,’’ 

Commentary, The Wall Street Journal: July 23, 2003. 

78 EFPIA, 

‘‘In 

figures  2004,’’  http://www.efpia.org/Objects/2/Files/infigure 

2004Maintrends.pdf. 

79 Id. 
80 Pharmaceutical  Price  Controls  in  OECD  Countries,  Implications  for  U.S.  Con-
sumers,  Pricing,  Research  and  Development,  and  Innovation,  U.S.  Department  of 
Commerce,  International  Trade  Administration,  Washington,  D.C.,  December  2004. 
81 John A. Vernon, ‘‘Simulating the Impact of Price Regulation on Pharmaceutical 

Innovation,’’ Pharm Dev Regul (2003). 

82 Pharmaceutical  Price  Controls  in  OECD  Countries,  Implications  for  U.S.  Con-
sumers,  Pricing,  Research  and  Development,  and  Innovation,  U.S.  Department  of 
Commerce,  International  Trade  Administration,  Washington,  D.C.,  December  2004. 
83 European Commission, ‘‘High Level Group on Innovation and Provision of Medi-
cines, Recommendations for Action,’’ G10 Medicines Report, (Brussels, Belgium: Eu-
ropean Commission, May 7, 2002). 

84 Kerry Capell, ‘‘Europe Pays a High Price for Cheap Drugs,’’ Business Week: Feb-

ruary 17, 2003. 

Health), December 2002. 

85 ‘‘Delays  in  Market  Access,’’  Cambridge  Pharma  Consultancy  (a  unit  of  IMS 

86 Id. 
87 ‘‘Patients  Waiting  to  Access  Innovative  Therapies—The  Patients  W.A.I.T.  Indi-
from  http://www.efpia.org/content/Default.asp?PageID=173  on 

cator’’  accessed 
March 2, 2007. 

88 O.  Scho¨ffski,  ‘‘Diffusion  of  Medicines  in  Europe,’’  Prepared  for  the  European 
Federation of Pharmaceutical Industries and Associations (EFPIA), September 2002. 
89 The  Amundsen  Group,  ‘‘Medicare  Part  D:  Improving  Care  for  Beneficiaries 

Without Drug Coverage,’’ 27 October 2006. 

The New York Times—February 20, 2007 

IN THE WORLD OF LIFE-SAVING DRUGS, A GROWING EPIDEMIC OF DEADLY FAKES 

By Donald G. McNeil, Jr. 

Asia  is  seeing  an  ‘‘epidemic  of  counterfeits’’  of  life-saving  drugs,  experts  say,  and 
the  problem  is  spreading.  Malaria  medicines  have  been  particularly  hard  hit;  in  a 
recent  sampling  in  Southeast  Asia,  53  percent  of  the  antimalarials  bought  were 
fakes. 

Bogus  antibiotics,  tuberculosis  drugs,  AIDS  drugs  and  even  meningitis  vaccines 

have also been found. 

Estimates  of  the  deaths  caused  by  fakes  run  from  tens  of  thousands  a  year  to 
200,000  or  more.  The  World  Health  Organization  has  estimated  that  a  fifth  of  the 
one  million  annual  deaths  from  malaria  would  be  prevented  if  all  medicines  for  it 
were genuine and taken properly. 

‘‘The  impact  on  people’s  lives  behind  these  figures  is  devastating,’’  said  Dr.  How-

ard A. Zucker, the organization’s chief of health technology and pharmaceuticals. 

Internationally,  a  prime  target  of  counterfeiters  now  is  artemisinin,  the  newest 
miracle cure for malaria, said Dr. Paul N. Newton of Oxford University’s Center for 
Tropical Medicine in Vientiane, Laos. 

His team, which found that more than half the malaria drugs it bought in South-
east  Asia  were  counterfeit,  discovered  12  fakes  being  sold  as  artesunate  pills  made 
by Guilin Pharma of China. 

A  charity  working  in  Myanmar  bought  100,000  tablets  and  discovered  that  all 

were worthless. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

53 

‘‘They’re  not  being  produced  in  somebody’s  kitchen,’’  Dr.  Newton  said.  ‘‘They’re 

produced on an industrial scale.’’ 

China  is  the  source  of  most  of  the  world’s  fake  drugs,  experts  say.  In  December, 
according  to  Xinhua,  the  state  news  agency,  the  former  chief  of  China’s  Food  and 
Drug Administration and two of his top deputies were arrested on charges of taking 
bribes to approve drugs. 

The director, Zheng Xiaoyu, was in office from the agency’s creation in 1998 until 
he was dismissed in 2005 after repeated scandals in which medicines and infant for-
mula his agency had approved killed dozens of Chinese, including children. 

‘‘The problem is simply so massive that no amount of enforcement is going to stop 
it,’’ said David Fernyhough, a counterfeiting expert at the Hong Kong offices of Hill 
&  Associates,  a  risk-management  firm  hired  by  Western  companies  to  foil  counter-
feiters. 

The  distribution  networks,  he  said,  ‘’mirror  the  old  heroin  networks,’’  flowing  to 
Thai distributors with financing and money-laundering arranged in Hong Kong. The 
penalties are less severe than for heroin. 

Daniel C. K. Chow, an Ohio State University law professor and an expert on Chi-
nese  counterfeiting,  said  he  believed  that  the  authorities  would  pursue  counter-
feiters  ‘’ruthlessly’’  for  killing  Chinese  citizens  but  be  more  lax  about  drugs  for  ex-
port. 

‘‘The counterfeiters aren’t stupid,’’ he said. ‘‘They don’t want anyone beating down 
the  door  in  the  middle  of  the  night  and  dragging  them  away,  so  they  make  drugs 
for sale outside the country.’’ 

A spokesman for the Chinese Embassy in Washington said that he had ‘’no idea’’ 
whether most of the world’s counterfeits came from China, but that Mr. Zheng’s ar-
rest  proved  China  was  cracking  down.  He  also  said  counterfeiters  would  get  the 
same punishment no matter whom they hurt. 

Many  of  the  fake  artesunate  pills  found  by  Dr.  Newton’s  team  were  startlingly 
accurate  in  appearance—and  much  more  devious  in  effect  than  investigators  had 
suspected. 

Not only did the pills look correct, as did the cardboard boxes, the blister packing 
and the foil backing, but investigators found 12 versions of the tiny hologram added 
to prevent forgery. 

In  one  case,  even  a  secret  ‘‘X–52’’  logo  visible  only  under  ultraviolet  light  was 

present, though in the wrong spot. 

Another  hologram  was  forged  by  hand,  Dr.  Newton  said,  by  someone  who  obvi-
ously  spent  hours  with  a  pin  and  a  magnifying  glass  making  tiny  dots  on  a  circle 
of foil to imitate the shimmer. 

But  the  most  frightening  aspect  appeared  when  the  pills  were  tested.  Some  con-
tained  harmless  chalk,  starch  or  flour.  But  the  latest,  he  said,  contained  drugs  ap-
parently chosen to fool patients into thinking the pills were working. 

Some  had  acetaminophen,  which  can  temporarily  lower  malarial  fevers  but  does 
not  kill  parasites.  Some  had  chloroquine,  an  old  and  now  nearly  useless  anti-
malarial. 

One had a sulfa drug that in allergic people could cause a fatal rash. 
And  some  had  a  little  real  artemisinin—not  enough  to  cure,  but  enough  to 
produce  a  false  positive  on  the  common  Fast  Red  dye  test  for  the  genuine  article. 
Those would not merely fool a laboratory, Dr. Newton noted. They could also fos-
ter  drug-resistant  parasites,  so  if  patients  were  lucky  enough  to  get  genuine 
artemisinin treatment later, they might have already developed an incurable strain 
and could die anyway. 

Such  resistant  strains  could  spread  from  person  to  person  by  mosquito  and  ulti-
mately  render  the  drug  ineffective,  as  already  happened  with  chloroquine  and 
Fansidar, two earlier malaria cures. 

‘‘We make no apology for the use of the term ‘manslaughter’ to describe this crimi-
nal lethal trade,’’ Dr. Newton and his co-authors said last year in an article in The 
Public Library of Science Medicine. ‘‘Indeed, some might call it murder.’’ 

In  the  United  States,  finding  counterfeit  drugs  in  pharmacies  is  very  rare,  ‘‘but 
we’ve  seen  a  lot  from  Internet  sellers  posing  as  legitimate  pharmacies,’’  said  Dr. 
Ilisa Bernstein, director of pharmacy affairs for the Food and Drug Administration. 
Thus  far,  few  counterfeits  of  life-saving  drugs  have  been  found  in  the  United 
States. Most are drugs used or abused for fun, like Viagra, the painkiller Oxycontin 
and  sleeping  pills.  Investigators  have,  however,  found  fake  statins,  which  could 
eventually  lead  to  a  heart  attack,  and  fake  Tamiflu,  which  could  be  fatal  in  a  pan-
demic of lethal flu. 

Fake drugs have a long history; the film noir masterpiece ‘‘The Third Man,’’ based 

on a real criminal case, involves adulterated penicillin in post-war Vienna. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

54 

And  in  the  1600s,  after  conquistadors  discovered  that  South  American  cinchona 
bark  cured  malaria,  Europe  was  flooded  with  fake  bark.  ‘‘It  caused  a  great  loss  of 
confidence in it as a cure,’’ Dr. Newton said. ‘‘We’re seeing history repeat itself.’’ 

The problem with antimalarials is worst in Asia, but is growing rapidly in Africa. 
For example, in September, Nigerian authorities found $25,000 worth of counter-
feit malaria and blood pressure drugs concealed in a shipment of purses from China. 
The temptation for counterfeiters is likely to grow because money to fight malaria 

is being poured into the Third World. 

President  Bush’s  $1.2  billion  Malaria  Initiative  avoids  the  problem  by  buying  di-
rectly  from  Western  pharmaceutical  companies  like  Novartis,  said  Dr.  Trenton  K. 
Ruebush II, an adviser to the initiative. 

By  contrast,  the  Global  Fund  to  Fight  AIDS,  Tuberculosis  and  Malaria  gives 
money  directly  to  poor  countries  to  buy  their  own  drugs,  and  sends  auditors  to  fol-
low  up.  But  80  percent  of  the  world’s  nations,  pharmacology  experts  estimate,  lack 
drug agencies capable of detecting sophisticated counterfeits. 

‘‘The  countries  are  supposed  to  purchase  from  W.H.O.-qualified  manufacturers, 
but there are places where things can go wrong where we wouldn’t necessarily have 
control,’’  said  Dr.  Bernard  Nahlen,  the  fund’s  malariologist.  ‘‘In  some  countries, 
there  is,  let’s  say,  a  certain  lethargy  about  paying  attention  to  these  issues.  You 
have to take the government’s word for it, and anybody can pull the wool over any-
body’s eyes.’’ 

The Global Fund, which appointed a new director on Feb. 8, is considering adopt-

ing central purchasing, a spokesman said. 

A  global  alert  system  for  counterfeit  drugs  has  existed  for  16  years,  first  by  fax, 
and  now  on  the  World  Health  Organization  website,  said  Dr.  Valerio  Reggi,  chief 
of the anticounterfeiting task force created last year by the organization. 

‘‘But it isn’t used very much,’’ he said. ‘‘Regulators are human beings, and it’s dif-

ficult to identify a benefit for those who report to it.’’ 

Dr.  Reggi  said  the  task  force  would  try  to  change  that  by  drawing  attention  to 
the problem and getting harsher laws passed. As he pointed out, in many countries, 
‘‘counterfeiting  a  T-shirt  means  10  years  in  jail,  but  counterfeiting  a  medicine  can 
be a misdemeanor.’’ 

Parade Magazine—February 18, 2007 

PRESCRIPTION DRUGS SEEMS SAFE, BUT BEWARE—IS YOUR MEDICINE DANGEROUS TO 

YOUR HEALTH 

By Tom Zoellner 

Some call it the most perfect crime in medicine: Buy some empty gelatin capsules, 
fill  them  with  worthless  powder,  print  up  a  phony  label  and  sell  them  to  a  drug 
wholesaler  who  has  no  scruples  or  just  chooses  to  look  the  other  way.  The 
unsuspecting  consumer  who  buys  the  drugs  from  his  corner  pharmacy  will  almost 
certainly  never  discover  why  he  is  getting  sicker  instead  of  better.  This  is  called 
‘‘drug counterfeiting,’’ a business that has expanded in the last 5 years. Phony drugs 
already  have  taken  the  lives  of  several  Americans,  and  the  perpetrators  have 
walked off with nearly $35 billion in black market profits. 

Thankfully,  the  chances  are  fairly  slim  that  your  daily  pills  could  be  fakes,  but 
the  problem  is  worsening  as  counterfeiters  become  more  savvy.  The  World  Health 
Organization  estimates  that  up  to  10  percent  of  the  medications  sold  globally  are 
actually  counterfeit.  The  number  in  the  United  States  is  much  lower—experts  peg 
it at 1 percent—but the practice is growing as dealers of illicit street drugs like co-
caine  and  Ecstasy  discover  there  are  more  profits  and  less  risks  in  selling  phony 
tablets of drugs like Ambien, Lipitor and Cipro. 

‘‘We’re seeing a lot more of this than ever before,’’ says John Theriault, vice presi-
dent for global security at the pharmaceutical giant Pfizer. The problem has become 
serious  enough  for  Pfizer  to  develop  its  own  private  team  of  17  former  law-enforce-
ment  agents  to  investigate  counterfeit  drugs.  Theriault,  an  ex-FBI  agent,  says  his 
team  has  come  across  drug  labs  in  homes,  hotel  rooms  and  overseas  warehouses. 
Phony  pills  are  put  in  conventional  plastic  bottles  that  sometimes  have  labels 
soaked  off  from  legitimate  shipments.  One  such  case  in  2003  involved  as  many  as 
18  million  tablets  of  bogus  Lipitor  that  had  been  manufactured  in  Costa  Rica.  The 
counterfeiters had purchased their ingredients from the Hong Kong office of a Swiss 
company  and  even  embossed  the  fake  product  with  a  real-looking  Pfizer  logo.  The 
‘‘Lipitor’’  was  then  marketed  through  a  drug  wholesaler  operating  in  the  Midwest 
and  sold  through  legitimate  pharmacies.  The  pills  reached  Pfizer’s  attention  only 
after  American  customers  began  to  complain  about  their  bitter  taste.  It’s  possible 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

55 

that  more  than  600,000  people  could  have  received  bottles  containing  the  fake 
Lipitor tablets. 

But  not  every  counterfeit  drug  is  cooked  up  in  an  illicit  lab.  Some  unscrupulous 
suppliers have been known to boost their profits by ‘‘uplabeling’’—for example, pass-
ing off a 10mg dose of a drug as 40mg. Expiration dates may be altered too. Experts 
say  the  vulnerabilities  in  the  supply  chain  also  can  be  traced  to  secondary  drug 
wholesalers, who face pressure to keep costs low and may not be inclined to scruti-
nize  the  source  of  their  purchase.  Where  the  drug  changes  hands  several  times, 
that’s  where  you  have  the  problem,  says  one  industry  expert.  The  bogus  drugs  go 
from a wholesaler’s warehouse to a retail pharmacy and into a consumer’s medicine 
cabinet. 

Not  surprisingly,  the  Internet  is  another  common  source  of  counterfeits.  Direct- 
to-consumer  websites  offer  great  deals  that  are  literally  too  good  to  be  true.  ‘‘You 
can  find  plenty  of  ‘Canadian’  sites  that  aren’t  really  Canadian,’’  says  Pfizer  spokes-
man Bryant Haskins. ‘‘They’re decorated with maple leaves, but we’ve tracked them 
to Belize, Russia, Vietnam—all over the place.’’ 

The  deception  often  goes  further  than  that.  ‘‘Overseas  counterfeiters  are  also 
known  for  selling  ‘generic’  versions  of  drugs  where  no  generics  exist,’’  points  out 
Joan  Todd  of  Eli  Lilly  and  Company.  ‘‘The  consumer  assumes  that  somebody  out 
there  is  regulating  this.  But  anybody  can  set  up  a  website  and  sell  fake  medicine.’’ 
In  one  notorious  case,  Lilly  investigators  found  a  machine  used  to  create  bogus 
drugs  in  which  a  toilet  seat  had  been  jerry-rigged  into  the  device.  ‘‘This  obviously 
does not adhere to good manufacturing procedure,’’ remarks Todd dryly. 

Last  year,  the  U.S.  Food  and  Drug  Administration  investigated  53  cases  of  drug 
counterfeiting—up  from  six  just  5  years  ago.  Though  it  is  difficult  to  chart  how 
many people unwittingly ingest counterfeit drugs each year, the injuries and deaths 
likely  number  in  the  hundreds.  Experts  say  that  thousands  of  Americans  doubt-
lessly have been affected without even knowing it. 

Most  ersatz-drug  fatalities  almost  certainly  have  escaped  notice,  explains 
Haskins.  Autopsies  are  not  routine  for  the  sick  or  elderly,  and  few  doctors  would 
ever  suspect  that  the  drugs  they  prescribed  were  nothing  more  than  useless  filler. 
What  harms  a  patient  is  usually  not  toxic  substances  in  the  phony  drug  but  a  lack 
of the potentially lifesaving medication they are supposed to be receiving. 

Besides,  drug  counterfeiters  rarely  set  out  to  kill  their  customers—such  a  move 
would invite police attention and run contrary to their economic interests. The logic 
is  similar  to  that  of  a  parasite,  which  seeks  not  to  kill  the  host  but  to  feed  off  it 
for as long as possible. This is why expensive drugs that treat long-term conditions 
such as AIDS are the most likely to be counterfeited. Erectile-dysfunction drugs are 
also  a  prime  target  because  of  the  big  money  involved—and  the  disinclination  of 
many patients to complain about a lack of results. 

Solving  this  problem  will  not  be  quick  or  easy.  Rep.  Mike  Rogers  (R.,  Mich.)  has 
proposed  raising  the  penalties  for  prescription  drug  counterfeiters  from  3  years  in 
prison  to  20  years,  putting  the  perpetrators  on  an  equal  plane  with  heroin  dealers. 
The bill he proposed died in committee last session but was reintroduced earlier this 
month. 

The  Food  and  Drug  Administration  also  has  encouraged  drug  companies  to  track 
their pills after they leave the factory. GlaxoSmithKline, for example, now inscribes 
its  pills  and  packages  with  invisible  text  symbols  to  authenticate  its  product.  But 
these markings would be checked only after a counterfeit suspicion arises. 

Tracking  is  becoming  easier,  however,  with  a  technology  known  as  Radio  Fre-
quency  Identification  (RFID),  an  advanced  variety  of  bar  code  that  is  now  used  in 
the  E-ZPass  highway  toll  system,  among  other  places.  This  technology  would  allow 
officials to scan entire pallets of drugs instead of checking individual barcodes. Such 
a  system  would  make  it  hard  to  slip  bogus  products  into  the  supply  chain,  because 
drugs  could  be  tracked  from  factory  to  pharmacy  counter.  Progress  with  RFID  has 
been slow due to the high costs involved. So far, only limited shipments of expensive 
drugs like the painkiller Oxycontin contain RFID tags on their labels. 

One thing everyone agrees on: The problem is becoming widespread, and the sup-
ply chain is still vulnerable. Up to 40 million of the prescription bottles handed out 
in  the  U.S.  today  are  filled  with  substances  that  aren’t  what  they  claim  to  be,  ac-
cording to the National Association of Boards of Pharmacy. 

‘‘If  the  system  becomes  further  compromised,  it  will  get  to  the  point  where  it’s 
very  difficult  to  fix,’’  says  Carmen  Catizone,  the  association’s  executive  director. 
‘‘Imagine  someone  going  to  the  emergency  room  for  a  heart  attack  and  being  given 
counterfeit drugs by the hospital staff. This could cripple the whole health-care sys-
tem.’’ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

56 

How to Protect Yourself 

Here are a few precautions you can take to avoid counterfeit drugs: 
Don’t buy prescription drugs online unless it’s through the website of a legitimate 

pharmacy. 

Look  closely  at  your  medicine.  Note  any  signs  of  runny  coloring  or  shoddy  logos 

on the pills. 

Watch for changes in appearance or taste in the prescriptions you regularly take. 
Bring  any  reliable  medication  that  suddenly  begins  to  have  no  effect  to  your  doc-

tor right away. 

Learn more about the counterfeit drug problem in America: 

On its website, the U.S. Food and Drug Administration posts the latest warnings 
about  counterfeit  drugs  and  offers  other  important  consumer  information.  http:// 
www.fda.gov/oc/initiatives/counterfeit/. 
Report a suspicious drug: 

The  National  Fraud  Information  Center/Internet  Fraud  Watch  (NFIC/IFW)  tells 
you step-by-step how to notify authorities if you think a drug you’ve bought is fake. 
http://fraud.org/fakedrugs/. 

Senator DORGAN. I’ve given you a bit more time. 
You’ve chaired these hearings before in the Congress, and—— 
Mr. TAUZIN. I apologize. 
Senator  DORGAN.—understand  we  have  five  witnesses  on  this 
panel, and I want to hear the rest of them. But we appreciate your 
testimony. 

William Schultz is a partner in Zuckerman Spaeder. He was pre-
viously  the  Deputy  Commissioner  for  Policy  at  the  Food  and  Drug 
Administration, which is the position that Dr. Lutter now holds. 

Mr.  Schultz,  thank  you  for  being  with  us,  and  you  may  proceed 

with your testimony. 

STATEMENT OF WILLIAM B. SCHULTZ, PARTNER, 

ZUCKERMAN SPAEDER, LLP 

Mr.  SCHULTZ.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman  and  members  of  the 
Committee.  I  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  testify  on  the  Pharma-
ceutical Market Access and Drug Safety Act of 2007, S. 242. 

This  carefully  crafted  and  comprehensive  bill,  if  enacted,  would 
significantly  improve  the  safety  of  drugs  used  by  patients  in  the 
United  States  today.  It  would  also  make  safe,  affordable  drugs 
available to many Americans who are, today, using drugs for which 
no generics are available, and who can’t afford the brand prescrip-
tion drugs that they need. 

One  only  has  to  listen  to  the  testimony  of  Dr.  Lutter  to  under-
stand  why  this  bill  would  improve  the  safety  of  drugs  used  in  this 
country today. As Dr. Lutter has told us, today we are being flood-
ed with counterfeit and otherwise unsafe drugs. We also know that 
every year American patients purchase millions of prescriptions by 
mail  order  from  Canada.  I  think  Dr.  Lutter  said  the  2004  report 
had the number 25 million prescriptions coming across the borders 
in that year. 

So, the question before Congress is not whether to allow patients 
to import drugs from Canada because, as a country, we already do 
that. Instead, I submit that the real question before the Committee 
is whether S. 242 will make drugs imported from Canada safer. 

There are at least five reasons why American citizens will be sig-

nificantly better off if S. 242 is enacted. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

57 

First, the bill will carefully regulate Canadian exporters and U.S. 
importers.  Even  the  FDA,  at  times,  has  conceded  that  drugs  from 
legitimate  Canadian  pharmacies  are  safe.  They’re  probably  as  safe 
as  drugs  sold  in  the  United  States.  The  problem  is  that,  today, 
American  consumers  have  no  way  of  knowing  which  drugs  they 
purchase  are  from  legitimate  exporters  and  which  ones  are  not. 
Under the bill, the FDA will approve each Canadian exporter, and 
the  exporters  from  other  countries  that  the  agency  designates  as 
having acceptable drug-approval systems. The bill also directs FDA 
to  list  safe  Canadian  sources  on  the  Internet  so  that  patients  can 
know which Canadian exporters are legitimate. 

Second,  under  the  bill,  the  FDA  would  regularly  inspect  foreign 
plants  that  manufacture  drugs  exported  to  the  United  States.  Al-
though, as was pointed out before, to date FDA does inspect foreign 
facilities  that  manufacture  U.S.  drugs,  it  does  not  inspect  plants 
that  manufacture  Canadian  drugs,  even  if  they  are  imported  into 
the United States. 

Third, the bill allows U.S. wholesalers and pharmacies to import 
drugs  from  Canada,  and  this  system  would  allow  for  even  more 
complete protection, because it provides for monitoring the chain of 
custody  from  the  manufacturer  to  the  wholesaler.  A  mechanism  is 
also  provided  for  FDA  to  examine  any  differences  between  the  im-
ported drug and the drug sold in the United States. 

Fourth, the bill has an innovative provision that would direct the 
Federal Reserve Board to issue regulations to stop credit card pay-
ments to persons illegally exporting the drugs to the United States. 
And,  fifth,  the  bill  provides  the  FDA  with  the  necessary  re-
sources. Today, the agency has little or no resources to inspect for-
eign facilities that inspect Canadian drugs—manufacture Canadian 
drugs  or  to  monitor  imports.  The  user-fee  provision  in  the  bill 
would provide those resources. 

Mr.  Chairman,  today  consumers  are  purchasing  millions  of  dol-
lars of low-cost prescription drugs from Canada. They are also pur-
chasing inferior drugs from Canada and other countries in an effort 
to  gain  access  to  affordable  medicines.  But,  today,  consumers  do 
not know how to separate the good drugs from the bad drugs. This 
bill  would  create  a  stream  of  safe  and  affordable  drugs  from  Can-
ada and other countries certified by FDA. It will make it easier for 
the  agency  to  keep  unsafe  drugs  out  of  the  United  States,  to  the 
great benefit of American patients. 

Let’s  not  forget  what’s  at  stake  here.  There  are  many  important 
drugs that patients in this country need for which low-cost, generic 
drugs are not available. These same drugs are available in Canada 
at  a  significantly  lower  price,  often  at  savings  as  much  as  50  per-
cent.  If  this  were  any  other  product,  our  trade  policy  would  allow 
consumers to purchase a less-expensive alternative, if they wished. 
And  this  is  not  just  a  matter  of  saving  money,  as  it  is  with  most 
products.  For  many  patients,  it’s  a  matter  of  their  health,  because 
they  cannot  afford  the  drug  at  the  U.S.  price.  Today,  the  only  way 
for  these  patients  to  protect  their  health  is  to  break  the  law,  and, 
even when they do so, they do it at the risk of importing fraudulent 
and  a  potentially  unsafe  product.  S.  242  will  make  those  patients 
law-abiders.  It  includes  important  measures  which  will  go  a  long 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

58 

way toward assuring that the drugs being imported in this country 
are safe and effective. 

I’d be happy to answer any questions. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Schultz follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF WILLIAM B. SCHULTZ, PARTNER, 

ZUCKERMAN SPAEDER, LLP 

I  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  testify  on  the  issue  of  drug  importation.  I  have 
been  working  on  issues  related  to  food  and  drug  law  for  my  entire  career.  I  have 
worked  on  these  issues  as  a  public  interest  attorney,  a  Congressional  staffer,  an 
FDA  official  and  now  as  an  attorney  in  private  practice.  I  have  worked  on  issues 
related  to  patients  obtaining  drugs  from  foreign  sources  both  inside  and  outside  of 
the Food and Drug Administration. During my tenure with FDA, I initiated a study 
of  the  sale  of  prescription  drugs  over  the  Internet.  This  examination  was  precip-
itated  by,  among  other  things,  concerns  over  patients  obtaining  illegal  drugs  from 
foreign  sources.  During  my  time  in  private  practice,  I  became  involved  with  issues 
related to the importation of drugs from Canada. In 2003, I represented a Canadian 
pharmacy  that  wanted  to  develop  a  mechanism  for  U.S.  citizens  to  legally  obtain 
FDA  approved  prescription  drugs  at  lower  prices.  The  following  year,  I  represented 
the  State  of  Illinois  during  its  efforts  to  assist  their  citizens  in  obtaining  lower 
priced  prescription  drugs  from  Canada.  Specifically,  I  helped  these  clients  under-
stand FDA requirements and policies in this area. 

I am here today to express my support for the Pharmaceutical Market Access and 
Drug  Safety  Act  of  2007  (S.  242).  This  legislation  addresses  a  substantial  and  seri-
ous  problem—patients  illegally  obtaining  potentially  dangerous  prescription  drugs 
from  foreign  sources.  For  the  reasons  discussed  below,  I  believe  this  bill  would  sig-
nificantly advance public health by creating a safe means for U.S. citizens to obtain 
lower-priced  prescription  drugs  from  countries  that  have  appropriate  protections  in 
place through an FDA-controlled mechanism. 

In  my  testimony  today,  I  will  start  by  discussing  the  problem  with  the  current 
system  of  regulation  and  then  explain  why  I  think  this  legislation  would  give  U.S. 
citizens far more protection than they have today. 
I.  Consumers  Currently  Are  Purchasing  Drugs  From  Foreign  Sources  and 

Current Law Is Not Protecting Them 

The  Food  Drug  and  Cosmetic  Act  (the  ‘‘FD&C  Act’’)  does  not  permit  individuals 
to  purchase  prescription  drugs  from  Canada  or  any  other  country.  Nevertheless, 
U.S.  consumers  are  doing  just  that,  and  for  all  practical  purposes,  much  of  this  ac-
tivity  has  been  blessed  by  FDA.  For  example,  FDA  regularly  permits  patients  to 
bring  with  them  into  the  United  States  a  90-day  supply  of  drugs  that  they  pur-
chased outside of the United States. Even though this activity is technically illegal, 
as  a  matter  of  its  enforcement  discretion  FDA  permits  the  import  of  prescription 
drugs  for  personal  use.  This  policy  has  been  in  effect  for  many  years,  during  both 
Democrat and Republican administrations. 

In  other  instances,  FDA  policy  does  not  permit  the  activity.  For  example,  there 
is a well-known and widespread practice of consumers illegally purchasing prescrip-
tion drugs from foreign Internet websites and mail order companies. Although FDA 
has  not  condoned  this  practice,  it  has  not  been  able  to  effectively  stop  it.  As  FDA 
has  repeatedly  told  Congress,  thousands  of  packages  containing  prescription  drugs 
from foreign counties enter the United States daily. Neither FDA nor U.S. Customs 
and Border Protection (‘‘Customs’’) can effectively police this practice. Moreover, the 
law,  as  it  currently  stands,  makes  it  extremely  difficult  and  burdensome  for  FDA 
and Customs to stop the illegal packages that they are able to identify. 

It  is  not  difficult  to  understand  why  consumers  import  drugs  from  Canada  and 
other  countries.  The  price  difference  between  prescription  drugs  purchased  in  the 
United  States  and  those  purchased  in  Canada  is  significant.  The  difference  can  be 
as much as 50 percent. For many patients, this is the difference between being able 
to  obtain  needed  medicines  and  forgoing  such  medicines.  In  recent  years,  the  num-
ber of prescription drugs being brought or shipped into the United States from Can-
ada and other counties has been rising dramatically. 

Because  the  FD&C  Act  does  not  specifically  permit  patients  to  obtain  their  pre-
scription  drugs  from  foreign  countries,  it  does  not  include  any  protections  for  con-
sumers  who  are  engaging  in  it.  As  FDA  has  repeatedly  told  Congress,  the  risks  to 
patients are real and they are great. Most patients are probably receiving medicines 
that are comparable to those sold in the United States. But others may be receiving 
medicines  that  are  expired,  subpotent,  contaminated  or  counterfeit.  The  labeling 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

59 

may  be  in  another  language,  thus  depriving  the  patient  of  important  information 
about  the  drug.  Moreover,  if  the  patient  experiences  problems  and  they  manage  to 
trace  it  to  the  drug  (which  is  not  likely  since  they  usually  assume  the  drug  they 
got  is  safe  and  effective),  they  probably  have  no  recourse.  FDA’s  ability  to  take  ac-
tion  against  foreign  suppliers  is  quite  limited.  The  current  system  leaves  American 
patients  who  obtain  their  prescription  medicines  from  foreign  countries  completely 
unprotected. 
II.  The  Bill  Would  Give  Patients  Who  Receive  Their  Prescription  Drugs 

From the Designated Countries Important Protections 

S. 242 recognizes, as have even FDA officials, that prescription drugs sold by Ca-
nadian pharmacies are safe. The challenge is to prevent the import of unsafe drugs 
from  Canada  and  other  countries.  The  bill  addresses  this  issue  in  two  ways.  First, 
it creates a mechanism for individuals to obtain prescription medicines for their per-
sonal use from registered Canadian pharmacies (or from pharmacies in another per-
mitted country if FDA determines that that country’s pharmacy laws are equivalent 
to  Canada’s).  Second,  it  creates  a  mechanism  for  U.S.  pharmacies  and  wholesalers 
to  commercially  import  medicines  from  a  defined  set  of  countries  under  controlled 
conditions.  Both  provisions  require  that  the  drug  be  an  FDA-approved  drug  and  be 
manufactured  in  an  FDA-inspected  facility.  I  will  discuss  each  of  these  provisions 
separately. 
A. Personal Importation 

S.  242  creates  a  legal  mechanism  for  Canadian  (and  potentially  other  FDA  des-
ignated) pharmacies to ship drugs to U.S. consumers who have a valid prescription. 
As  I  stated  earlier,  U.S.  citizens  have  been  receiving  low  price  drugs  from  Canada 
for many years. By formalizing and adding specific requirements for individual sup-
plies, the bill is adding protections for those citizens. I believe the protections in the 
bill  address  many  of  the  concerns  that  have  been  raised  by  opponents  of  the  prac-
tice.  For  example,  FDA  must  approve  and  inspect  the  Canadian  exporter.  Today 
many of the drugs that are sold in the United States under approved new drug ap-
plications  are  manufactured  in  facilities  located  in  foreign  countries  and  FDA  has 
the responsibility for inspecting those plants. 

For Canadian exporters, the bill directs FDA to inspect no less than 12 times an-
nually,  which  far  exceeds  FDA’s  inspection  frequency  domestically.  Moreover,  ex-
porters are required to mark their packages in a way that allows FDA and Customs 
to  identify  legal  imports.  In  addition,  FDA  can  require  exporters  to  incorporate 
anticounterfeiting technology or track and trace technology. The protections are de-
signed  to  address  the  concerns  that  Canadian  drugs  are  not  actually  coming  from 
Canada  or  that  Canada  will  become  a  dumping  ground  for  counterfeit  drugs  and 
FDA  will  not  be  in  a  position  to  police  the  activity.  Moreover,  the  bill  directs  FDA 
to  publicly  list  safe  sources  of  Canadian  drugs  so  that  patients  will  be  directed  to 
the  sources  listed  by  the  Agency.  Finally,  by  including  a  user  fee  for  exporters,  the 
legislation will ensure that FDA has the resources it needs to implement these pro-
visions. 
B. Commercial Importation 

S.  242  also  creates  a  mechanism  for  wholesalers  and  pharmacies  to  import  pre-
scription  drugs  from  Canada,  the  European  Union,  Australia,  New  Zealand,  Japan, 
and  Switzerland.  It  includes  safeguards  to  ensure  that  such  products  are  safe. 
Wholesalers and pharmacies that want to participate must register with FDA. They 
must  provide  a  full  chain  of  custody  and  FDA  may  require  anticounterfeiting  tech-
nologies.  Again,  the  bill  includes  requirements  that  are  more  protective  than  those 
imposed  for  drugs  sold  domestically.  S.  242  also  requires  manufacturers  of  a  drug 
sought  to  be  imported  to  notify  FDA  of  any  differences  in  their  drug  from  the  U.S. 
approved version. FDA must approve the difference before the drug can be imported. 
Again, I applaud the sponsors of the bill for including user fees to ensure that FDA 
has the means to oversee the program as intended. The bill also allows FDA to ease 
its way into the new system by limiting the number of participating pharmacies and 
wholesalers and then allowing that number to increase gradually over time. 

By  creating  a  pathway  for  bulk  importation,  the  bill  provides  a  broader  mecha-
nism  that  allows  consumers  to  obtain  less  expensive  prescription  drugs.  If  con-
sumers  have  domestic  access  to  lower-priced  prescription  drugs,  they  will  not  feel 
compelled to obtain their drugs from illegal, foreign sources. This legislation will sig-
nificantly decrease the number of patients turning to illegal Internet pharmacies or 
mail order companies for their medications. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

60 

C. Stopping Illegal Imports 

I believe that this legislation will succeed because it also attacks the problem de-
fensively;  in  other  words  it  includes  provisions  that  make  it  easier  for  FDA  to  stop 
the  illegal  importation  of  drugs.  Under  current  law,  FDA  is  required  to  go  through 
a  number  of  time  consuming  steps  if  it  wants  to  detain  an  illegally  imported  drug. 
Here  a  simple  notice  to  the  intended  recipient  of  the  drug  explaining  how  they  can 
import  drugs  legally  from  Canada  is  all  that  is  required.  Moreover,  the  bill  directs 
the Federal Reserve Board to issue regulations to stop credit card payments to per-
sons  illegally  exporting  drugs  to  the  United  States.  In  my  opinion,  this  dual  ap-
proach  to  the  problem  of  illegal  drugs  entering  the  United  States—namely  provi-
sions  to  stop  the  entrance  and  provisions  to  permit  a  safe  legal  alternative—is  an 
excellent way to effectively protect American consumers. 
III. Conclusion 

I  support  this  legislation  because  it  creates  legal  pathways  for  consumers  to  ob-
tain  lower  priced  prescription  medications  from  designated  foreign  sources.  As  I 
stated earlier, these pathways are critical to patients who simply cannot afford pre-
scription medicines at the prices they must pay in this country. This is the solution 
for patients who otherwise must either forgo their medicine or obtain it illegally and 
thus, potentially unsafely. 

Opponents of this legislation have repeatedly expressed concern that it opens the 
door  to  dangerous  foreign  drugs  entering  the  U.S.  I  disagree.  These  opponents  are 
ignoring  the  world  as  it  exists  today  and  has  for  many  years—where  a  growing 
number  of  Americans  regularly  import  prescription  drugs  from  Canada  and  other 
countries.  In  2004,  an  HHS  task  force  reported  that  in  2003  approximately  12  mil-
lion prescription drug products had entered the U.S. from Canada alone. The report 
estimated  that  an  equal  amount  currently  is  coming  in  from  the  rest  of  the  world. 
I firmly believe that if Congress creates a legal mechanism for providing lower cost 
drugs, consumers will no longer resort to buying substandard or possibly dangerous 
drugs off of illegal Internet websites or mail order companies. Patients are resorting 
to this practice because their only other option is to go without their medicine. This 
legislation  creates  options:  it  creates  pathways  to  ensure  that  patients  have  access 
to  safe  and  effective,  lower-priced  medicines.  Moreover,  the  bill  puts  an  end  to 
FDA’s current policy, which effectively condones the breaking of the very laws FDA 
has  been  created  to  enforce.  For  this  reason,  I  support  passage  of  this  legislation. 
I  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  testify  today.  I  would  be  happy  to  answer  any 

questions. 

Senator DORGAN. Mr. Schultz, thank you very much for your tes-

timony. 

Next,  we  will  hear  from  Dr.  Vernon,  John  Vernon,  Professor  of 

Economics at the University of Connecticut. 
Dr. Vernon, thank you for being with us. 

STATEMENT OF DR. JOHN A. VERNON, 

ASSISTANT PROFESSOR, DEPARTMENT OF FINANCE, 
UNIVERSITY OF CONNECTICUT SCHOOL OF BUSINESS 

Dr. VERNON. Thank you. 
Mr. Chairman and members of the Committee, thank you for in-
viting me to testify on the policy implications of pharmaceutical im-
portation. 

My  name  is  John  Vernon,  and  I  am  a  professor  in  the  School  of 
Business at the University of Connecticut, and a Faculty Research 
Fellow  with  the  National  Bureau  of  Economic  Research.  I  also 
serve part time as Senior Advisor for Economic Policy at the FDA, 
though  my  testimony  will  be  based  on  academic  research  I  have 
undertaken  at  the  University  of  Connecticut.  The  opinions  I  am 
about to express are entirely my own. 

My testimony is neither in support of, nor opposition to, importa-
tion.  Rather,  I  am  only  advocating  that  a  balanced  economic  per-
spective  be  adopted  on  this  important  public  policy  issue,  one  that 
places  the  economic  costs  of  importation  on  equal  footing  with  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

61 

economic  benefits.  To  date,  I  do  not  think  this  has  occurred.  The 
economic costs, I fear, have received relatively little attention. 

For the purposes of the points I wish to make, let us assume that 
a new importation policy will be effective in achieving its objective, 
it  will  significantly  reduce  drug  prices  in  the  U.S.  Precisely  how 
importation  will  achieve  this  objective  is  the  subject  of  some  de-
bate, but one possibility is through a forced sales provision. 

To  begin,  the  economic  benefits  of  pharmaceutical  importation 
are obvious. U.S. consumers will pay lower prices for their prescrip-
tion drugs. This is because most foreign governments regulate drug 
prices.  The  benefits  of  regulated  prices  are  readily  apparent  and 
straightforward  to  measure.  The  same,  however,  cannot  be  said 
about  the  costs.  This  may  explain  why  they  have  received  less  at-
tention. Please allow me to explain. 

Once  a  new  pharmaceutical  has  been  developed,  which  typically 
takes 12 to 15 years, and all the safety and efficacy data have been 
collected  and  analyzed,  the  marginal  cost  of  a  single  pill  is  quite 
small.  This  is  because  the  final  product  of  the  R&D  is  essentially 
just  new  information,  much  like  computer  software,  information 
that  has  taken  many  years  and  hundreds  of  millions  of  dollars  to 
obtain.  In  the  absence  of  pharmaceutical  patents  and  intellectual 
property rights and the ability of firms to price their products well 
above  marginal  cost,  no  firm  or  investor  would  invest  the  time  or 
money  needed  to  develop  this  information.  Thus,  there  must  be  a 
sizable  reward  to  induce  the  R&D.  As  is,  only  three  out  of  every 
ten new drugs generate returns in excess of average R&D costs. 

Pharmaceutical importation, precisely to the extent it is success-
ful in lowering U.S. drug prices, will reduce the incentives to invest 
in R&D. The expected returns on R&D projects will fall, and some 
projects will be terminated, and some projects may not be initiated. 
The  result  will  be  a  decline  in  the  rate  of  pharmaceutical  innova-
tion. Fewer new drugs will be developed, and it will take longer to 
find  cures  for  many  diseases.  Unlike  the  benefits  of  the  policy,  the 
costs  of  the  policy  are  more  difficult  to  appreciate  and  quantify. 
This is because of the time lag and uncertainty associated with the 
R&D process. 

My  research  is  focused  on  these  costs,  and,  specifically,  the  eco-
nomic  relationships  between  pharmaceutical  prices,  profits,  and 
R&D.  My  colleagues  and  I  have  studied  the  sensitivity  of  R&D 
spending  to  pharmaceutical  prices  and  profits,  using  a  variety  of 
research methods. I will now summarize these results, and specifi-
cally  the  results  from  two  recently  published  studies.  Now,  these 
studies  have  been  vetted  by  the  academic  peer-review  process  and 
published in professional economics journals. 

The  first  study  used  publicly  available,  firm-level  data  and  ex-
ploited  observed  differences  in  U.S.  and  non-U.S.  pharmaceutical 
profit  margins.  Using  established  economic  models  and  statistical 
techniques,  we  estimated  that  a  new  policy  that  reduces  pharma-
ceutical  profit  margins  in  the  U.S.  to  non-U.S.  levels  will  cause 
firm R&D spending to decline by between 25 and 35 percent. Phar-
maceutical importation will theoretically have this effect. 

The  second  study  used  publicly  available,  industry-level  data, 
and  studied  the  direct  link  between  U.S.  drug  prices  and  industry 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

62 

R&D  spending.  We  estimated  that  for  every  10  percent  reduction 
in  U.S.  drug  prices,  industry  R&D  spending  will  fall  by  6  percent. 
In  sum,  the  empirical  evidence  suggests  R&D  spending  is  very 
sensitive  to  pharmaceutical  prices  and  profits,  as  predicted  by  eco-
nomic  theory.  This  is  in  contrast  to  some  of  the  noneconomic  no-
tions  one  often  hears,  such  as,  ‘‘Lower  prices  and  profits  won’t  re-
duce  R&D  spending,  because  firms  will  still  have  enough  profit  to 
cover  their  R&D,’’  and,  ‘‘These  firms  have  to  invest  in  R&D.  What 
else are they going to do?’’ 

The  point  of  my  testimony  is  that  the  benefits  associated  with 
lower U.S. drug prices will unequivocally come at a cost: lower lev-
els  of  R&D  and  a  reduced  rate  of  innovation.  It  is  imperative,  I 
think, that these costs be balanced carefully against the benefits of 
importing  price-regulated  pharmaceuticals  from  abroad.  This  is 
particularly true in light the recent evidence on the significant con-
tributions  of  pharmaceutical  and  medical  R&D  to  human  health 
and life expectancies in the U.S. 

Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Dr. Vernon follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DR. JOHN A. VERNON, ASSISTANT PROFESSOR, 

DEPARTMENT OF FINANCE, UNIVERSITY OF CONNECTICUT SCHOOL OF BUSINESS 

Mr.  Chairman  and  members  of  the  Committee,  thank  you  for  inviting  me  to  tes-
tify  today  on  the  policy  implications  of  pharmaceutical  importation.  My  name  is 
John  Vernon  and  I  am  a  professor  in  the  School  of  Business  at  the  University  of 
Connecticut  and  a  Faculty  Research  Fellow  with  the  National  Bureau  of  Economic 
Research  (NBER).  I  also  serve  part-time  as  Senior  Adviser  for  Economic  Policy  in 
the Office of Policy and Planning at the Food and Drug Administration, but my tes-
timony  will  be  based  on  academic  research  I  have  undertaken  at  the  University  of 
Connecticut.  The  opinions  I  am  about  to  express  are  entirely  my  own;  they  do  not 
necessarily reflect those of the institutions and organizations with which I am affili-
ated. 

As  you  will  soon  see,  my  testimony  is  neither  in  support  of,  nor  in  opposition  to, 
importation.  Rather,  I  am  only  advocating  that  a  balanced  economic  perspective  be 
adopted  on  this  important  public  policy  issue—one  that  places  the  economic  costs 
of  importation  on  equal  footing  with  the  economic  benefits.  To  date,  I  do  not  think 
this  has  occurred:  the  economic  costs  of  importation  have  received  relatively  little 
attention. 

For  the  purposes  of  the  points  I  wish  to  make,  let  us  assume  a  new  importation 
policy  will  be  effective  in  achieving  its  objective:  it  will  significantly  reduce  drug 
prices in the U.S. Precisely how importation will achieve this objective is the subject 
of some debate, but one possibility is through a forced-sales provision (such as that 
contained  in  the  recently  reintroduced  Pharmaceutical  Market  Access  and  Drug 
Safety Act of 2007). 

To  begin,  the  economic  benefits  of  pharmaceutical  importation  are  obvious:  U.S. 
consumers  will  pay  lower  prices  for  their  prescription  drugs.  This  is  because  most 
foreign  governments  regulate  drug  prices,  and  importing  drugs  from  these  markets 
is  simply  an  indirect  price  control—albeit  one  set  by  foreign  governments.1,2 The 
benefits  of  lower,  government-regulated  prices  are  readily  apparent  and  straight-
forward  to  measure.  Unfortunately,  the  same  cannot  be  said  about  the  costs.  This 
may partially explain why they have received less attention in the debate. Allow me 
to explain. 

Once  a  new  pharmaceutical  has  been  developed  (which  typically  takes  12–15 
years),  and  all  the  safety  and  efficacy  data  have  been  collected  and  analyzed,  the 
marginal manufacturing cost of a single pill is quite small. This is because the final 
product of the pharmaceutical R&D is essentially just new knowledge and informa-
tion  (much  like  computer  software):  information  that  has  taken  many  years  and 
hundreds  of  millions  of  dollars  to  obtain.  In  the  absence  of  intellectual  property 
rights  (pharmaceutical  patents),  and  the  ability  of  drug  companies  to  price  their 
products  significantly  above  marginal  manufacturing  costs,  no  investor  or  firm 
would be willing to invest the time and financial resources necessary to discover and 
develop this information. Thus, there must be a sizable reward to induce the R&D. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

As is, only 3 out of every 10 new pharmaceuticals generate returns in excess of aver-
age R&D costs (Grabowski and Vernon, 2000). 

63 

Pharmaceutical  importation,  precisely  to  the  extent  it  is  successful  in  lowering 
U.S.  drug  prices,  will  reduce  the  financial  incentives  to  invest  in  R&D.3 The  ex-
pected returns on individual R&D projects will fall and some projects will be termi-
nated  (or  not  initiated).  This  is  because  these  projects  will  no  longer  generate  ex-
pected  net  returns  for  the  firm’s  shareholders.4 The  result  will  be  a  decline  in  the 
rate  of  pharmaceutical  innovation:  fewer  new  drugs  will  be  developed  and  it  will 
take  a  longer  time  to  find  cures  for  many  diseases,  all  else  considered.5 Unlike  the 
benefits of the policy, which will produce immediate and observable savings through 
lower  drug  prices,  the  costs  are  more  difficult  to  appreciate  and  quantify.6 This  is 
because of the considerable time lag and uncertainty associated with the R&D proc-
ess, which, as already noted, is very long, costly, and risky.7 My academic research 
has focused on these costs, and specifically the economic relationships between phar-
maceutical prices, profits, and R&D.8 

The  sensitivity  of  R&D  spending  to  pharmaceutical  prices  and  profits  has  been 
studied  with  a  variety  of  different  research  methods,  including  standard  retrospec-
tive statistical analyses of industry and firm-level data, prospective simulation anal-
yses, and financial event studies (Vernon, 2003, 2004, 2005; Giaccotto, Santerre and 
Vernon,  2005;  Abbott  and  Vernon,  2007;  Santerre  and  Vernon,  2006;  Golec,  Hegde, 
and Vernon, 2006; Golec and Vernon, 2007). The research findings have been strik-
ingly  consistent  and  robust.  I  will  summarize  the  results  from  two  recent  studies 
(Vernon, 2005; Giaccotto, Santerre, and Vernon, 2005). Both have been vetted by the 
academic  peer-review  process  and  have  been  published  in  professional  economics 
journals. 

The  first  study  utilized  publicly  available,  firm-level  financial  data  and  exploited 
observed differences in U.S. and non-U.S. pharmaceutical profit margins (the latter 
were used to proxy profit margins in the presence of price regulation). Using estab-
lished  economic  models  and  statistical  techniques,  we  estimated  that  a  new  policy 
that reduces pharmaceutical profit margins in the U.S. to non-U.S. levels will cause 
firm R&D spending to decline by between 25 and 35 percent, all things considered. 
An importation policy that imports regulated prices from foreign markets will theo-
retically have this effect on U.S. profit margins. 

The  second  study  adopted  a  slightly  different  approach  and  used  publicly  avail-
able,  industry-level  data  to  study  the  direct  link  between  U.S.  drug  prices  and  in-
dustry-level  R&D  spending  (Giaccotto,  Santerre,  and  Vernon,  2005).  In  this  study, 
we estimated that for every 10 percent reduction in U.S. drug prices, industry R&D 
spending will decline by approximately 6 percent. This finding is consistent with an 
earlier study that also analyzed industry-level pharmaceutical R&D (Scherer, 1996; 
2001). 

In  sum,  the  empirical  evidence  suggests  firm  R&D  spending  is  very  sensitive  to 
pharmaceutical prices and profits, as economic theory predicts. This is in direct con-
trast  to  the  ubiquitous  noneconomic  notions  one  often  hears,  such  as  ‘‘lower  prices 
and  profits  won’t  reduce  R&D  spending  because  firms  will  still  have  enough  profit 
to  cover  their  R&D’’  and  ‘‘these  firms  have  to  invest  in  R&D,  what  else  are  they 
going to do?’’ 

The  point  of  my  testimony  today  is  that  the  benefits  associated  with  lower  drug 
prices  in  the  U.S.  will,  unequivocally,  come  at  a  cost:  lower  levels  of  R&D  and  a 
reduced  rate  of  pharmaceutical  innovation.  It  is  imperative  that  these  costs  be  bal-
anced  carefully  against  the  benefits  of  importing  price-regulated  pharmaceuticals 
from  abroad.  This  is  particularly  true  in  light  of  the  recent  evidence  on  the  signifi-
cant  contributions  of  pharmaceutical  and  medical  R&D  to  human  health  and  life 
expectancies in the U.S. (Murphy and Topel, 2003; Lichtenberg, 2002). 

Endnotes 

1 It is important to note that importing patented pharmaceuticals from outside the 
United  States  is  not  a  free  trade  issue.  This  is  a  common  misunderstanding.  The 
rationale  for  free  trade  is  based  on  the  doctrine  of  comparative  advantage:  where 
countries specialize in the production of goods and services for which they are, com-
paratively  speaking,  low-cost  producers,  and  then  trade  freely  with  other  countries 
that are doing the same thing. Free trade is good for U.S. consumers, the U.S. econ-
omy,  and  the  global  economy.  But  pharmaceutical  prices  in  Canada  and  elsewhere 
are lower because drug prices are regulated in those markets, and not because those 
countries  have  a  comparative  advantage  in  the  production  of  pharmaceuticals  (in 
the  absence  of  price  regulation,  it  is  likely  that  prices  would  still  be  lower  outside 
the  U.S.  because  of  lower  per  capita  real  income).  It  is  imperative  to  understand 
that  the  real  issue  at  hand  is  intellectual  property  rights.  If  patented  pharma-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

64 

ceuticals  are  imported  from  abroad,  the  U.S.  patent  system  is  circumvented,  and 
price controls will be indirectly imposed on pharmaceuticals in the U.S. 

2 It is likely that even in the absence of price regulation foreign drug prices would 
still be lower outside the U.S. because of lower per capita income levels (see Danzon 
and Towse (2003) for a detailed discussion and analysis. 

3 Some  researchers  have  suggested  that  an  importation  policy  that  reduces  drug 
prices  in  the  U.S.  will  actually  increase  firm  profits  (which  would  lead  to  increased 
R&D spending). But this ‘‘argument’’ assumes firm managers are currently not act-
ing in the best interest of the firm’s shareholders and are, for lack of a better word, 
stupid. This ‘‘argument’’ does not have any economic merit. 

4 The  implicit  argument  being  put  forth  is  a  net  present  value  (NPV)  argument. 
A  real  options  framework,  in  the  parlance  of  modern  finance  theory,  will  generate 
the same prediction (see Golec, Hegde, and Vernon, 2006). 

5 The  phrase  ‘‘all  else  considered’’  is  important  here.  The  relevant  comparison  for 
assessing  the  impact  of  an  importation  policy  on  R&D  spending  and  innovation  is 
the  counterfactual  event  of  no  importation  policy.  R&D  and  innovation  are  driven 
by a number of factors and even if an importation policy is enacted real R&D spend-
ing may continue to grow over time, but it would grow at a slower rate than would 
have been the case if the policy were not enacted. The relevant measure of the effect 
of  policy  is  one  that  holds  all  other  factors  constant:  the  comparison  of  the  reality 
with  the  counterfactual.  Some  of  the  research  I  will  mention  in  this  testimony  can 
easily be taken out of context. For example, if the statement is made that pharma-
ceutical  importation  will  reduce  R&D  by  x  percent,  this  is  x  percent  relative  to  the 
level  of  R&D  spending  in  the  absence  of  the  policy,  not  R&D  spending  in  absolute 
terms. 

6 To  more  formally  consider  the  balancing  of  the  costs  and  benefits  with  respect 
to  a  policy  allowing  pharmaceutical  importation,  the  following  may  provide  some 
clarification.  Once  a  pharmaceutical  product  has  been  brought  to  market,  pricing 
above marginal cost results in an underutilization of the new product (from a social 
welfare  perspective).  These  costs  are  referred  to  as  static  inefficiency  costs.  Thus, 
a tradeoff exists between providing incentives for research and development (R&D), 
and  thus  innovation,  and  consumer  access  to  today’s  medicines:  this  is  the  balance 
the  U.S.  patent  system  tries  to  strike.  While  there  is  nothing  sacrosanct  about  the 
current structure of the U.S. patent system for pharmaceuticals, or indeed the exist-
ing rate (and stock) of R&D investment, what is immediately apparent is that allow-
ing importation of prescription drugs from price-regulated markets, while it will ex-
pand  access  to  medicines  already  developed  (the  aforementioned  benefits),  it  cir-
cumvents  the  U.S.  patent  system  and  allows  foreign  governments  to  set  the  price 
of  pharmaceuticals  in  the  U.S.  This,  as  I  have  mentioned,  will  reduce  the  future 
supply  of  new  drugs.  These  costs  are  referred  to  as  dynamic  inefficiency  costs.  The 
optimal  policy  (or  patent  system)  will  minimize  the  sum  of  the  static  and  dynamic 
inefficiency costs. 

7 The  term  risk  here  refers  to  the  technical  risk  of  an  R&D  project,  which  is  the 
likelihood  it  will  make  it  through  the  various  stages  of  drug  development  and  be-
come  a  marketed  product.  This  is  quite  different  from  financial  risk,  which  is  the 
risk  faced  by  an  investor  who  holds  the  market  portfolio,  i.e.,  the  relevant  risk  for 
determining the project’s cost of capital (or discount rate). 

8 While understanding how R&D spending may be affected by pharmaceutical im-
portation is important, what is most relevant is how this change in pharmaceutical 
R&D  spending  will  influence  innovation  and  public  health.  Obviously,  measuring 
the  costs  associated  with  forgone  future  innovation  is  a  near  impossible  task:  there 
are many variables that can affect the outcome. However, because there is an over-
whelming  tendency  for  public  policy  debate  to  focus  on  the  short-run  benefits  of 
lower (regulated) drug prices, it is critical that efforts be untaken to at least approx-
imate  the  magnitude  of  what  the  corresponding  costs  would  be  in  terms  of  lower 
levels  of  innovation.  Only  then  can  the  benefits  of  lower  drug  prices  be  weighed 
against the costs to determine if the policy is a good one. A very rough first approxi-
mation  of  the  social  costs  associated  with  various  pharmaceutical  price-reduction 
policies (measured in terms of life years and dollars) may be found in Vernon (2004). 
References 

Abbott,  T.  and  Vernon,  J.A.  (2007)  ‘‘A  Financial  Simulation  Model  of  the  Firm 
Pharmaceutical  R&D  Investment  Decision:  Implications  for  a  New  U.S.  Price  Con-
trol Policy.’’ Forthcoming, Managerial and Decision Economics, Summer 2007. 

Danzon, P.D. and Towse, A. (2003) ‘‘Differential Pricing for Pharmaceuticals: Rec-
onciling  Access,  R&D,  and  Patents.’’  With  Adrian  Towse.  International  Journal  of 
Health Care Finance and Economics, 3: 183–205, 2003. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

65 

DiMasi,  J.A.,  Hansen,  R.W.,  Grabowski,  H.G.  (2003)  ‘‘The  Price  of  Innovation: 

New Estimates of Drug Development Costs.’’ J Health Economics. 22:151–185. 

Giaccotto,  C.,  Santerre,  R.E.  and  Vernon,  J.A.  (2005)  ‘‘Drug  Prices  and  R&D  In-
vestment  Behavior  in  the  Pharmaceutical  Industry’’  (with  Rexford  Santerre  and 
Carmelo  Giaccotto)  Vol.  48,  Issue  1,  195–214  2005.  Journal  of  Law  and  Economics. 
Golec,  J.,  Hegde,  S.,  Vernon,  J.A.  (2006)  ‘‘Pharmaceutical  Stock  Price  Reactions 
to  Price  Constraint  Threats  and  Firm-Level  R&D  Spending’’  NBER  Working  paper 
# w11229, Cambridge, MA. 

Golec,  J.  and  Vernon,  J.A.  (2006)  ‘‘European  Pharmaceutical  Price  Regulation, 
Firm Profitability, and R&D Spending’’ NBER working paper # w12676, Cambridge 
MA. 

Grabowski,  H.G.  and  Vernon,  J.M.  (2000)  ‘‘The  Distribution  of  Sales  Revenues 

from Pharmaceutical Innovation.’’ Pharmacoeconomics. 18 Supplement 1: 21–32. 

Lichtenberg,  F.R.  (2002)  ‘‘Sources  of  U.S.  Longevity  Increase,  1960–1997.’’  Na-

tional Bureau of Economic Research, working paper 8755, Cambridge, MA. 

Murphy, K.M. and Topel, R.H. (2003) ‘‘The Economic Value of Medical Research;’’ 
in  Measuring  the  Gains  from  Medical  Research;  edited  by  Kevin  M.  Murphy  and 
Robert H. Topel, The University of Chicago Press. 

Santerre, R, and Vernon, J,A, (2006) ‘‘Assessing the Gains from A Drug Price Con-

trol Policy in the U.S.’’ Vol. 73, Issue 1 (July) 2006. Southern Economic Journal. 

Scherer,  F.M.  (1996)  ‘‘Industry  Structure,  Strategy,  and  Public  Policy,’’  Harper 

Collins College Publishers. 

Scherer,  F.M.  (2001)  ‘‘The  Link  Between  Gross  Profitability  and  Pharmaceutical 

R&D Spending.’’ Health Affairs. Sept./Oct.; 20:216–220. 

Vernon, J.A. (2003) ‘‘Simulating the Impact of Price Regulation on Pharmaceutical 

Innovation.’’ Pharmaceutical Development and Regulation. 1(1): 55–65. 

Vernon, J.A. (2005) ‘‘Examining the Link Between Price Regulation and Pharma-

ceutical R&D Investment.’’ 14:1 2005: 1–17. Health Economics. 

Vernon,  J.A.  (2003)  ‘‘The  Relationship  Between  Price  Regulation  and  Pharma-

ceutical Profit Margins.’’ Applied Economics Letters. Volume 10, 2003. 

Vernon,  J.A.  (2004)  ‘‘New  Evidence  on  Drug  Research  and  Price  Controls.’’  Regu-
lation: The Cato Journal of Business and Government, Volume 27, Issue No. 3, 2004. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Dr.  Vernon,  thank  you  very  much.  We  appre-

Dr.  Schondelmeyer,  why  don’t  you  proceed.  You’re  from  the  Uni-

ciate your testimony. 

versity of Minnesota? 

Dr. SCHONDELMEYER. Yes. 
Senator DORGAN. And we appreciate, very much, your being here 

today. 
STATEMENT  OF  STEPHEN  W.  SCHONDELMEYER,  PHARM.D., 
PH.D.,  PROFESSOR  OF  PHARMACEUTICAL  ECONOMICS  AND 
DIRECTOR,  PRIME  INSTITUTE,  COLLEGE  OF  PHARMACY, 
UNIVERSITY OF MINNESOTA 
Dr. SCHONDELMEYER. Ja, you betcha. 
Thank  you  very  much,  Mr.  Chairman  and  members  of  the  Com-
mittee. I’m Steve Schondelmeyer. I’m a professor of pharmaceutical 
economics and management at the University of Minnesota, where 
I direct the PRIME institute that does research on pharmaceutical, 
economic,  and  policy  issues.  My  comments  today  are  my  own,  and 
not those of any other body or organization. 

I  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  address  this  Committee,  would 
remind you, as others have, that we still have a number of Ameri-
cans  who  do  not  have  health  insurance  or  prescription  drug  cov-
erage.  So,  the  new  Medicare  Part  D  program  certainly  has  helped 
drug coverage in America for some Americans, but it hasn’t solved 
the  access  to  drug  therapy  problems  throughout  the  country,  and 
there are still a number of people who do not have access. 

Also,  coverage  does  not  solve  the  affordability  problem,  it  only 
shifts  it  from  the  individual  to  the  other  private  or  public  sources 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

66 

who are paying for the drugs for those individuals. In fact, I would 
argue  that  coverage,  especially  when  that  coverage  is  under  public 
programs, increases the importance of examining price as a part of 
the issue, because now we are paying for the costs of those medica-
tions out of the public coffers, and it is a cost to each of us, as tax-
payers.  And  I  think  we  all  have  a  responsibility  to  use  those  re-
sources wisely. 

My  comments  today  will  be  focused  upon  the  potential  role  of 
drug importation and its expected impact on market prices and the 
presence of counterfeits in the U.S. marketplace. 

Drug importation, I think, can be an important tool in this mar-

ketplace if we use it wisely and carefully. 

Consumers  are  very  price-sensitive.  That’s,  in  fact,  why  they  go 
to  Canada  or  the  Internet  to  buy  this  same  drug,  the  exact  same 
drug,  at  a  lower  price.  They  are  trying  to  express  their  demand. 
They’re  screaming  in  the  marketplace,  saying,  ‘‘We  need  lower 
prices  on  drugs,’’  but  the  manufacturers  don’t  seem  to  hear  that 
very well. 

I  think  prescription  drug  coverage  for  some,  or  even  all,  con-
sumers does not solve this affordability problem, because Medicare 
Part D, in particular, we subsidize the costs of that program. And, 
again,  that  puts  it  on  the  public  rolls.  Provision  of  coverage  under 
public  programs  without  meaningful  market-based  pressures  and 
negotiation of price is much like writing a blank check to the phar-
maceutical  companies.  And  I  think  that’s  much  the  position  we’re 
in. 

Other  developed  countries  have  brand  name  prices  that  are  25 
to  60  percent  lower  than  the  price  for  the  same  drugs  in  the  U.S. 
marketplace. While the U.S. may be willing to pay premium prices 
compared  to  other  countries,  we  continue  to  experience  this  ever 
growing  price  premium  compared  to  other  countries,  and  not  only 
is the price higher, but year-to-year increases in prices go up in the 
U.S. on average 3 to 7 percent a year; in other countries, the prices 
may  go  down  3  percent  or  up  3  percent  in  a  range  of  about  plus 
or minus 3 percent. The rate of growth of prices is much slower in 
other  countries,  as  well.  And  that  also  creates  a  problem,  and  cre-
ates  that  gap  of  difference  in  price  between  the  U.S.  and  other 
countries. 

Yes,  generics  are  an  important  part  of  the  competitive  pharma-
ceutical  marketplace,  but  generic—and  generics  hold  down  U.S. 
drug  expenditures,  but  they  don’t  address  the  problem  of  the  per-
son  who  needs  a  single-source,  brand  name  prescription  drug  that 
does  not  have  a  generic  alternative.  Generics  aren’t  the  answer. 
They  might  be,  in  a  market  sense,  a  part  of  the  answer,  but,  for 
each  individual  patient  who  needs  a  specific  drug,  they  hold  no 
promise. 

If no drug is available for an individual consumer, they face that 
monopoly price of the brand name country. As has been noted, the 
EU  has  experienced  parallel  trade  for  a  number  of  years,  and  a 
large  share  of  the  trade  in  pharmaceuticals  that  occurs  in  the  EU 
in  certain  countries  comes  through  parallel  trade  and  importation. 
Importation,  I  think,  is  an  important  part  of  the  big  picture  re-
lated  to  affordability  of  drugs  in  a  society.  The  U.S.  represents 
about  51  percent  of  the  total  manufactured-drug  purchases  in  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00070 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

67 

developed world. The EU countries are about 25 percent, and Can-
ada is less than 5 percent. So, collectively, Canada and the EU are 
about  30  percent,  the  U.S.  is  50  percent.  If  we  took  and—totally 
opened up with reimportation, I won’t sit here and tell you that we 
will  see  EU  or  Canadian  prices  in  the  U.S.,  but  we’ll  move  closer 
to  them.  We  will  see  the  U.S.  price  go  down  some,  we  will  see  the 
EU  and  Canadian  prices  go  up  some.  The  end  equilibrium  price  is 
much more likely to be close to the U.S. price than it is to the Ca-
nadian  or  European,  primarily  because  we’re  such  a  larger  share 
of  the  market  to  begin  with.  But  I  think  we  could  easily  see  12  to 
20 percent drops in most drug prices in the U.S. 

But,  even  more  importantly,  I  think  we  would  see  a  slowing  of 
the  rate  of  growth  of  those  prices  over  time,  which  is  as  much  a 
problem  as  the  price  itself.  Both  are  important,  both  must  be 
tracked. 

Let  me  remind  you,  as  we  heard  earlier  today,  that  Congress 
passed the Prescription Drug Marketing Act of 1987, 20 years ago, 
and  that  Act  required  a  pedigree,  a  paper  or  electronic  process  for 
maintaining the documentation of the source of origin and the trav-
eling of that product through the channels of distribution. It wasn’t 
until 1999 that the FDA first even promulgated regulations, nearly 
12  years  after  the  Act  was  passed.  FDA  had  a  law  on  the  books 
they  could  have  implemented  that  would  have  assured  we  knew 
where  our  product  came  from,  and  how  it  traveled  through  the 
market, and how it went out and came back into the U.S., and who 
made  it,  and  where  it  was.  They  just  recently  have  promulgated 
and  begun  to  implement  rules  related  to  that  pedigree.  I  think  we 
need to look back at that pedigree process and move that ahead as 
quickly  as  we  can  to  make  sure  we  can  assure  we  know  where  all 
the product in the marketplace comes from, and that it is safe and 
effective. 

Major wholesalers and chains in the U.S. also have international 
operations  in  Canada,  in  Europe,  in  Mexico.  And  they’re  ready, 
today. They’re doing business in those markets. It would take very 
little for them to begin to import products from their Canadian op-
erations, their European operations, other sites. 

The  newer  and  most  expensive  drug  products  are  the  ones  that 
are  most  often  counterfeited.  Why?  Because  they  have  the  highest 
price and the highest profit margins, and the highest gross margin 
compared to their actual marginal cost of production. 

Let  me  conclude  by  recommending  that  I  think  we  need  to  en-
courage  that  pedigree  process  as  quickly  as  possible.  We  need  to 
eliminate  or  closely  regulate  the  sale  of  drugs  over  the  Internet, 
both  domestically  and  internationally.  That’s  not  how  you’re  going 
to—that isn’t going to lower prices in the U.S., as a whole; it does, 
for  each  individual  that  buys  there,  but  not  for  the  market,  as  a 
whole. 

Second, establish a pedigree system that must be initiated at the 
manufacturer  level,  must  be—cannot  be  unreasonably  withheld  by 
the  manufacturer  from  wholesalers  and  end-purchasers,  and  is  re-
quired  as  the  product  passes  to  the  wholesaler  and  pharmacy  or 
any other end-purchaser. 

Third,  set  uniform  standards  for  the  pedigree  system  so  that  we 
don’t  end  up  with  a  multiplicity  of  State  requirements  that  would 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00071 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

68 

proliferate and complicate the process and the cost of implementing 
the pedigree system, and bog it down, basically. 

Fourth,  authorize  importation  of  pharmaceuticals  through  nor-
mal  channels  of  distribution,  manufacturers,  wholesalers,  chain 
warehouses, and community pharmacies. 

Finally, prohibit manufacturers from manipulating the supply as 
a  means  of  limiting  importation  from  the  markets  with  lower 
prices. 

I  would  argue,  members  of  the  panel,  that  if  you  allowed  impor-
tation through normal channels, your constituents could go to their 
corner  drugstore  and  get  their  prescription  at  the  same  price  that 
they  find  on  the  Internet  or  in  Canada.  They  won’t  be  using  the 
Internet  anymore,  and  FDA  won’t  have  to  worry  about  shutting 
down  those  Internet  sites,  because  your  constituents  will  have  a 
way to get that lower price that they’re demanding. 

Thank you very much. 
[The prepared statement of Dr. Schondelmeyer follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF STEPHEN W.  SCHONDELMEYER,  PHARM.D.,  PH.D., 
PROFESSOR OF PHARMACEUTICAL ECONOMICS AND DIRECTOR,  PRIME  INSTITUTE, 
COLLEGE OF PHARMACY, UNIVERSITY OF MINNESOTA 
Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman  and  members  of  the  Senate  Subcommittee  for  this  op-
portunity  to  provide  input  into  your  deliberations  regarding  policy  implications  of 
pharmaceutical importation. I am Stephen W. Schondelmeyer, Professor of Pharma-
ceutical  Economics  at  the  University  of  Minnesota,  College  of  Pharmacy  where  I 
also  serve  as  Director  of  the  PRIME  Institute.  The  PRIME  Institute  focuses  on 
pharmaceutical  research  involving  management  and  economics.  These  remarks  are 
my  own  views  based  upon  my  extensive  research  and  experience  with  the  pharma-
ceutical marketplace throughout the past thirty years, during which I have studied 
the economic behaviors and pricing policies of the pharmaceutical industry and have 
developed  a  broad  understanding  of  the  dynamics  of  the  pharmaceutical  market-
place.  In  particular,  I  have  also  examined  the  structure  and  financing  of  both  pri-
vate and public pharmaceutical benefit programs. 

This  Committee  is  considering  issues  that  influence  access  to  pharmaceuticals, 
one of the most important components of the health care system. Keep in mind that 
prescription  drugs  have  a  universal  demand.  That  is,  everyone  in  society  needs  pre-
scription drugs at some point during their lifetime. Virtually everyone has used, will 
use, or should have used prescription drugs during their lifetime. During any given 
week one-half of the adult population uses one, or more, prescriptions and more than 
three-fourths of the population age 65 and over uses one, or more prescriptions. 

While  the  new  Medicare  Part  D  drug  program  has  provided  coverage  for  many 
seniors  and  disabled,  there  are  still  about  47  million  Americans  with  no  health  in-
surance and no prescription drug insurance. Affordability is still a problem for those 
uncovered person who must pay for their own prescriptions. Also, coverage does not 
solve  the  affordability  problem,  it  simply  shifts  the  issue  of  affordability  from  the 
individual  to  private  or  public  sources.  Employers  are  struggling  with  rising  health 
care  and  prescription  drug  costs.  Also,  the  total  cost  of  the  Medicare  Part  D  drug 
program  to  society  is  a  major  cost  that  the  Federal  Government  will  struggle  with 
in the years ahead. Coverage does not make price irrelevant, and in fact, public pro-
gram coverage makes the price of prescription drugs an even more important policy 
issue  for  Federal  and  state  governments.  My  comments  today  will  be  focused  upon 
the potential role of drug importation and its expected impact on market prices and 
the presence of counterfeit drugs in the U.S. market. Drug importation is an impor-
tant  tool  that,  if  used  properly,  can  facilitate  increased  access  and  decreased  pres-
ence of counterfeits in the market. 

There are several major prescription drug issues which the Committee should ad-
dress as part of health care reform. I want to address four issues, which are specifi-
cally  mentioned  in  the  Health  Security  Act,  and  which  should  be  incorporated  into 
any other package that emerges to reform health care in the United States: 

1.  economic  forces  are  driving  the  demand  for  importation  of  pharmaceuticals; 
2. generics are an important competitive factor in the U.S. market, but generics 
do not eliminate the need for more rational pricing of brand name drugs; 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00072 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

69 

3. parallel trade is present in the European Union market; 
4. the drug supply in the U.S. is safe, but counterfeits exist in the market; 
5.  high  prices  and  low  cost  of  production  are  major  factors  leading  to  counter-
feits; 
6. wholesalers and chains are positioned for a global market; 
7. nontraditional distribution channels need to be monitored or eliminated; and 
8. manufacturers will attempt to control supply to maintain prices. 

Economic Forces Driving the Demand for Re-importation 

Consumers  are  very  ‘‘price  sensitive,’’  that  is,  they  are  not  willing  to  pay  higher 
drug  prices  when  the  same  drug  is  available  in  the  market  at  a  lower  price.  Con-
sumers  have  been  shopping  with  their  feet  (by  traveling  to  Canada  or  Mexico)  and 
with their fingers by shopping on the Internet. The behavior of consumers indicates 
that  many  are  screaming  that  price  does  matter,  but  drug  firms  are  not  listening 
to  these  cries.  Uninsured  consumers  may  have  to  choose  ‘‘your  money  or  your  life’’ 
when  it  comes  to  certain  prescription  drugs.  In  other  words,  a  number  of  persons 
needing  prescription  drugs  may  have  to  forego  needed  prescriptions  due  to  lack  of 
resources  and,  or,  high  drug  prices.  This  may  include  individuals  without  drug  in-
surance  coverage  and  persons  covered  by  public  programs  with  limited  resources 
such  as  state  Medicaid  programs,  state  and  Federal  HIV–AIDs  programs,  and  the 
Medicare  Part  D  drug  benefit.  The  total  cost  of  the  Medicare  Part  D  drug  program 
is projected to be considerably above the original projections. 

Private  employers  are  also  concerned  about  rising  health  and  drug  benefits  costs 
that are choking off corporate profits and global competitiveness. International drug 
prices  do  differ  at  the  firm  level  and  at  the  product  level,  if  not  also  at  the  market 
level. While examination of drug prices at the aggregate market level is of interest, 
it  is  not  particularly  relevant  to  the  individual  who  needs  a  specific  drug  product 
in  the  U.S.  market.  Consumers  do  not  buy  a  ‘‘market  basket’’  of  drugs,  but  rather 
they  buy  only  the  one,  or  a  few  drugs,  that  they  need  at  the  time.  Prices  set  by 
drug  firms  on  the  basis  of  differences  in  income  levels  across  countries  may  have 
some  logic  from  a  macroeconomic  perspective,  but  this  approach  does  not  take  into 
account  the  income  disparities  experienced  within  a  specific  country.  In  particular, 
the U.S. has much greater income disparity and diversity than most other developed 
countries.  Based  on  the  price  discrimination  practiced  by  drug  firms,  the  cash  pay-
ers  in  the  U.S.  market  pay  the  highest  prices  in  the  U.S.,  and  for  that  matter  the 
world,  yet  the  U.S.  cash  payers  are  often  among  the  lowest  income  persons  within 
the  U.S.  Those  without  health  and  drug  insurance  may  include  part-time  workers, 
workers  who  are  at  minimum  wage  and  without  employer-based  health  insurance, 
and  others  with  limited  resources.  Lack  of  coverage  for  the  individual,  when  not 
subsidized, still means the person has to pay the full cost of drug therapy. 

Prescription drug coverage for some, or even all, consumers does not solve the af-
fordability  problem.  Coverage  benefits  the  individual  when  a  public  subsidy  is  pro-
vided to help cover the cost of drugs, but we all bear the total cost of drugs provided 
through  tax-subsidized  public  programs.  Provision  of  coverage  under  public  pro-
grams without meaningful market-based pressure and negotiation of the price is es-
sentially  the  same  as  writing  ‘‘blank  checks’’  for  pharmaceutical  firms.  Other  hear-
ings  in  Congress  have  explored  and  examined  the  possible  ways  that  the  Medicare 
Part D drug program may exercise market negotiation power for better prescription 
drug prices. 

Other  developed  countries  (Canada,  the  EU,  and  others)  have  brand  name  drug 
prices  that  are  25  percent  to  60  percent  below  the  U.S.  prices  of  the  same  drugs. 
While the U.S. may be willing to pay a premium price compared to other countries, 
we  continue  to  experience  an  ever-growing  price  premium  compared  to  other  devel-
oped countries. Not only are the brand name drug prices typically higher in the U.S. 
than  in  other  developed  countries,  but  these  other  countries  usually  experience  an-
nual  drug  price  changes  in  the  range  of  plus  or  minus  3  percent  versus  price 
changes in the United States that may vary from plus 3 percent to plus 10 percent 
or more. 
Generic Are an Important Competitive Factor 

Generics  are  an  important  competitive  factor  in  the  U.S.  prescription  drug  mar-
ket, but do not solve the affordability and pricing problems. Certainly generics help 
to  hold  down  the  total  U.S.  drug  expenditures.  Even  though  generics  account  for 
more  than  one-half  of  all  outpatient  prescriptions  filled  in  the  United  States  each 
year,  their  relatively  low  prices  result  in  generics  accounting  for  about  15  percent 
to  20  percent  of  total  drug  expenditures.  People  are  not  going  to  Canada,  or  the 
Internet,  to  buy  the  $4  generic  prescriptions  that  are  available  through  selected 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00073 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

70 

Wal-Mart  and  Target  stores.  This  limited  set  of  generics,  accounts  for  about  1  per-
cent  to  3  percent  of  total  drug  expenditures  for  persons  who  choose  to  go  to  Wal- 
Mart or Target stores. 

In  most  cases,  generics  are  less  expensive  in  the  U.S.  than  in  Canada,  or  other 
developed countries. Generics may help lower the overall, weighted average market 
price,  but  generic  prices  are  not  relevant  to  the  individual  who  needs  a  specific 
brand  name  medication  with  no  generic  alternatives.  If  no  generic  is  available  for 
your prescription, then you may face the monopoly brand name price in the United 
States. 
Parallel Trade Is Present in the European Union Market 

All  EU  countries  engage  in  some  parallel  trade  (importation)  for  prescription 
drugs.  Greater  than  10  percent  of  the  drug  supply  flows  through  parallel  trade  in 
the  U.K.,  the  Netherlands,  and  Denmark.  According  to  IMS  Health,  the  European 
market  ‘‘is  a  market  that  has  exactly  the  same  high  quality  requirements’’  across 
member  countries.  Parallel  trade  occurs  and  depends  upon:  price  level  in  the  des-
tination  country;  price  difference  compared  to  the  source  country  (∼20  percent  or 
more  will  lead  to  parallel  trade);  product  volume  available  in  the  source  country; 
product  volume  demanded  in  the  destination  country;  costs  of  transportation,  cus-
toms, and product verification; assurance that market conditions allow importers to 
make  a  reasonable  profit;  and  legal  and  regulatory  conditions  that  support  the 
rights of importers. 

Parallel  trade  with  importation,  and  re-importation,  is  a  part  of  the  ‘‘big  picture’’ 
needed for affordable drugs in a society. Importation, and re-importation, will help, 
but will not completely solve the pricing concerns for prescription drugs. Re-importa-
tion  will  not  deliver  Canadian,  or  EU  prices  to  the  United  States,  but  some  equi-
librium  price  in  between  the  U.S.  price  and  the  developed  world  price  will  be 
achieved.  Keep  in  mind  that  the  U.S.  is  the  single  largest  pharmaceutical  market 
in  the  world.  For  the  12  months  ending  in  December  2006,  the  manufacturer  pre-
scription sales to the developed world were about $388 billion and to the total world 
were  about  $555  billion.  The  U.S.  represents  about  51  percent  ($198  billion)  of  the 
manufacturer sales to the developed world. In contrast, the top five countries in Eu-
rope  are  about  25  percent  ($96  billion)  and  Canada  is  3.5  percent  ($14  billion)  of 
manufacturer prescription sales to the developed world. 

Manufacturer 

Sales 

($ in billion) 

Percent of 

Total 
World 

Percent of 
Selected 
World 

Total World 
Developed (Selected) World 
U.S. 
Europe (Top 5) 
Canada 
Australia/New Zealand 
Japan 
Latin America 

$554.7 
388.3 
197.8 
95.5 
13.7 
5.8 
56.7 
18.7 

100.0 
70.0 
50.9 
24.6 
3.5 
1.5 
14.6 
4.8 

100.0 
35.7 
17.2 
2.5 
1.0 
10.2 
3.4 

Parallel  trade  through  importation,  or  re-importation,  from  Canada,  the  EU,  and 
selected other developed countries will not deliver Canadian, or European prices, to 
the  U.S.  in  the  long  run  (more  than  2  years).  Importation,  or  re-importation  will 
deliver  a  developed  world  equilibrium  price  less  than  the  U.S.  price  and  more  than 
the  Canadian  or  EU  price.  In  fact,  the  equilibrium  price  will  be  closer  to  the  U.S. 
price than to the EU or Canadian price since U.S. accounts for more than 50 percent 
of market for developed countries while the other countries in the proposed parallel 
trade  market  are  about  30  percent  of  the  developed  countries  market.  U.S.  prices 
may decrease about 12 percent to 20 percent after implementation of parallel trade. 
As important as the price decrease, would be the effect on price changes over time. 
Parallel trade would most likely lead to slower inflation in brand name prices than 
the  U.S.  is  accustomed  to  paying.  The  inflation  rate  would  probably  slow  to  about 
2 percent to 4 percent per year rather than 4 percent to 7 percent per year. 
The Drug Supply in the United States is Safe, But Counterfeits Exist in the 

Market 

‘‘The  U.S.  drug  supply  chain  is  probably  the  safest  one  in  the  world,  and  we’re 
working  hard  to  keep  it  that  way,’’  said  Tom  McGinnis,  Director  of  Pharmacy  Af-
fairs, U.S. Food and Drug Administration (FDA). McGinnis went on to say ‘‘There’s 
a  lot  of  money  to  be  made  in  knocking  off  these  kinds  of  products  if  you  can  get 
them  into  the  distribution  system.’’  [Traffic  World,  Journal  of  Commerce,  ‘‘Securing 
the  Drug  Pipeline,’’  June  20,  2005]  The  FDA  estimates  that  less  than  1  percent  of 
U.S. drugs are counterfeit or adultered. The most frequently counterfeited drugs are 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00074 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

71 

those  with  the  highest  prices  (e.g.,  cancer  and  hematoligic  agents)  and  the  highest 
volume  (e.g.,  Lipitor).  ‘‘America  has  become  the  go-to  market  for  counterfeiters  be-
cause  we  pay  the  highest  prices  of  anyone  in  the  world,’’  says  Katherine  Eban 
[Eban, K., Dangersous Doses: How Counterfeiters are Contaminating America’s Drug 
Supply.]  High  prices  for  drugs  with  relatively  low  marginal  costs  play  a  role  in  de-
termining the types of drug products that are the target of counterfeiters. Lowering 
prices through parallel trade may, in fact, reduce the likelihood of counterfeits. 

While importation of drugs from Canada and other countries is illegal, the current 
policy  in  the  United  States  has  been  a  somewhat  passive  tolerance  of  personal  im-
portation  from  Canada  via  the  Internet  and  mail  or  through  ‘drug  trips’  to  Canada 
or Mexico. This has resulted in sort of an individualized ‘wild west’ environment for 
prescription  drug  importation.  That  is,  Americans  can  usually  import  prescription 
drugs  via  the  Internet  or  in  person  as  long  as  no  one  is  watching  and  the  quantity 
is  limited  (e.g.,  a  1  month  to  12  month  supply).  This  informal  policy  of  allowing  ad 
hoc  importation  does  little,  if  anything,  to  prevent  counterfeits  and  may  also  be 
harmful  to  patients  by  fragmenting  their  prescription  drug  records.  With  frag-
mented  prescription  drug  records,  physicians,  pharmacists,  and  pharmacy  benefit 
managers  are  less  likely  to  have  the  information  necessary  to  properly  advise  the 
patient on drug use, interactions, and potential consequences. 

Congress  passed  the  Pharmaceutical  Drug  Marketing  Act  in  1987,  twenty  years 
ago. The Act required that a ‘‘pedigree’’—paper or electronic—be maintained to doc-
ument  the  origin  and  source  of  a  drug  product  all  the  way  from  the  manufacturer 
to  the  end  dispenser.  The  FDA  did  not  even  promulgate  proposed  regulations  until 
1999, and it announced in 2004 that it would delay the effective date of those rules 
until  December  of  2006.  Certainly,  the  technology  for  these  pedigrees  has  changed 
substantially  over  the  past  twenty  years.  Today,  electronic  pedigrees  in  various 
forms appear to be far more efficient than paper pedigree procedures. The pedigree 
can  authenticate  the  source  of  a  drug  product  and  it  may  also  serve  as  a  means  to 
track-and-trace  a  drug  throughout  the  distribution  chain  and  even  for  recalls,  if 
needed  for  a  drug  product.  After  more  than  twenty  years,  it  is  time  that  this  pedi-
gree process be implemented. 

If  the  pedigree  process  was  in  place,  then  the  traditional  drug  distribution  chan-
nels  could  effectively  maintain  the  quality  of  the  drug  supply  whether  the  drug 
originates in the U.S. or is imported by the manufacturer, wholesaler, or pharmacy. 
One step in this direction has been the recent action by the Healthcare Distribution 
Management  Association  (HDMA)  in  2003.  The  HDMA  adopted  voluntary  Guide-
lines  for  Pharmaceutical  Distribution  System  Integrity,  which  encourages  distribu-
tors to carefully scrutinize each of their business partners both upstream and down-
stream. 
Wholesalers and Chains Are Positioned for a Global Market 

In  the  year  2000,  the  National  Wholesale  Druggist  Association  (NWDA)  changed 
its  name  to  the  Healthcare  Distribution  Management  Association  (HDMA).  As  de-
scribed in the trade publication known as The Pink Sheet, ‘‘The change from empha-
sis  on  a  ‘national’  organization  to  one  defined  by  ‘health  distribution’  comes  as 
NWDA  members  face  the  legislated  opportunity  of  moving  products  across  borders 
to  take  advantage  of  different  pricing  levels.’’  [FDC  Reports,  The  Pink  Sheet,  Vol. 
62, No. 44, Oct. 30, 2000, p. 19] Indeed, major wholesalers and chains already have 
international operations and connections with Canada, Mexico, and European Union 
countries. ‘‘McKesson has operations to the north and south of the U.S. border that 
could  help  the  company  implement  an  import  provision.’’  [FDC  Reports,  The  Pink 
Sheet, Vol. 62, No. 44, Oct. 30, 2000, p. 8] 

Bindley Western (now part of Cardinal Health) ‘‘CEO Bill Bindley told an Oct. 25 
(2000) conference call that ‘‘we’re looking at drug import legislation, as are our com-
petitors . . . if there is opportunity, you can be assured that we’ll be trying to take 
advantage  of  it.’’  [FDC  Reports,  The  Pink  Sheet,  Vol.  62,  No.  44,  Oct.  30,  2000,  p. 
8]. Cardinal Health has wholesaling operations and interests in Canada and Europe. 
In addition to wholesalers, ‘‘some chains already operate internationally, ‘looking at 
a  global  market  is  something  they’re  already  accustomed  to,’ ’’  added  Mary  Ann 
Wagner, Senior V.P., Regulatory Affairs, National Association of Chain Drug Stores 
(NACDS).  ‘‘NACDS  members  that  operate  in  Canada  include  Cardinal’s  Medicine 
Shoppe,  Costco,  and  Wal-Mart.  Chains  could  import  drugs  through  their  own  dis-
tribution  centers  or  agreements  with  wholesalers.’’  [FDC  Reports,  The  Pink  Sheet, 
Vol. 62, No. 49, Dec. 4, 2000, p. 14] 
Non-traditional Distribution Channels Need to Be Eliminated or Monitored 
There  are,  or  have  been  in  recent  years,  thousands  of  wholesalers  in  the  United 
States  although  only  about  46  of  these  firms  are  traditional,  full-line  drug  whole-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00075 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

72 

three 

salers.  The 
(McKesson,  Cardinal  Health  and 
AmeriSourceBergen)  accounted  for  92.7  percent  of  the  U.S.  pharmaceutical  whole-
sale  market  in  2004.  [HDMA  Foundation,  2005–2006  HDMA  Factbook:  Industry 
Overview, 2005, p. 22] 

largest  wholesalers 

Brand name drug firms are themselves, in part, responsible for many of the large 
number  of  faux  wholesaler  firms  registered  with  states  such  as  Florida  and  Cali-
fornia. Most of these firms are not traditional wholesalers, but rather they are end- 
purchasers  such  as  clinics  and  physician’s  offices.  These  end-purchasers  have  been 
induced to register as wholesalers by the pricing scheme of one or more brand name 
pharmaceutical  firms  so  that  the  ‘registered  wholesaler’  can  benefit  from  special 
pricing  when  purchasing  high  cost  specialty  drugs  from  these  certain  manufactur-
ers. These faux wholesaler pricing schemes have most commonly been developed for 
specialty drug products (e.g., oncology and hematological drugs) sold to, and admin-
istered  by,  clinics  and  physicians’  offices.  The  faux  wholesaler  may  buy  a  larger 
quantity  than  required  for  their  own  needs  in  order  to  qualify  for  certain  levels  of 
volume  discounts  from  the  manufacturer  and  then  they  re-sell  the  excess  quantity 
of product purchased to other clinics or physician’s offices. 

For example, the pricing scheme of TAP Pharmaceuticals for their Lupron product 
provided  favorable  pricing  to  clinics  and  physicians  that  were  registered  as  whole-
salers.  The  favorable  prices  to  faux  wholesalers  were  also  hidden  from  private  and 
public  third  party  payers.  This  pricing  scheme  was  the  subject  of  legal  actions  that 
led  to  settlements  with  the  U.S.  Department  of  Justice  ($875  million)  and  with  a 
class  action  group  of  plaintiffs.  This  proliferation  of  faux  wholesalers  to  qualify  for 
certain discounts created opportunities for counterfeit, stolen, or diverted drug prod-
ucts  to  also  enter  the  distribution  system.  In  some  cases,  the  large  wholesalers 
would  buy  drug  product  back  from  these  faux  wholesalers  through  what  has  come 
to be know as the ‘‘gray market.’’ 

The newer and most expensive drug products, also known as specialty drug prod-
ucts, have been one of the most often targets of counterfeiters. These drug products 
are  targets  because  they  have  both  very  high  prices  and  very  high  profit  margins 
above  the  marginal  cost  of  production  for  both  legitimate  and  counterfeit  product. 
One  manufacturer  (i.e.,  Johnson  &  Johnson)  has  taken  steps  (Jan.  19,  2004)  to  as-
sure that drug wholesalers ‘‘purchase J&J products directly from the manufacturer, 
in  an  effort  to  reduce  counterfeits.’’  [FDC  Reports,  The  Pink  Sheet,  Vol.  65,  No.  50, 
Dec.  15,  2003,  p.  37]  ‘‘J&J’s  current  policy  has  stipulated  that  customers  who  pur-
chase  Procrit  or  any  other  Ortho  Biotech  product  from  a  different  source  will  have 
their  account  status  immediately  terminated.  The  more  stringent  policy  will  likely 
better  secure  the  supply  chain.’’  This  policy  requirement  by  J&J  is  not  expected  to 
pose  a  major  challenge  for  the  three  largest  wholesalers  (AmeriSourceBergen, 
McKesson,  and  Cardinal)  because  these  firms  have  committed  to  ‘‘eliminating  pur-
chases  from  secondary  wholesalers  as  part  of  anti-counterfeit  measures.’’  [FDC  Re-
ports, The Pink Sheet, Vol. 65, No. 46, Nov. 10, 2003, p. 31] 
Manufacturers Will Attempt to Control Supply To Maintain Prices 

Even if importation is allowed, drug firms will try to limit importation by limiting 
supply  into  the  lower-priced  markets.  This  phenomenon  has  already  been  seen  in 
Canada  in  response  to  Canadian  importation  into  the  U.S.  market.  ‘‘In  a  Jan.  3 
(2003) letter, GSK (GlaxoSmithKline) said it would stop selling drugs to any Cana-
dian  distributor  whose  pharmacy  clients  are  suspected  of  selling  them  to  U.S.  cus-
tomers.’’ The letter states ‘‘GSK will refuse to supply our products through your dis-
tribution  centers  until  such  time  that  we  are  satisfied  that  you  are  complying  with 
our  Terms  and  Conditions  of  Sale.’’  [FDC  Reports,  The  Pink  Sheet,  Vol.  65,  No.  3, 
Jan.  20,  2003,  p.  27]  ‘‘Other  companies,  including  Merck,  have  previously  sent  let-
ters to their purchasers to remind them of similar reimport rules. GSK’s move, how-
ever,  appears  to  be  the  first  time  a  company  has  set  out  consequences  for  failure 
to  comply.’’  The  actions  of  GSK  and  other  manufacturers  have  had  some  impact  on 
drug  supply  in  Canada.  Keep  in  mind  that  the  United  States  represents  about  50 
percent  of  the  world  pharmaceutical  market,  while  Canada  is  only  about  one-tenth 
that size, or 5 percent of the world market. 

Health  Canada  has  also  conducted  inspections  of  ‘‘Canadian  pharmacies  that  are 
thought  to  be  acting  as  wholesalers  for  the  purpose  of  exporting  drugs  to  the  U.S.’’ 
The Executive Director of the Canadian National Association of Regulatory Authori-
ties  told  the  DHHS  task  force  on  drug  importation  at  its  April  27,  2004  meeting 
that  if  pharmacies  ‘‘are  purchasing  drugs  from  other  pharmacies,  they’re  acting  as 
wholesalers. And if they don’t have an establishment (wholesale) license, that would 
be  illegal.  The  Canadian  authority  is  also  looking  for  ‘‘unapproved  drugs  being  dis-
pensed.’’  [FDC  Reports,  The  Pink  Sheet,  Vol.  66,  No.  18,  May  3,  2004,  p.  40]  The 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00076 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

73 

Health Canada official pointed out that ‘‘in terms of the exportation of drugs to the 
U.S., there’s nothing federally (in Canada) that prevents that (importation).’’ 
Recommendations 

The  following  recommendations  are  made  to  facilitate  importation  (and  re-impor-
tation),  while  minimizing  counterfeits  in  the  U.S.  market.  Consumers  and  private 
and public programs are far more likely to benefit from importation through the tra-
ditional  distribution  channels  in  the  United  States.  Internet  purchases  would  drop 
dramatically, or virtually disappear, if American consumers can get the lower prices 
of  foreign  markets  at  their  corner  drug  store.  Also,  the  pharmacist  can  maintain  a 
complete medication history and more appropriately provide counseling and medica-
tion therapy management. 

1.  Eliminate  or  closely  regulate  sale  of  drugs  over  the  Internet,  both  domestic 
and international. 
2.  Establish  a  pedigree  system  that:  (a)  must  be  initiated  at  the  manufacturer 
level,  (b)  can  not  be  unreasonably  withheld  from  wholesalers  and  end-pur-
chasers,  and  (c)  is  required  as  product  passes  to  wholesaler  and  pharmacy,  or 
other end purchaser. 
3. Set uniform standards for the pedigree system so that a multiplicity of state 
requirements  do  not  proliferate  and  complicate  the  process  (and  cost)  of  imple-
menting the pedigree system. 
4.  Authorize  importation  of  pharmaceutical  products  through  ‘‘normal  channels 
of  distribution’’  (i.e.,  traditional  wholesalers,  chain  warehouses,  and  community 
pharmacies). 
5.  Prohibit  manufacturer  manipulation  of  supply  as  a  means  to  limit  importa-
tion from the markets with lower prices. 

Senator DORGAN. Dr. Schondelmeyer, thank you very much. 
Finally, we will hear from Nelda Barnett, who’s a member of the 

Board of Directors of the AARP. 
Ms. Barnett, you may proceed. 

STATEMENT OF NELDA BARNETT, MEMBER, 

BOARD OF DIRECTORS, AARP 

Ms.  BARNETT.  Mr.  Chairman  and  members  of  the  Committee,  I 
am  Nelda  Barnett,  a  member  of  AARP  Board  of  Directors.  Thank 
you  very  much  for  including  AARP  in  your  discussions  about  the 
implication of prescription drug importation for U.S. consumers. 

Americans  need  affordable  prescription  drugs,  but,  for  too  many 
people,  the  price  of  drugs  is  beyond  their  means.  Recent  AARP 
studies  reveal  that  drug  prices  continue  to  rise  much  faster  than 
the rate of inflation. Our members tell us that these high prices are 
the single greatest barrier to obtaining needed medication. 

Rising prescription drug prices affect every segment of the popu-
lation.  Though  tens  of  millions  of  Medicare  beneficiaries  are  now 
getting  help  with  their  prescription  drug  costs  through  Medicare 
Part  D,  beneficiaries  are  still  feeling  the  effects  of  rising  prescrip-
tion drugs—costs—in the form of higher premiums, deductibles, co-
payments, and, for some beneficiaries, lack of coverage in the donut 
hole. 

Escalating  prescription  drug  prices  continue  to  hamper  employ-
ers’  ability  to  provide  health  insurance  coverage  for  their  workers 
and  families.  Pressures  also  squeeze  public  programs  at  both  the 
State  and  Federal  level.  Rising  prescription  drug  prices  plague 
Medicaid  and  put  pressures  on  states’  ability  to  maintain  current 
coverage  levels,  let  alone  expand  eligibility  to  meet  the  increasing 
need  as  fewer  employers  provide  access  to  affordable  healthcare 
coverage. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00077 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

74 

Finally,  rising  prescription  drug  prices  particularly  hurt  the  al-
most  47  million  Americans  who  lack  health  insurance.  These  indi-
viduals  pay  most  of  the  highest  prices  in  the  world  for  the—for 
their prescription drug needs. Some don’t fill prescriptions, because 
they cannot afford to do so. 

Importation is not the sole solution to soaring drug prices in the 
United States, but it will create downward pressure on drug prices 
and provide consumers some immediate relief. 

The  simple  fact  is  that  importation  is  already  happening.  Many 
Americans  already  purchase  their  drugs  from  other  countries.  The 
trend  is  growing,  and  we  have  a  responsibility  to  ensure  that 
Americans can access lower drug costs safely. 

Safety  is  critical  in  any  importation  system.  The  Dorgan-Snowe 
bill  ensures  safety  and  provides  consumer  protections,  including 
anti-counterfeiting  and  anti-tampering  requirements,  mandatory 
labeling  and  chain-of-custody  requirements.  My  written  statement 
outlines these safety precautions and protections. 

I would also like to add that a system of safe importation cannot 
be  realized  if  the  industry  curtails  supply.  We  believe  that  a  vital 
component of the Dorgan-Snowe bill are the provisions that seek to 
prevent  the  drug  industry  from  cutting  off  supply  to  countries  en-
gaging in importation to the United States. 

AARP has endorsed the Dorgan-Snowe importation legislation, S. 
242.  We  believe  it  meets  the  challenge  of  designing  a  prescription 
drug importation program that will ensure the integrity of pharma-
ceuticals and provide consumers access to lower-cost drugs. 

Our  members  want  Congress  to  enact  bipartisan  legislation  this 
year  to  allow  for  safe,  legal  importation  of  lower-cost  prescription 
drugs.  AARP  is  pleased  to  see  this  Committee  and  Members  of 
Congress from both sides of the aisle moving forward on this issue. 
We understand the challenges Congress faces in designing a pro-
gram  that  ensures  the  integrity  of  pharmaceuticals,  but  does  not 
create an overly burdensome process that would prevent consumers 
from gaining access to lower-cost prescription drugs. We believe the 
Dorgan-Snowe legislation meets that threshold, and we urge its en-
actment this year. 

Thank you, again, for inviting us here, and I’m happy to answer 

any questions. 

[The prepared statement of Ms. Barnett follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF NELDA BARNETT, MEMBER, BOARD OF DIRECTORS, AARP 
AARP is pleased that the Committee is moving forward with the issue of prescrip-
tion  drug  importation.  Congress  has  been  considering  legislation  to  provide  for  im-
portation of lower-priced prescription drugs for well over a decade, and we strongly 
urge  you  and  your  colleagues  to  take  action  this  year  to  enact  S.  242,  the  Pharma-
ceutical  Market  Access  and  Drug  Safety  Act.  We  believe  this  legislation  includes 
measures  to  ensure  the  safety  of  imported  prescription  drugs,  while  at  the  same 
time allowing Americans to gain access to lower-priced prescription drugs. 
Prescription Drug Prices Continue to Rise at Unsustainable Rates 

Prescription drug costs continue to rise. Recent reports estimate that total spend-
ing  on  health  care  is  expected  to  double  by  2016,  and  much  of  this  is  due  to  rising 
prescription drug costs.1 

1 John  A.  Poisal,  et  al.,  Health  Spending  Projections  Through  2016:  Modest  Changes  Obscure 

Part D’s Impact, Health Affairs, 21 Feb. 2007. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00078 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

75 

A  recent  AARP  study  revealed  that,  on  average,  pharmaceutical  manufacturer 
prices  for  the  193  brand  name  drugs  most  widely  used  by  older  Americans  rose  at 
nearly  twice  the  rate  of  general  inflation  in  2006.2 Reversing  the  trend  between 
2004 and 2005, when the average rate of increase in manufacturer drug prices fell, 
the  2006  average  growth  rate  of  6.2  percent  represents  an  up-tick  from  the  2005 
average  increase  of  6.0  percent.  For  the  153  brand-name  drugs  that  were  in  the 
market  since  2000,  this  translates  into  a  cumulative  average  price  increase  of  53.6 
percent,  over  two-and-one-half  times  the  general  inflation  rate  of  20.1  percent  over 
the same period.3 

The new Medicare prescription drug benefit is helping tens of millions of Medicare 
beneficiaries  better  afford  their  prescription  drugs.  However,  even  with  this  new 
program,  Medicare  beneficiaries  are  still  feeling  the  effects  of  rising  prescription 
drugs  costs  in  the  form  of  the  higher  premiums,  deductibles,  co-payments  and—for 
some beneficiaries—lack of coverage in the donut hole. 

Medicare beneficiaries are not the only group impacted by rising prescription drug 
prices.  Escalating  prescription  drug  prices  continue  to  hamper  employers’  ability  to 
provide  health  insurance  coverage  for  their  workers  and  families.  In  addition  em-
ployers are increasingly eliminating or curtailing their retiree prescription drug cov-
erage. 

Pressures also continue to squeeze public programs at both the state and Federal 
level.  Rising  drug  prices  also  plague  Medicaid,  and  put  pressure  on  states’  ability 
to  maintain  current  coverage  levels.  These  prices  also  hamper  states’  ability  to  ex-
pand  eligibility  to  meet  the  increasing  need  as  fewer  employers  provide  access  to 
affordable health care coverage. 

Finally,  rising  prescription  drug  prices  particularly  hurt  the  almost  47  million 
Americans  who  lack  health  insurance.  These  individuals  pay  among  the  highest 
prices  in  the  world  for  their  prescription  drug  needs.  Some  don’t  fill  prescriptions 
because they cannot afford to do so. 
Public Support for Importation Grows 

For  the  millions  of  Americans  without  drug  coverage  and  those  with  limited  cov-
erage,  importation  is  seen  as  an  option  to  obtain  access  to  affordable  medications. 
A  recent  AARP  poll  found  that  AARP  members  overwhelmingly  support  Congress 
allowing  for  the  importation  of  drugs  from  Canada  and  Europe.4 While  AARP  does 
not  believe  prescription  drug  importation  is  the  sole  solution  to  soaring  drug  prices 
in  the  United  States,  we  do  believe  it  is  one  way  to  begin  to  secure  lower  priced 
drugs. 

Our members and their families question why brand name drug prices in Canada 
and  other  industrialized  countries  can  be  lower—sometimes  by  as  much  as  50  per-
cent lower—than prices in the U.S. It is a national embarrassment that people from 
all over the world come to the United States to access our advanced medical systems 
while  many  of  our  own  citizens  need  to  look  outside  our  borders  in  order  to  afford 
their prescription drugs. 

The simple fact is that importation is already happening. In 2003, Americans pur-
chased  approximately  12  million  prescription  drug  products  (valued  at  almost  $700 
million) from Canada alone.5 As prescription drug prices continue to rise, more and 
more individuals are choosing to import prescription drugs. We have a responsibility 
to ensure that Americans who choose to import prescription drugs do so safely. Con-
gress  can  no  longer  afford  to  do  nothing  but  hope  that  the  millions  of  Americans 
who purchase prescription drugs from abroad do so without dire consequences. 
Congress Should Act Quickly to Pass the Dorgan-Snowe Legislation 

We  believe  that  Congress  should  enact  legislation  that  provides  appropriate  safe-
guards while at the same time ensuring a workable system for prescription drug im-
portation.  Currently,  many  prescription  drugs  sold  for  market  in  the  U.S.  are  al-
ready manufactured abroad and brought into the U.S. safely and legally by prescrip-
tion drug manufactures. If these manufacturers can import drugs safely and legally, 
then  a  process  can  be  created  to  allow  American  consumers  to  safely  import  drugs. 

2 David J. Gross, Leigh Gross Purvis, and Stephen W. Schondelmeyer, Trends in Manufacturer 
Prices  of  Brand  Name  Prescription  Drugs  Used  by  Older  Americans,  2006  Year-End  Update, 
AARP Public Policy Institute Data Digest #DD154 (Washington, D.C.: AARP), March 2007. 

3 Id. 
4 AARP  Knowledge  Management,  Medicare  Price  Negotiation  of  Prescription  Drugs—A  Na-
tional  Poll  February  12,  2007,  page  8,  available  at:  http://assets.aarp.org/rgcenter/health/ 
rxlnegotiation.pdf. 

5 HHS  Task  Force  on  Drug  Importation,  Report  on  Prescription  Drug  Importation,  December 

2004, at 11–12. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00079 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

76 

S.  242  balances  the  challenge  of  designing  a  prescription  drug  importation  pro-
gram  to  ensure  the  integrity  of  pharmaceuticals  while  at  the  same  time  providing 
consumers  access  to  lower  price  prescription  drugs.  We  strongly  urge  you  and  your 
colleagues to enact S. 242 this year. 
Dorgan-Snowe Ensures the Safety of Imported Drugs 

Access to lower-priced prescription drugs isn’t enough. These prescription medica-
tions  must  be  safe  and  efficacious.  Recent  news  reports  highlight  an  increasing 
problem  with  the  use  of  counterfeit  drugs.  Implementing  a  system  of  safety  proce-
dures could begin to alleviate this serious problem. 

AARP supports the approach taken in S. 242 to create a system that provides for 
importation of safe, effective pharmaceuticals. The legislation first legalizes personal 
importation  from  Canadian  pharmacies  and  wholesalers.  Regulation  of  the  Cana-
dian  pharmacy  system  closely  resembles  its  U.S.  counterpart,  and  drugs  purchased 
from Canada can be as safe as drugs purchased in the United States. 

Under  the  legislation,  importers  and  exporters  must  agree  to  allow  their  place  of 
business to be inspected by the Food and Drug Administration (‘‘FDA’’) not less than 
twelve  times  per  year.  The  legislation  also  tasks  the  FDA  with  the  responsibility 
of  ensuring  that  the  prescription  drugs  imported  from  abroad  are  comparable  to 
drugs  available  in  the  U.S.  market.  If  the  difference  between  the  foreign  drug  and 
its  U.S.  counterpart  is  minimal,  the  FDA  can  allow  the  drug  to  be  imported  into 
the  U.S.  However,  if  the  difference  is  significant,  a  supplemental  application  may 
be  required.  If  the  supplemental  application  would  not  be  approved,  the  FDA  will 
prevent the importation of the prescription drug. 

To  ensure  that  the  FDA  isn’t  besieged  with  inspection  and  certification  require-
ments, the legislation allows the FDA to phase-in its review of registered importers 
and exporters, provided that priority is given to entities that can process a high vol-
ume  of  sales.  Likewise,  the  legislation  also  permits  the  FDA  to  phase-in  its  review 
of foreign versions of FDA-approved drugs to determine whether they are the same 
as their U.S. counterparts. AARP believes that phasing in these provisions will fur-
ther  bolster  the  safety  of  the  importation  plan  by  providing  FDA  the  opportunity 
to conduct thorough inspections and review. 
Pedigree Requirements 

One  way  of  effectively  ensuring  the  safety  of  pharmaceuticals  is  the  institution 
of pedigree requirements—the ability to trace a drug from the point of origin to the 
point  of  dispensing.  In  order  to  accomplish  this  task  in  an  expanded  international 
arena,  the  Dorgan-Snowe  legislation  mandates  that  importers  and  exporters  may 
only  purchase  prescription  drugs  from  a  manufacturer  or  entity  that  can  establish 
a drug’s pedigree. These requirements include identification of the drug’s prior sale 
or transaction and contractual authority to inspect records to determine whether an 
entity  engaged  in  the  system  is  in  compliance  with  applicable  safety  and  other 
standards. AARP believes that standards such as these are crucial to protecting the 
quality and efficacy of imported pharmaceuticals. 

In order to ensure safety, pharmaceuticals imported from another country should 
be equipped with anti-tampering materials and anti-counterfeiting measures. As the 
technology  in  this  area  progresses,  imported  pharmaceuticals  should  be  equipped 
with state-of-the-art devices, such as bar codes, and specialized ink, or other appro-
priate  technology.  The  Dorgan-Snowe  bill  requires  the  use  of  anti-tampering  and/ 
or track-and-trace technologies to prevent counterfeiting of imported drugs. 

Finally,  S.  242  provides  that  pharmaceuticals  imported  by  wholesalers  and  phar-
macies  be  labeled  in  such  a  way  as  to  indicate  to  the  consumer  that  the  drug  has 
been  imported  under  the  new  system.  Consumers  will  thus  expect  to  realize  some 
savings from these pharmaceuticals. 
Anti-Gaming Provisions 

We  recognize  that  some  manufacturers  are  already  curtailing  their  drug  supply 
to  Canada  and  other  countries,  which  could  lead  to  supply  shortages  or  fear  of  ret-
ribution  by  entities  that  engage  in  importation.  An  importation  proposal  that  does 
not  seek  to  prevent  entities  from  pressuring  those  who  engage  in  importation  will 
amount  to  nothing  more  than  an  importation  system  in  name  only.  Our  members 
do not want hollow promises of importation—they want legislation passed that will 
allow them the opportunity to fill their prescription safely and at a lower price. 

Therefore,  AARP  believes  that  anti-gaming  provisions  are  a  vital  component  of 
any  importation  legislation.  The  Dorgan-Snowe  legislation  seeks  to  prevent  enti-
ties—particularly  pharmaceutical  manufactures—from  eliminating  or  curtailing 
drug  supply  to  those  who  engage  in  importation  of  prescription  drugs  to  the  U.S. 
so that the system can work as Congress intends. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00080 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

77 

Protection from Rogue Internet Pharmacies 

Many  consumers  who  choose  to  purchase  prescription  drugs  from  abroad  do  so 
through  Internet  pharmacies.  Unfortunately,  many  consumers  fall  victim  to  rogue 
Internet  pharmacies  due  in  part  to  the  inability  to  distinguish  between  reputable 
and fly-by-night operations. 

The Dorgan-Snowe legislation instructs the FDA to maintain a website listing ap-
proved pharmacies. Having the FDA website as the point of contact for a list of ap-
proved pharmacies provides consumers with an official, secure source of information 
on  safe  drugs.  However,  not  all  consumers  have  access  to  the  Internet;  therefore, 
the  legislation  provides  that  the  FDA  must  also  maintain  a  toll-free  number  where 
consumers can get information on approved foreign sources. 
Conclusion 

The Dorgan-Snowe legislation provides for a safe and effective system for allowing 
importation  of  prescription  drugs.  Our  members,  and  all  Americans,  need  Congress 
to enact this bi-partisan, legislation this year. We are pleased to see this Committee 
and Members from both Houses of Congress and both sides of the aisle moving for-
ward  on  this  issue.  AARP  pledges  to  work  with  you  to  make  safe  importation  a  re-
ality. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Ms.  Barnett,  thank  you  very  much  for  being 

here. 

And thanks, to all five of you, for offering testimony today, testi-
mony  that  is  varied  and  different,  and  comes  to  different  conclu-
sions  about  this  issue.  We  recognize  it’s  a  controversial  issue.  And 
that’s  precisely  why  we  have  asked  witnesses  to  provide  varied 
viewpoints. 

Dr.  Schondelmeyer,  you  heard  Dr.  Lutter,  and  you  heard  former 
Congressman  Tauzin,  describe—I  think  Billy  Tauzin’s  comment 
was,  ‘‘open  the  door  to  those  products  to  come  in,’’  referring  to  the 
legislation  that  would  allow  importation.  I  think  Mr.  Lutter  de-
scribed  the  counterfeits  and  the  specter  of  reimportation  compro-
mising our drug supply, amplifying the problem of counterfeits, and 
so on. You disagree with that? And you have indicated in your tes-
timony,  I  believe,  that  you  feel  that  safety  provisions  in  the  Dor-
gan-Snowe  bill  would,  in  fact,  strengthen  our  confidence  in  the 
drug supply. Can you respond to that? 

Dr. SCHONDELMEYER. Sure, I’d be glad to, sir. 
First  of  all,  I  believe  that  the  current  system  we  have  is  much 
like  the  Wild  West  environment,  where  people  can  do  about  any-
thing  they  want,  in  terms  of  buying  prescription  drugs  on  the 
Internet, as long as they keep the quantities low and they don’t get 
caught  in  the  process;  or  they  can  go  across  the  border  to  Canada 
and Mexico, and we kind of look the other way and let them do it. 
And  that’s—so,  the  door  is  open.  The  back  door,  the  front  door  is 
open  already.  I  think  the  system  proposed  by  the  Snowe-Dorgan 
bill and similar bills really defines a process that closes the system 
and  says,  ‘‘We  will  use  the  traditional  channels,  the  channels  that 
FDA  knows  and  works  with.  We  will  ask  FDA  to  finally  give  us  a 
pedigree  chain-of-custody  system  that  they’ve  had  authority  to  do 
for 20 years, and haven’t done.’’ And I think that will close the sys-
tem  and  help  keep  counterfeits  out  of  the  market,  rather  than 
make them more available. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Mr.  Tauzin,  what’s  wrong  with  that  analysis, 

if anything? 

Mr. TAUZIN. Well, there’s a lot wrong with it. And we’ll be happy 
to  comment  in  much  larger  degree  to  you,  to  all  of  the  points  that 
we think are weak in the draft we’ve seen. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00081 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

78 

But  one  of  the  most  important  parts,  for  example,  is  that  the 
FDA, under the bill, has no control over the shipper and where the 
drugs are coming from. There is no authorization, no possibility, as 
you heard from FDA, for them to regulate unregulated manufactur-
ers  in  China  and  India  and  Kazakhstan,  or  wherever  it  may  be 
coming from. The bill opens up importation, as you know, to many 
more  countries—29  more  countries—than  does  the  current  law, 
which  applies  to  Canada.  And  even  if  you  limited  it  to  Canada, 
we’re  told  that  the  drugs  coming  into  Canada  are  coming  from 
many  other  sources.  There  are  figures  we  can  give  you  on  the  in-
credible rising number of imports into Canada from strange sources 
around the world of drugs manufactured in establishments not reg-
ulated  by  the  FDA,  not  controlled,  nor  even  registered  with  the 
FDA.  Under  this  bill,  they  would  remain  unregistered,  uncon-
trolled, uninspected, and they would be allowed to ship into the au-
thorized receivers in this country of those products, and they would 
be commingled with the supply in this country. It is—— 

Senator DORGAN. But, Mr. Tauzin—— 
Mr.  TAUZIN.  It  is  not  a  simple  task.  And  my  final  thought,  Mr. 
Dorgan,  is—I  mean,  we’re  obviously  willing  to  work  with  you  on 
this.  The  law  requires  that  if  Donna  Shalala  and  Mr.  Thompson 
and  Mr.  Leavitt  had  been  able  to  certify  the  safety,  that  importa-
tion  would  be  allowed.  The  problem  is,  they  have  not  been  able  to 
do  so.  It  is  not  as  easy  as  has  been  described  here.  And  even,  I 
think,  the  attempts  in  this  bill  to  address  those  issues  are  going 
to  fall  woefully  short.  But  we’ll  be  happy  to  have  those  conversa-
tions with you about why we think that’s true. 

Senator DORGAN. I’ll give you a chance to respond in a bit again, 
except  I  would  observe  that  the  counterfeiting  that  is  described  by 
you  and  Mr.  Lutter  is  occurring  under  today’s  circumstances.  And 
I believe that the legislation that we have drafted will, in fact, sub-
stantially  reduce  the  opportunity  for  that.  But  let  me  ask  Mr. 
Schultz. 

Mr.  Schultz,  you,  in  a  previous  life,  were  the  Deputy  Commis-
sioner  for  Policy  at  the  FDA.  You  believe  that,  with  proper  re-
sources,  that  there  can  be  a  regime  of  reimportation  that  does  not 
threaten  or  compromise  our  prescription  drug  supply  in  this  coun-
try. Is that correct? 

Mr. SCHULTZ. Yes. And I’ve reviewed your bill. There are always 
going  to  be  constructive  suggestions  and  improvement  and  so  on, 
but  it’s  a  very  comprehensive,  sophisticated  approach  that,  most 
importantly, gives the agency resources to do the job. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Let  me  ask  if  there’s  any  of  you  on  the  panel 
who believes that the U.S. consumer should pay the highest prices 
in  the  world  for  brand  name  prescription  drugs.  Now,  that,  I  be-
lieve, is now the case. You can contest that, if you like. But if that 
is  the  case—and  I  believe  it  is—does  anybody  believe  that  is  the 
fair  method  of  pricing  prescription  drugs,  that  the  U.S.  consumer 
should bear the highest cost? 

Mr. TAUZIN. I don’t. 
Senator DORGAN. You don’t? 
Mr.  TAUZIN.  I  think  we  have  failed  miserably  in  insisting  that 
other  people  around  the  world  bear  the  cost  of  R&D.  Charlie  Ran-
gel,  in  an  interview,  Sunday,  made  it  very,  very  clear.  Congress-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00082 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

79 

man  Rangel  said,  ‘‘You  know,  Americans  pay  the  R&D  expenses— 
for  a  lot  of  things,  not  just  pharmaceuticals—for  the  rest  of  the 
world,  and  they  don’t  bear  a  responsible  share  of  the  cost.’’  And 
that’s true. And that’s a failure of our trade policies. 

Senator DORGAN. So—— 
Mr.  TAUZIN.  But  importing  their  price  control  systems  into  our 
country is not free trade, and it is not the kind of stuff that is going 
to lead to the investment in R&D and new drugs that we need for 
the world, much less for this country. 

Senator  DORGAN.  So,  if  the  consumer  in  the  U.S.  pays  the  high-
est prices in the world—80-year-old man sitting on a straw bale on 
a  farm  in  southern  North  Dakota  tells  me  his  wife  is  fighting 
breast  cancer  for  3  years—3  years.  They  drive  back  and  forth  to 
Canada, because it’s the only way they could afford Tamoxifen, at, 
you  know,  80  percent  discount.  If—this  is  the  case  for  American 
consumers, that they—— 

Mr. TAUZIN. Mr. Chairman, I read your story, a number of times. 
Tamoxifen,  today,  under  the  Medicare  Part  D,  which  is  available 
to that couple you met, would cost 30 cents a day now. 

Senator DORGAN. Yes, which—— 
Mr. TAUZIN. The prices—we’ve got a chart we’ll show you, of the 
top  ten  medicines,  where  actually  the  prices  under  Medicare  Part 
D  coverage,  where  insurance—where  seniors  now  have  available 
coverage with those drugs—are lower than Canadian prices. 

Senator DORGAN. That would work if you were 77 years old, but 

not if you’re 57 years old. 

Mr. TAUZIN. Well, as a matter of fact—— 
Senator DORGAN. So, it’s part pragmatic—— 
Mr. TAUZIN.—that’s why we put the PPA program together. 
Senator DORGAN. But—— 
Mr. TAUZIN. This year, we’ve reached the 3.5 million mark of pa-
tients  we’ve  added  to  free  medicine  programs  in  this  country,  who 
are  in  that  category,  Mr.  Dorgan.  What  we’re  saying  is,  there  are 
better alternatives—— 

Senator  DORGAN.  I  commend  the  industry  for  that,  Mr.  Tauzin, 

but—— 

Mr. TAUZIN. Thank you. 
Senator  DORGAN.—that  is  not  a  substitute  for  fair  pricing.  And 
I  asked  the  question,  anybody  think  that  the  current  system,  in 
which  we  pay  the  highest  prices,  is  a  fair  system?  All  of  you,  I 
think—I don’t think anybody volunteered to say, ‘‘Yup, sign me up. 
I  think  Americans  ought  to  continue  to  pay  the  highest  prices.’’  If 
that is the case, then the question isn’t whether we have a change, 
the question is, what is the change to try to resolve that? 

Now,  Dr.  Vernon,  you  came  with  a  study  that  says  if  you  cut 
prices—that is, create a circumstance in which the market system, 
the  U.S.  consumer  can  access,  through  the  market  system,  the 
FDA-approved  drug  at  a  lower  price,  the  price  it’s  being  sold  at  in 
much  of  the  rest  of  the  world—if  you  do  that,  it  would  necessarily 
reduce  the  amount  of  research  and  development  expenditures  by 
the  pharmaceutical  industry.  I  understand  the  math  of  that,  but  I 
don’t  understand  the  circumstances  of  why  you  connect  that  price 
to R&D. How about connecting that to marketing, for example? My 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00083 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

80 

feeling is that most of the drug industry spends more on marketing 
and  promotion  than  they  do  on  research  and  development,  or—— 

Mr. TAUZIN. That’s not true. 
Senator  DORGAN.—at  least  it’s  a  very—well,  we’ll  have  the 

record—— 

Mr. TAUZIN. OK. 
Senator DORGAN.—you may submit for the record—— 
Mr. TAUZIN. Yes, we will—— 
Senator DORGAN.—your evaluation—— 
Mr. TAUZIN.—do that. 
Senator DORGAN.—of that. 
[The information previously referred to follows:] 

ADDITIONAL STATEMENT OF W.J. BILLY TAUZIN, PRESIDENT AND CEO, 

PHARMACEUTICAL RESEARCH AND MANUFACTURERS OF AMERICA (PHRMA) 

Mr. Chairman, I wanted to address the issue you raised regarding how much drug 
companies  spend  on  research  and  development,  marketing  and  direct-toconsumer 
advertising. 

The biopharmaceutical industry spent $55.2 billion in 2006 on research and devel-
opment according to data from PhRMA’s Annual Survey 1 and an independent anal-
ysis by Burrill & Company, an increase from $51.8 billion in 2005.2 By way of com-
parison,  the  biopharmaceutical  industry  spent  $11.4  billion  on  marketing  and  edu-
cational  activities  in  2005,  including  $4.2  billion  on  direct-to-consumer  ads,  accord-
ing  to  IMS  Health.3 Notably,  in  October  2006,  CBO  reported,  ‘‘The  pharmaceutical 
industry is one of the most research-intensive industries in the United States. Phar-
maceutical  firms  invest  as  much  as  five  times  more  in  research  and  development, 
relative to their sales, than the average U.S. manufacturing firm.’’ 4 

Some  critics  of  the  biopharmaceutical  industry  have  claimed  companies  spend 
more on marketing than on research. First, they reach this flawed conclusion by cat-
egorizing all selling, general, and administrative expenses reported in filings to the 
Security and Exchange Commission (SEC) as ‘‘marketing costs.’’ However, this line- 
item  includes  such  non-marketing  costs  as  free  medicines  provided  to  low-income 
patients  through  patient  assistance  programs,  distribution  and  shipping  expenses, 
systems  and  IT  support,  and  corporate  functions  (i.e.,  legal,  communications,  dues, 
procurement,  utilities  and  property  taxes).  As  Princeton  professor  Uwe  Reinhardt 
has written, ‘‘the [selling, general and administrative] category represents many ex-
penses  other  than  selling  expenses  and  should  not  be  seen  as  an  estimate  purely 
of  outlays  on  marketing,  as  the  industry’s  critics  occasionally  do.’’ 5 I  hope  that  we 
can agree that these comparisons are not grounded in fact. 

Second,  the  critics  who  make  this  point  also  fail  to  acknowledge  that  marketing 
expenditures  help  bring  patients  into  treatment  for  previously  untreated  or  under-
treated  conditions,6 and  help  improve  compliance  with  physician-prescribed  treat-
ment.7 Moreover, there is a gap in ‘‘translating research findings into medical prac-
tice.’’ 8 Bringing health professionals FDA-regulated information regarding prescrip-
tion  medicines  can  help  bridge  this  gap.9 Early  intervention  and  improved  compli-
ance  for  conditions  like  high  blood  pressure,  diabetes,  and  cardiovascular  disease 
can help patients remain healthier and avoid high health care costs. 

1 PhRMA, Profile; Appendix: PhRMA Annual Member Survey (Washington, D.C.: PhRMA). 
2 Burrill  &  Company,  analysis  for  PhRMA,  2006  and  2007.  Includes  PhRMA  research  associ-

ates and nonmembers. 

3 IMS Health, Integrated Promotional ServicesTM and CMR, 5/2006. 
4 Congressional Budget Office, Research and Development in the Pharmaceutical Industry; Oc-

tober 2006. 

tober 2001 

5 U.E. Reinhardt, Perspectives on the Pharmaceutical Industry; Health Affairs, September/Oc-

6 J.S.  Weissman  et  al..  ‘‘Physicians  Report  on  Patient  Encounters  Involving  Direct-to-Con-

sumer Advertising.’’ Health Affairs Web Exclusive, April 28, 2004. 

7 Federal  Trade  Commission  and  Department  and  the  Department  of  Justice,  Improving 

Health Care: A Dose of Competition; July 2004. 

8 C.  Lenfant,  ‘‘Clinical  Research  to  Clinical  Practice:  Lost  In  Transition?’’  The  New  England 

Journal of Medicine, August 28, 2003. 

9 Dubois. R., et al., ‘‘Growth in Use of Lipid-Lowering Therapies: Are We Targeting the Right 

Patients;’’ The American Journal of Managed Care, October 2002. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00084 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

81 

The  pharmaceutical  industry’s  investment  in  the  discovery  of  new  medicines  is 
yielding  important  results  for  patients.  For  instance,  just  over  the  last  few  weeks, 
the  FDA  has  approved  a  medicine  that  represents  an  entirely  new  approach  to 
treating high blood pressure 10 and press reports 11,12 indicate promising trial results 
for  three  new  medicines  to  treat  HIV,  including  two  that  are  entirely  new  ap-
proaches  to  attacking  this  virus  and  one  that  overcomes  resistance  to  earlier  drugs 
of its type. 

At  the  same  time  that  medical  advances  continue  to  meet  patients’  health  care 
needs,  medicines  remain  a  small  part  of  overall  health  spending.  According  to  the 
latest  estimates  by  the  Centers  for  Medicare  &  Medicaid  Office  of  the  Actuary 
(OACT),  spending  on  prescription  medicines  accounted  for  10  percent  of  national 
health  spending  in  2005,  and  8.5  percent  of  overall  growth  of  health  care  costs. 
Other  services  accounted  for  over  91  percent  of  overall  cost  growth.  In  2005,  pre-
scription  drug  spending  growth  slowed  for  the  sixth  consecutive  year,  reaching  its 
lowest level (5.8 percent) since 1977. 

Senator  DORGAN.  But  the  fact  is,  it’s  a—if  not,  it’s  a  very  close 
second.  And  this  morning  I  once  again,  as  I  was  getting  ready  for 
work,  was  asked  if  I  shouldn’t  ask  my  doctor  about  several  kinds 
of  prescription  drugs.  A  substantial  amount  is  spent  on  marketing 
and promotion. Did you study whether reducing the expenditure for 
direct  television  ads,  for  example,  asking  me  whether  I  could  ask 
my  doctor  if  the  purple  pill  was  right  for  me  or  for  my  colleague 
Senator  Snowe—if  they  reduced  that  expenditure,  could  that  am-
plify and help with additional research and development? 

Dr. VERNON. I appreciate that question. And I would add that all 
businesses  and  companies,  and  politicians,  for  that  matter,  invest 
in marketing. It’s part of the business practice. And firms make de-
cisions on how much they’re going to invest in R&D based upon ex-
pected  future  returns.  To  the  extent  that  marketing  expenditures 
enter  into  that,  or  other  factors,  it  will  impact  R&D  investment. 
However,  the  focus  of  our  study  was  on  how  we  can  measure  ex-
pected  returns  by  the  industry,  and  identifying  the  precise  empir-
ical  link  between  those  expected  returns,  prices,  and  profits,  and 
R&D spending. 

Senator DORGAN. Who commissioned the study, Dr. Vernon? 
Dr. VERNON. This was not commissioned, and it was not funded. 
This  was  part  of  my  doctoral  research  and  also  some  of  the  first 
few papers I published when I was on the faculty at the University 
of Connecticut. 

Senator  DORGAN.  But  you’ve  previously  done  work  for  the  phar-

maceutical industry. 

Dr. VERNON. I have previously received funding from various or-
ganizations,  including  the  pharmaceutical  industry,  that’s  correct. 
Senator  DORGAN.  Ms.  Barnett,  the  AARP  supports  this  piece  of 
legislation. I think it goes without saying—and I shouldn’t have to 
say it at this hearing, but I will—I don’t think there’s anyone that 
would  in  any  way  ever  suggest  that  they  want  to  compromise  our 
drug supply or do anything to diminish the safety of our drug sup-
ply. The testimony by Mr. Tauzin and others today, about counter-
feits—counterfeit  drugs—is  disturbing  to  all  of  us.  That  is  existing 
under a circumstance where importation really doesn’t exist in any 

10 FDA Press Release. ‘‘FDA Approves New Drug Treatment for High Blood Pressure;’’ March 

11 Lawrence Altman and Andrew Pollack. ‘‘2 New Drugs Offer Options to Fight H.I.V. in Novel 

Ways’’. The New York Times, February 28, 2007. 

12 Marilyn  Chase,  ‘‘Emerging  Drugs  Show  Promise  Against  HIV.’’,  The  Wall  Street  Journal. 

6, 2007. 

February 28, 2007. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00085 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

82 

managed way. But tell me, about what you think about Mr. Tauzin 
alluding  to  the  fact  that,  ‘‘Look,  since  we  now  have  Medicare  Part 
D,  you’ve  got  access  to  prescription  drugs’’—Mr.  Tauzin  described 
Tamoxifen. Tell me why the AARP is supporting this legislation, if 
you have Medicare Part D. 

Ms.  BARNETT.  Medicare  Part  D  will  only  cover  up  to  a  certain 
part  before  the  consumer  then  has  to  go  into  the  donut  hole,  and, 
at  that  point,  you  don’t  reach  the  amount,  necessarily,  that  is 
there,  that  cost.  But,  on  the  other  hand,  not  all  people—over  half 
of  our  members  are  ages  50  to  64,  and  they’re  not—Medicare  and 
the prescription drug benefit is not available to them. 

Senator DORGAN. Can I just complain about starting—getting let-

ters from the AARP at age 35 or whenever it was I—— 

Ms. BARNETT. Of course you can, but you don’t—— 
[Laughter.] 
Senator DORGAN.—whenever it was I started getting them in my 

mail? I mean, I didn’t feel old at that time. 

Ms. BARNETT. Was this perceived 35 or was it actual 35? 
[Laughter.] 
Senator DORGAN. No, it was—it was actually perceived. 
Senator Snowe? 
[Laughter.] 
Senator SNOWE. Thank you very much. 
And I want to welcome the panel. 
Former Congressman Tauzin, you were mentioning about former 
Secretary  of  Health  and  Human  Services,  Secretary  Shalala.  And, 
it’s  interesting,  to  examine  the  three  objections  that  she  had—if  I 
can  find  them  here—back  in  2000,  when  she  said  that  it  was  ‘‘im-
possible  for  me  to  demonstrate  that  importation  is  safe  and  cost- 
effective.’’  First,  she  said,  based  on  the  provision  which  ‘‘allows 
drug  manufacturers  to  deny  U.S.  importers  legal  access  to  the 
FDA-approved  labeling  that  is  required  for  reimportation.’’  Two, 
that ‘‘the drug reimportation provision fails to prevent drug manu-
facturers  from  discriminating  against  foreign  distributors  that  im-
port  drugs  to  the  United  States.’’  And,  third,  that  ‘‘the  reimporta-
tion  system  has  both  authorization  and  funding  limitations  .
. 
the  law  requires  that  the  system  end  5  years  after  it  goes  into  ef-
fect.’’ 

So,  all  of  those  issues,  in  one  way  or  another,  have  been  ad-
dressed by our legislation. So, I don’t think it’s safe to say that you 
can  characterize  those  three  problems,  as  she  mentioned  them  as 
issues  upon  which  she  had  to  oppose  the  legislation.  She  was  re-
quired  to  certify  for  safety.  She  didn’t  have  the  resources,  and  she 
only  had  a  simple  certification.  So,  we  have  addressed  all  of  those 
issues in our legislation. 

Mr.  TAUZIN.  She  was  required  to  certify  two  things,  as  the  cur-
rent law requires the Secretary to do, that is, not only that you sat-
isfy  all  the  safety  concerns,  which  we—which  we  agree,  with  her 
and the current Secretary, cannot be safely satisfied, even with this 
legislation.  And  we’ll  elaborate,  as  I  said,  further  to  you  on  that. 
And,  second,  the  cost-effectiveness  of  doing  it.  CBO  estimated  a 
cost  savings,  if  you  did  pass  this  bill,  of  1  to  2  percent  over  10 
years,  with  no  cost  savings  at  all  in  the  first  5  years.  That’s  CBO 
estimates. There have been some other experiences that—you don’t 

.

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00086 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

83 

have  to  take  my  word  for  it.  Go  to  Massachusetts  and  check  with 
their  program.  They  abandoned  importation  when  they  discovered 
that prices in America were actually lower for many drugs, includ-
ing the generic products—— 

Senator  SNOWE.  Yes,  but  isn’t  that  the  choice  of  the  consumer? 
Mr. TAUZIN. I’m sorry? 
Senator SNOWE. I mean, I think—isn’t that the choice of the con-

sumer? I mean, why is the industry so—— 

Mr. TAUZIN. Well, but—— 
Senator SNOWE.—vigorously opposed—— 
Mr. TAUZIN.—but the problem is—— 
Senator SNOWE.—to it if—— 
Mr.  TAUZIN.—the  problem  is,  you’re  not  going  to  make  it  the 
choice  of  the  consumer.  I’ll  be  buying  this  stuff  from  my  hospital 
when I go to the hospital, whether I want to or not. There’s nothing 
in this bill that says I can opt out. 

Senator SNOWE. Yes. Well, let me make another point here. Well, 
you can opt-out—you set up a safety system. That’s the point. Then 
the  consumer  makes  the  determination  whether  or  not  they  want 
to have access to—— 

Mr. TAUZIN. I wish—— 
Senator SNOWE.—imported medications. 
Mr. TAUZIN. I wish—— 
Senator SNOWE. And you mentioned China. Can I just make—— 
Mr. TAUZIN. Yes. 
Senator SNOWE.—clear here? 
Mr. TAUZIN. Yes, go ahead. 
Senator SNOWE. China isn’t on our list. OK? I’m just—make that 
clear.  And  let  me  just  say,  the  European  Union’s  been  doing  it— 
parallel  drug  trading  without  incident  for  the  last  30  years,  and 
they  label  what  is  imported  and  what  is  not.  We  don’t  even  have 
a  system  set  up  in  the  United  States  for  counterfeiting.  I  mean, 
that’s the interesting point here. You know, for all that’s been men-
tioned about the preponderance of domestic counterfeiting, nothing 
has been done to address that. 

So, I think that the point is, here, we’re setting up a system, and 
you  would  have  the  labeling  of  imported  medications,  which  I  un-
derstand—because  that  could  mean  there  would  be  more  competi-
tive pricing in the United States. So, I make that point—— 

Mr.  TAUZIN.  I  invite  you  to  check  with  the  EU  lately.  Parallel 
trading  is  becoming  a  huge  problem.  They  discovered  two  things. 
The  arbitragers  pick  up  all  the  savings.  The  consumers  and  the 
payers don’t get any savings. 

Senator SNOWE. Well—— 
Mr. TAUZIN. And the second thing is that counterfeiting is rising 
dramatically  in  Europe,  and  it’s  coming  from  China.  It  goes 
through  Thailand,  it  arrives  in  Europe,  and—as  it’s  arriving  in 
America from all of the countries that you list in the bill. You can’t 
control it as coming from only those countries anymore. 

Senator  SNOWE.  Well,  you  know—but  I  think  it’s  interesting— 
that  where  we  manufacture—I  mean,  it’s  on  the  map  here—is  all 
over the world. You know, as I said, over 40 countries in which we 
manufacture. And that’s what we’ve done. And we’re talking about 
FDA-approved  facilities.  And  I  think  it’s  very  important  to  say 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00087 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

84 

that.  We  do  that  with  manufacturing  medications  in  over  40  coun-
tries.  We  certainly  can  set  up  a  system.  And  if  you  have  rec-
ommendations  how  better  to  improve  our  legislation,  I  would  hope 
that we would get those recommendations. And—— 
Mr. TAUZIN. Sure. And we’ll talk to you about it. 
Senator SNOWE. OK, great. 
And, Mr. Schultz, you’ve been in the position of our previous wit-
ness.  You  were  former  Deputy  Commissioner  for  food—for  Policy, 
Food and Drug Administration, is that correct? 

Mr. SCHULTZ. Yes. 
Senator  SNOWE.  OK.  So,  you’ve  had  a  chance—and  I  know  you 
responded  to  the  Chairman’s  question—and  you  may  have  some 
other  follow-up  recommendations  on  specifics—is  that  correct?—in 
our  legislation.  But,  overall,  do  you  think  the  framework  that  we 
have is doable? I mean, is this something that can be done for im-
portation, based on our approach in this legislation? 

Mr.  SCHULTZ.  Yes.  I  think  it’s  a  very  sound  approach.  And  I 
think  the  important  point  is  that  it’s  going  to  improve  things,  in 
terms of safety. I don’t know if it’s going to be perfect, but it’s going 
to  inject  resources  to  the  FDA,  it’s  going  to  allow  FDA  to  inspect 
facilities,  and,  where  there  are  commercial  sales,  it  will  require  a 
chain of custody. So, this is a terrific improvement. 

I  mean,  if  I  could  say  a  word  about  price,  there  are  two  points. 
One is, the people buying these drugs from Canada would be really 
shocked  to  know  that  CBO  is  saying  they’re  not  going  to  save 
money  because  they’re  saving  money  today.  The  second  thing  is 
that the reason those CBO estimates may have showed no savings 
is  because  so  many  people  are  doing  it  today.  The  problem  is 
they’re not necessarily getting safe products. And what you’ve done 
in your bill is to set up a system where consumers will have much 
more  assurance  from  FDA  of  safety.  There’s  never  going  to  be  a 
promise.  There’s  nothing  risk-free.  But  we’ll  be  moving  in  that  di-
rection. 

Senator SNOWE. No, I appreciate that and would appreciate your 
future  input  on  our  legislation.  So,  if  there’s  anything  we  can  do 
to make adjustments in that—— 

Senator DORGAN. If I might just—— 
Senator SNOWE. Yes. 
Senator  DORGAN.—for  Senator  Snowe—this  issue  of  savings,  the 
CBO  actually  scored  the  bill  that  we  offered  to  the  FTC  reauthor-
ization,  and  they  scored  a  savings  of  $6.1  billion  over  10  years  for 
the  Government  and  $50  billion  over  10  years  for  consumers.  So, 
the CBO score, the most recent score for legislation nearly identical 
to that which we’ve reintroduced, does show a savings, both to the 
Government and the consumers. 

Senator SNOWE. Thank you. 
Dr.  Vernon,  you  were  focusing  on  the  decline  in  R&D  spending. 
And,  obviously,  we’ll  look  at  the  information  that  you’ve  provided. 
But,  you  know,  the  industry  has  spent  about,  I  think,  $5.6  billion 
more.  At  least  based  on  the  2004  numbers,  in  the  United  States 
than in Europe, even though our consumers are paying $87 billion 
on  higher  prices  than,  foreign  consumers.  So,  I  mean,  I  think  that 
the fact is if you start to compare the R&D spending of the 12 larg-
est pharmaceutical firms by revenue, it’s interesting—they have an 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00088 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

85 

average R&D investment of 14.7 percent of gross revenues, and you 
compare  that  with  other  firms  with  high  R&D  requirements  and 
low  marginal  costs  of  production,  they  have  a  similar  investment 
rate.  It’s  14.4  percent  of  gross  revenues.  And  yet,  they  produce— 
if you’re talking about microprocessors, software, electronics—simi-
larly  situated,  they  produce  products  which  they  improve  every 
year,  and  they’re  offered  at  lower  costs,  and  they  do  not  increase 
pricing of old products at two and three times the rate of inflation. 
So, I don’t see, with importation that the problem is going to re-
sult  in  R&D  decline.  That’s  not  to  include,  frankly,  the  $30  billion 
that’s  spent  by  the  American  taxpayer  in  support  of  the  National 
Institutes of Health and other means for the research and develop-
ment  for  medications  that  consumers  benefit  from  in  other  coun-
tries. And we’re paying the higher prices. 

So, I just don’t see where the argument is here that it’s going to 
have  an  impact  on  the  research  and  development,  given  what  we 
pay  here  in  America  today,  given  what  the  American  taxpayer’s 
paying. I don’t see that the higher margin is increasing the rate of 
investment  in  the  research  and  development.  And  you  compare 
that  with  other  companies,  as  you  look  at  these  charts—they’re 
similarly  situated,  and  yet  we  don’t  get  the  benefit  of  lower  drug 
prices. 

Dr. VERNON. I appreciate that, and I would make a couple of re-

marks. 

The  first  is,  I  do  agree  that  the  U.S.  is  subsidizing  R&D.  And 
that’s  because  foreign  markets  and  governments  regulate  drug 
prices,  and,  in  the  U.S.,  we  largely  do  not.  I  would  say,  also,  that 
the link between R&D spending and prices and profits is unequivo-
cal,  and  is  based  on  over  two  centuries’  worth  of  economists’ 
thought. And economists are united on that issue. So, I don’t think 
that’s a question. 

And  I  do  have  a  question  about  the  comparison  you  made  be-
tween  R&D  intensities  on  the  two  charts  you  showed,  Senator  I 
think what’s relevant is pharmaceutical R&D spending to pharma-
ceutical  sales—and  I’m  not  sure,  of  those  companies  up  there,  if 
what was being represented was pharmaceutical R&D or total firm 
R&D  to  gross  firm  sales.  Because  a  lot  of  the  companies  in  the  in-
dustry  are  diversified  into  various  different  types  of  businesses,  I 
think that’s an important distinction that needs to be made. 

Mr. TAUZIN. Senator, can I add a—— 
Senator SNOWE. Yes. 
Mr. TAUZIN.—thought, too? The big difference in the R&D spend-
ing in our industry, as opposed to other industries, is that the mo-
ment they invent something and get a patent on it, they can go to 
market  with  it.  On  the  other  hand,  our  companies  have  to  spend 
money,  over  14  years  of  clinical  trials,  before  their  product  can  go 
to  market  within  their  20  years  of  patent  protection.  So,  there’s  a 
very  different  economic  model  that,  frankly,  is  getting  very  threat-
ened  today.  But,  at  the  same  time,  even  the  Japanese  companies 
that  are  part  of  our  organization  do  their  R&D  in  America  right 
now.  Most  of  the  European  companies  do  their  R&D  in  America 
today. They’ve left the countries, where the governments have initi-
ated price controls, to come to this country to do their research and 
development. That’s a fact. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00089 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

86 

Senator  SNOWE.  Well,  I’d  just  point  out  another  quote  here  from 
Hank McKinnell, who is a former CEO of Pfizer, and he said, ‘‘It’s 
a  fallacy  to  suggest  that  our  industry,  or  any  industry,  prices  a 
product to recapture the R&D budget spent in development.’’ 

Mr. TAUZIN. And he’s right. 
Senator SNOWE. So, I think—— 
Mr. TAUZIN. He’s right. But what he—what you fail to have there 
is  the  rest  of  his  statement,  which  is  that  they  price  it  in  order  to 
make  sure  they  can  cover  the  next  14  years  of  R&D  development 
for the next product in the pipeline. 

Senator  SNOWE.  Yes,  but  the  industry  overall  is  pricing  so  that 

the American consumer pays $87 billion more—— 

Mr. TAUZIN. And we’re spending in—— 
Senator SNOWE.—than consumers in other countries—— 
Mr. TAUZIN.—we’re spending—— 
Senator SNOWE.—plus the $30 billion—— 
Mr. TAUZIN.—well over $60 billion in R&D—— 
Senator SNOWE. Plus—— 
Mr. TAUZIN.—every year. 
Senator  SNOWE.  Yes,  but—plus  the  $30  billion  by—financed  by 

the Federal Government. 

And  one  more  point  by  Hank  McKinnell,  because  I  think  it  is— 
it  is  an  interesting  point.  He  says,  ‘‘Competition  is  good  medicine 
for economies. Name an industry in which competition’s allowed to 
flourish—computers,  telecommunications,  small-package  shipping, 
retailing,  entertainment—and  I’ll  show  you  lower  prices,  higher 
quality, more innovation, and better customer service. There’s nary 
an  exception.  OK,  there’s  one.  So  far,  the  healthcare  industry 
seems immune to the discipline of competition.’’ 

And I think that’s what it’s all about, and that’s what we’re striv-
ing  for.  I  think  we  have  an  obligation  to  set  up  a  system  of  safety 
and  allow  the  consumers  to  make  that  decision  in  what  they—— 

Mr. TAUZIN. Give us a chance to—— 
Senator SNOWE.—get benefit from. 
Mr.  TAUZIN.—compete  against  another  free  market,  and  we’ll 
compete.  But  those  are  not  free  markets,  Senator  you  know  that. 

Senator SNOWE. Thank you. 
Mr. TAUZIN. Those are controlled markets. 
Senator SNOWE. Thank you. 
Senator DORGAN. Senator Vitter? 
Senator VITTER. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
First  of  all,  with  Billy  Tauzin  here,  let  me  just,  apart  from  this 
issue, setting this aside for a few seconds, let me thank you for all 
of  your  service  and  leadership  to  our  state,  which  was  exemplary 
throughout your career. 

Mr. TAUZIN. Thank you, David. 
Senator VITTER. And I personally appreciate that, and the people 

of Louisiana appreciate that. 

On  this  issue,  Billy,  you  started  your  remarks  by  remembering 

your work with John Dingell—— 

Mr. TAUZIN. Yes. 
Senator  VITTER.—going  back  to  1988.  I  guess  one  thing  I  would 
say  is,  what  do  you  think  the  prescription  drug  inflation—cumu-
lative inflation has been in those 19 years since 1988? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00090 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

87 

Mr. TAUZIN. Good question. Let me—— 
Senator VITTER. It’s been—— 
Mr. TAUZIN. Let me—— 
Senator VITTER. It’s been enormous. 
Mr.  TAUZIN.  Let  me  address  it.  It  is  not  soaring.  It  is  not  enor-
mous. AARP issued a report, I think, yesterday—again, doing what 
they  always  do,  which  is  to  compare  a  list  of  patent  drug  products 
that  are  used  by  seniors,  and  examines  only  those  in  the  market-
place,  instead  of  the  whole  prescription  drug  marketplace.  If  you 
look  at  the  60  percent  of  the  drugs  that  are  consumed  in  America 
that  are  generic,  and  combine  them  with  the  patent  drugs  that 
come  out  of  this  14  year  expensive  process—combine  them  to-
gether, the inflation rate of drugs in America has been moderating 
over the last 5 years and is lower than the healthcare inflation rate 
again this year, falling every year. It is not soaring, it is not expo-
nentially rising. It’s rising at a lower rate than healthcare inflation, 
and moderating every year. In fact, the number of new drugs com-
ing  off  patent  are  alarming,  frankly,  because,  as  those  new  drugs 
come  off  patent,  a  lot  of  the  companies  are  going  to  be  in  a  very 
difficult position over the next 10 years. 

Senator VITTER. Well, first of all, I think what we’re largely talk-
ing  about  in  this  debate  is  nongenerics,  because  the  generic  issue 
is  largely  solved,  in  terms  of  price  competitiveness  in  this  country. 
So, I do think we’re basically talking about nongenerics. 

Mr. TAUZIN. Well, but you can’t—— 
Senator VITTER. And that—— 
Mr. TAUZIN.—you can’t—— 
Senator VITTER.—cumulative—— 
Mr.  TAUZIN.—not  talk  about  it.  Do  you  know,  in  Canada,  that 
generics  cost  about  167  percent  of  U.S.  prices?  You  can’t  just  talk 
about one set of drugs. In—— 

Senator VITTER. Well, the problem—— 
Mr. TAUZIN. If you look at the ten—— 
Senator VITTER.—is, you don’t have generics for everything. 
Mr. TAUZIN. No, but if you look at the ten top drugs, six of them 

are generic variations—— 
Senator VITTER. Right. 
Mr. TAUZIN.—right now. And, as you heard, you know, when you 
look at the amount of time that a patent drug has left in its patent 
life, and the fact that these drugs are coming off pretty rapidly over 
the  next  10  years,  that  60  percent  is  likely  to  rise  in  this  country. 
We’re  one  of  the  highest  users  of  generic  products  in  the  world,  at 
60 percent. It is working fairly well. Do we still have a problem of 
uninsured? Yes. And we ought to address that. 

But  here’s  another  feature  I  hope  you  think  about  when  you 
think about this bill and other bills on healthcare. We’re 10 percent 
of  the  market.  The  healthcare  dollars  spent  in  America,  pharma-
ceuticals represent 10 percent of that. They represented 10 percent 
in  1978,  and  they  represent  10  percent  today.  We  are  not  the  big-
gest problem in the healthcare cost equation. Ninety percent of the 
problem  is  in  other  healthcare  cost  areas.  But  do  we  have  a  prob-
lem  making  sure  seniors  have  access  to  affordable  prescriptions? 
Yes. That’s why we passed Part D. Do we have a problem with the 
20  some  odd  million  Americans  who  are  chronically  uninsured? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00091 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

88 

Yes.  We  ought  to  address  that.  But  to  open  the  door  to  a  problem 
that’s  a  one  percent  of  problem  in  America  today,  that  could  be-
come  a  20  percent  problem,  in  terms  of  counterfeits  hitting  this 
market.  Just  to  try  to  solve  a  10  percent  or  7  percent  problem, 
which  is  the  difference  in  Canadian  cost  to  Americans  today.  It  is, 
I  think,  very  risky,  Senator  Vitter.  That’s  all  I’m  asking  you  to 
think about. 

Senator  VITTER.  Well,  my  point  is  that,  since  1988,  nongeneric 
drug  inflation  has  soared.  Since  1988,  as  a  result,  this  commerce 
across  the  border  in  these  drugs  has  soared.  And,  of  course,  that’s 
directly related to price. 

And  so,  in—with  that  history  behind  us,  in  the  current  environ-
ment,  I  simply  think  it  is  an  unworkable  and  unreasonable  so- 
called solution to the safety issue to say we’re going to put our fin-
ger in the dike. It’s not working. We’re—we are being deluged with 
this  issue,  to  some  extent;  and  to,  sort  of,  just  say  ‘‘no’’  isn’t  a  pol-
icy—— 

Mr. TAUZIN. We’re not saying there’s—— 
Senator VITTER.—it’s not a workable policy. 
Mr. TAUZIN. We’re not just saying no. We’ve instituted, this year, 

some very important initiatives. I want to tell you about them. 

First  of  all,  the  drug  distributors  in  this  country,  their  associa-
tion,  it’s  finally  kicked  out  the  secondary  marketers.  They’re  no 
longer a part of their association. 

If you look the problem in the U.S. drug marketplace in counter-
feiting and uplabeling and the concern we have about danger to pa-
tients, it was primarily in that secondary market. That’s where the 
counterfeiters  play.  And  they’re  playing  as  good  a  game  as  they 
played with heroin. 

Second,  Senator  Vitter,  we’re  meeting,  today,  with  the  distribu-
tors  and  the  pharmacists  to  see  if  we  can’t  accelerate  the  work  on 
RFID  technologies,  nanotechnologies,  to  protect  our  system  even 
better. 

We’re not just saying no. We’re doing things, we’re trying to pro-
tect  the  people  under  200  percent  of  poverty  who  are  uninsured 
today,  with  the  PPA  program—3.5  million  new  Americans  covered 
with  free  drugs  because  of  our  program.  We’re  working  on  the  un-
insured problem all over America. We’re working with the distribu-
tors  to  come  up  with  track-and-trace  systems  that  are  really  good 
in this country. 

All I’m asking you to do is to understand that we can’t pass those 
laws  for  other  countries.  And  the  FDA  can’t  regulate  the  distribu-
tion  chain  in  other  countries.  And  if  you  expect  them  to  do  so  by 
passing a bill, I just want to warn you, as I tried to warn you about 
New Orleans a few years ago, one day we’ll rue the day we opened 
up that flood. One day in this country, the deaths are going to pile 
up  the  way  they’re  piling  up  around  the  world  with  malaria  right 
now. Please think about that. 

Senator VITTER. Let me suggest two other things we can do, and 
you  all  can  be  helpful  to  address  the  problem.  One  is  to  be  more 
helpful  and  to  not  oppose  generic  reform.  And,  quite  frankly,  too 
often,  in  my  opinion,  the  industry  has  been  an  obstacle  to  pro- 
generics reform. 

Mr. TAUZIN. Yes, but Senator Vitter, I—— 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00092 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

89 

Senator VITTER. The—— 
Mr.  TAUZIN.—you  know,  I  can’t  speak  for  what  happened  more 
than 2 years ago, but I can tell you this, we are very open to work-
ing  with  you,  and  all  of  you,  in  making  sure  that  drug  prices  are 
affordable  and  available  in  this  country  to  people.  That’s  why  we 
started the PPA program. We’ve got—we’ve got a very different or-
ganization today. Give us a chance to work with you. I think you’ll 
see a different face of this industry. 

Senator  VITTER.  The  second  area  where  I  think  we  need  a  lot  of 

work is trade policy. 
Mr. TAUZIN. Yes. 
Senator  VITTER.  This  is  all  created  by  vastly  different  prices  be-
tween  U.S.  and  other  countries.  That  is  largely  created  by  strong 
or weak price-control regimes elsewhere. 

Mr. TAUZIN. Exactly. 
Senator  VITTER.  Now,  we  essentially,  in  my  opinion,  do  abso-
lutely nothing to attack that through our trade policy. I’m not say-
ing  we  have  all  the  power  to  change  that  overnight,  but  we  cer-
tainly  have  some  leverage  and  some  opportunity  to  attack  that.  In 
my opinion, neither the industry nor this administration does any-
thing  meaningful  to  attack  that.  And  that  price  difference  is  what 
creates this entire debate. 

Mr. TAUZIN. Can I paint a quick picture before you—how difficult 
it is? Not only do we have countries like Thailand, which is a mili-
tary  government  now,  stealing  patents,  they’ve  basically  said 
they’re  going  to  just  take  our  patents  and  produce  our  products 
without  regard  to  IP  protection  anymore.  And  they’re  executing 
that right now in Thailand. 

Not  only  do  we  have  situations  like  that,  we’ve  got  the  under-
developed  world  that  can’t  afford  to  pay  even  generic  prices  for 
some  life-saving  drugs,  like  HIV  drugs.  And  we’re  trying  to  set  up 
a  system  in  the  world  to  make  sure  critical  life-saving  medicines 
reach  people  in  the  underdeveloped  world  who,  like  in  America, 
can’t  afford  their  drugs.  Mr.  Chairman,  we  are  trying  to  help  that 
situation. 

Second,  you  have  the  developing  world,  the  middle-index  coun-
tries, if you will, who are, like Thailand, trying to literally take ad-
vantage  of  American  R&D,  and  literally  stealing  from  the  Amer-
ican  people,  in  my  view,  their  rights  to  the  R&D  they’ve  spent  for 
these products. 

And then you’ve got the developed work that is not taking its fair 
share  of  responsibility  for  paying  for  that  R&D.  And  I  concur  with 
you  on  that.  We  need  a  much  stronger  emphasis  at  our  State  De-
partment on insisting that the—— 

Senator VITTER. Well—— 
Mr.  TAUZIN.—developed  world  do  a  better  job  of  paying  for—— 
Senator VITTER. Again, on the—— 
Mr. TAUZIN.—it’s that simple. 
Senator VITTER.—trade front, the only activity I’ve seen, until we 
put a stop to it a couple of years ago, was an effort to embed anti- 
reimportation  policy  in  trade  agreements.  That  was  the  only  effort 
I  have  ever  seen,  in  terms  of  trade  policy.  I’ve  seen  no  effort  from 
the administration or the industry quite frankly, in trying to attack 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00093 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

90 

the  root  issue  of  these  price  differentials,  and  trying  to  use  all  of 
our resources—— 

Mr. TAUZIN. Senator Vitter, I assure you, a lot of that—— 
Senator VITTER.—to solve that. 
Mr.  TAUZIN.—goes  on.  We  belong  to  international  organizations, 
the IFPMA. We to work with EFPIA. We work with a group called 
Dolder,  globally,  trying  to  influence  those  decisions  around  the 
world.  But,  without  the  leverage  of  our  government  saying  some-
thing is wrong when other countries can take advantage of the con-
sumers  in  America  who  are  spending  their  dollars  on  this  R&D— 
without  your  leverage,  they’re  not  going  to  change  their  policies. 
It’s that simple. 

Senator  VITTER.  Also  want  to  briefly  address  the  R&D  issue, 
which  is  very  important,  in  my  mind.  And  let  me  state,  up  front, 
I’m not for reimportation to import price controls into this country, 
and  that  sort  of  argument  against  it  is  often  made;  I’m  for  re-
importation, because I don’t think price controls can survive a full- 
bodied  reimportation  policy  in  this  country  and  in  other  countries. 
And  so,  with  that  in  mind,  Dr.  Vernon,  you  suggested  that  re-
importation will basically drive down R&D. Does that take into ac-
count the possibility—the probability, in my mind—that if you have 
a  full-bodied  reimportation  policy,  it’s—it  doesn’t  simply  import 
those  prices  that  exist  now  in  other  countries,  but  it  actually 
changes them, it raises them, as Dr. Schondelmeyer suggested, and 
lowers our domestic prices? 

Dr.  VERNON.  Well,  I  think  that’s  an  excellent  question,  and  a 
very—and  the  answer  is  very  complicated,  and  I  don’t  have  a  full 
answer.  I  think  that  if  reimportation  were  undertaken  on  a  large 
scale,  such  that  we  had  forced-sales  provisions  and  we  did  see 
prices falling in the U.S., the question then is, would that have an 
impact  on  prices  abroad?  Many  economists  believe  that  prices 
abroad are lower, not just because of price controls and price regu-
lation,  but  also  because  average  per-capita  incomes  in  those  coun-
tries are lower. 

So,  I  don’t  know  that  we  would—exactly  how  that  would  play 
out. And it’s a very complicated issue, in terms of how these foreign 
governments would respond, and in terms of how the U.S. Govern-
ment would interact with these foreign governments and—— 

Senator  VITTER.  Well,  let  me  just  suggest  one  of  the  things  that 
would  happen  is,  their  buying  pool  would  no  longer  be  simply  in 
their  country;  it  would  involve  our  country.  And  so,  the  per-capita 
income of that buying pool will increase. What I think you’re going 
to see is an equalization of prices. I’m not saying it would be imme-
diate or complete. But I think what you would see is a drive toward 
equalizing prices worldwide. 

Dr.  Schondelmeyer,  you  alluded  to  that  a  little  bit.  How  do  you 

think that would work with a robust reimportation policy? 

Dr.  SCHONDELMEYER.  If  the  U.S.  began  a  full-bore  reimportation 
policy,  the  Canadian  Government,  the  EU  countries,  are  going  to 
have  the  drug  companies  coming  into  them  the  next  day,  and 
they’re going to be saying, ‘‘We can’t continue with the prices we’re 
paying  you.  We’ve  got  to  change  something.’’  It  would  disrupt  the 
market,  in  the  short  run.  But  they  will  have  to  change  something. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00094 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

91 

If  we’re  going  to  use  average  per-capita  income  as  our  measure, 
let’s look at the average per-capita income of the uninsured Ameri-
cans.  And  it’s  lower  than  most  of  those  countries  that  are  getting 
lower  prices  in  other—in  Europe,  so  why  aren’t  we  giving  that 
lower  price  to  the  47  million—and  that’s  probably  more  people  in 
America than most of those other countries, as well—why aren’t we 
giving  them  those  lower  prices,  if  we’re  going  to  use  that  as  our 
measure of how you price drugs? 

Senator VITTER. Let me just—— 
Dr.  SCHONDELMEYER.  I  think  it’s  unfair  to  price  the  U.S.  as  an 
aggregate,  because  we  probably  have  the  greatest  income  dispari-
ties  of  any  country  in  the  world,  or  any  major  developed  country 
in the world, compared to the European countries. And—— 

Mr. TAUZIN. Senator Vitter, can I tell you what Canada plans to 

do—— 

Dr. SCHONDELMEYER.—that makes a mess. 
Mr.  TAUZIN.—if  you  pass  this?  They’re  not  going  to  lower  their 
price.  They’re  going  to  raise  their  prices  in  Canada.  What  Canada 
has threatened to do, and what they’re likely to do, is to pass a bill, 
which they’ve got ready to go, which will ban bulk exports to Amer-
ica.  They  don’t  want  to  become  our  pharmacy.  And  neither  does 
Europe. And they say that very clearly in their policy. 

Senator  VITTER.  Well,  again—and  that  gets  back  to  trade,  too. 
The  question  is,  are  we  just  going  to  allow  that  without  con-
sequence?  I  don’t  think  we  should.  So,  I  think  there  are  ways  to 
attack  that.  But,  again,  my  point  is,  a  robust  reimportation  policy 
doesn’t  simply  import  prices  from  other  countries  to  here,  it 
changes  prices  worldwide—it  lowers  prices  in  this  country,  it  in-
creases  artificially  low  prices  elsewhere.  And  what  I  think  it  does 
is  do  nothing  worldwide  with  regard  to  what’s  available  for  R&D, 
but it redistributes where all that R&D money comes from so that 
we  don’t  have  to  pay  98  percent  of  it,  or  whatever  very  high  per-
centage we pay alone as Americans. 

Mr.  TAUZIN.  There’s  another  feature,  though.  And  the  other  fea-
ture that you can’t discount is the fact that other governments, be-
cause  they  are  the  payer—they  have  single-payer  systems—have 
limited  resources  to  pay  for  the  drugs  that  are  used  by  their  citi-
zens. And the way they handle that is, they cut off access. In Can-
ada,  for  example,  on  average,  20  percent  of  the  pharmaceuticals 
that  are  available  to  Americans  are  not  available  to  citizens  in 
Canada  under  their  single-payer  system.  In  Japan,  only  69  of  the 
top 100 medicines are available to their citizens under their single- 
payer  system.  So,  you  won’t  necessarily  drive  up  their  cost.  What 
you’re more likely to do is to see more limitations on access to their 
citizens. I don’t want to see that—— 

Dr. SCHONDELMEYER. And it depends on—— 
Mr. TAUZIN.—imported into America, by the way. 
Senator  DORGAN.  Dr.  Schondelmeyer,  you  wanted  to  respond  to 

that. 

Dr.  SCHONDELMEYER.  Yes,  it  depends  on  which  drugs  we  leave 
off  of  that  system.  If  we  leave  off  Nexium  or  Ambien  CR  or 
Clarinex that are very similar to other drugs that really don’t have 
any therapeutic difference, maybe we’re better off. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00095 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

92 

I  would  argue  that  we  already  have  the  effect  of  European  price 
controls  imported  in  our  market  in  the  prices  that  are  being 
charged  to  Americans  now.  We  don’t  have  free  market  pricing.  We 
don’t have market-based prices. It’s been acknowledged. Dr. Vernon 
said  that  does  affect  our  prices,  and  we  essentially  are  subsidizing 
the  rest  of  the  world.  So,  the  effect  of  that  price-control  system  in 
Europe  and  in  Canada  is  already  in  our  market,  and  we’re  paying 
for it. And unless we squeeze back gently in some way, we will con-
tinue  paying  that  higher  price.  I  think  we  have  to  squeeze  back, 
in  some  way,  to  get  those  other  countries—I  think  passing  re-im-
portation will work much faster than trade negotiations with other 
countries to tell them to raise their prices. If you start reimporting 
from  their  countries  at  their  lower  prices,  those  prices  will  go  up 
much faster than any negotiations are going to accomplish on trade 
negotiations, country by country. 

Mr.  TAUZIN.  Well,  but  don’t  leave  with  the  perception  that  we’re 
just  talking  about  Nexium.  In  Canada,  you  can’t  get  Avastin. 
That’s  the  drug  that  saved  my  life.  You  can’t  get  it  in  Japan.  You 
can’t  get  it  in  Europe,  in  England  and  Wales.  Both  Avastin  and 
Erbitux  were  deemed  not  cost-effective  in  those  countries  under 
their  single-payer  systems.  So,  don’t  think  it’s  just  a  purple  pill  or 
a  pill  that  you  have  of  choice.  Sometimes  it’s  the  pill  that’ll  save 
your kid’s life. Don’t forget that. 

Senator DORGAN. Mr. Tauzin, you’ve lost none of your skill or ag-

gressiveness. 
[Laughter.] 
Senator  DORGAN.  And  we  appreciate  your  being  here.  I  appre-

ciate the entire panel. 

.

I  want  to  put  a  chart  up,  here,  that  shows  you  something  that 
FDA  Commissioner  David  Kessler  has  said  in  a  letter  to  us.  He 
talked  about—our  proposal,  quote,  ‘‘.
.  provides  a  sound  frame-
work for assuring that imported drugs are safe and effective. Most 
notably,  it  provides  additional  resources  to  the  agency  to  run  such 
a  program,  oversight  by  FDA  of  the  chain  of  custody  of  imported 
drugs  back  to  the  FDA-inspected  plants,  a  mechanism  to  review 
imported  drugs  to  ensure  that  they  meet  FDA’s  approval  stand-
ards, and the registration and oversight of importers and exporters 
to  assure  that  imported  drugs  meet  these  standards  that  are  not 
counterfeit.’’ 

I  wanted  to  put  that  on  the  record,  only  because  there’s  a  great 
debate about this, I—and I think you will admit we’ve tried to pro-
vide fair opportunity for alternative views with this hearing. It will 
not  surprise  you  to  know  that  Senator  Snowe  and  I  will  very  soon 
work  with  our  colleagues  on  the  Commerce  Committee  to  try  to 
move  this  legislation,  and  we  would  hope,  obviously,  to  get  a  vote 
on  the  floor  of  the  Senate.  Identical  legislation  is  existing  in  the 
U.S. House. 

And  we  will  keep  the  record  of  this  hearing  open  for  2  weeks. 
Should  our  witnesses  wish  to  submit  additional  views,  we  will  ac-
cept that. 

Mr  Tauzin,  you  indicate  you  want  to  work  with  us  on  a  range 

of things. We welcome that. 

Mr. TAUZIN. Thank you. 
Senator DORGAN. We would say the same to all of the witnesses. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00096 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

93 

Obviously,  you  know  from  my  statements,  and,  I  believe,  from 
the  statements  of  others  on  the  panel  here,  that  we  feel  strongly 
about this, and we represent constituencies across our country that 
feel,  as  I  offered  the  question  today,  they  feel  that  they  shouldn’t 
be paying the highest prices in the world. They feel it’s unfair. 

And so, we hold a hearing today, invite you. All of you are great 

to come. 

Dr.  Vernon,  I  wasn’t  suggesting  your  research  is  worthless  be-
cause of who you’ve previously worked with, but I did want to have 
that in the record. 

All  of  you  have  taken  some  time  to  be  with  us  and  driven  from 

Connecticut and Minnesota and across the street—— 

[Laughter.] 
Senator DORGAN.—and Kentucky. And let me thank you for tak-

ing the time to be a part of this discussion. 

This hearing is adjourned. 
[Whereupon, at 11:55 a.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00097 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00098 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

A P P E N D I X 

JOINT PREPARED STATEMENT OF THE CANADIAN PHARMACISTS ASSOCIATION, THE 

ONTARIO PHARMACISTS’ ASSOCIATION AND THE BEST MEDICINES COALITION 

Do  No  Harm:  Congress  Should  Leave  Canadian  Prescription  Drugs  Alone 
Canadian  pharmacists,  pharmaceutical  distributors  and  patients  are  extremely 
concerned  by  the  proposed  Pharmaceutical  Market  Access  and  Drug  Safety  Act  of 
2007,  and  its  serious  implications  for  the  integrity  of  Canada’s  prescription  drug 
supply. 

We understand fully that your hearings will focus on the impact of this legislation 
on  the  United  States  and  its  citizens.  As  you  proceed,  however,  we  would  urge  you 
to  widen  your  perspective  to  consider  the  repercussions  of  this  legislation  on  Cana-
dians and their healthcare system. 

Our  representatives  would  have  liked  to  make  these  arguments  directly  to  you. 
Your  committee  has  however  decided  to  invite  only  a  few  organizations  to  speak  at 
the  hearings,  excluding  any  representation  from  Canada,  the  country  most  directly 
affected by this proposed legislation. Under these circumstances, we urge you to con-
sider the issues in this written submission. 

We  would  like  to  focus  on  three  points.  Allowing  Canadian  price-controlled  medi-
cines  to  be  imported  in  bulk  into  the  United  States  will  have  serious  consequences 
for  Canadians  and  will  be  of  very  little  long  term  benefit  to  Americans.  Not  only 
will such a measure damage the Canadian drug supply, it will in all likelihood lead 
to  increased  drug  prices  for  Canadians.  The  Pharmaceutical  Market  Access  and 
Drug Safety Act of 2007 is a quick-fix solution to a complicated issue which will not, 
given  the  differences  of  scale  between  Canada  and  the  United  States,  significantly 
reduce the cost of prescription drugs in your country. 

This  proposed  legislation  also  puts  the  health  of  Americans  at  risk  by  opening 
your borders to increased counterfeit drugs and criminal activity from outside North 
America.  Although  our  submission  does  not  address  this  issue  in  detail,  we  fully 
share  the  deep  concerns  expressed  by  organizations  such  as  the  American  Phar-
macists Association on this matter. 
1. A Threat To Canada’s Supply 

Canada’s  supply  of  prescription  medicines  is  not  limitless.  It  is  designed  for  the 

demands of a population of 30 million, not for a market ten times that size. 

Lipitor®,  Zocor®,  Prevacid®,  Nexium® and  Plavix® are  among  the  top  ten  most 
prescribed  medicines  in  the  United  States.  Although  widely  prescribed  in  Canada, 
our domestic supply of these drugs could meet only a small fraction of U.S. demand. 
For example, the Canadian stock of Lipitor represents the equivalent of just 14 per-
cent  of  U.S.  demand.  Similarly,  Plavix  stocked  in  Canada  is  sufficient  to  meet  only 
nine percent of U.S. demand. 

Table 1.—Supply of Leading Prescriptions in the U.S. Available in Canada 

Rank (by number 
of prescriptions filled in the 
U.S.) 

Product 

Number of 
prescriptions: 
U.S.—2005 
(millions) 

Number of 
prescriptions: 
Canada—2005 
(millions) 

Canadian 
share of U.S. 
demand 

1 

2 

3 

4 

8 

Lipitor 

Zocor 

Nexium 

Prevacid 

Plavix 

Note:  Based  on  2005  figures,  IMS  Health. 

11,24 

1,77 

1,94 

1,75 

2,15 

14% 

6.4% 

7% 

7% 

9% 

79,170 

27,839 

27,341 

25,020 

23,973 

(95) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00099 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

96 

At  the  request  of  some  Members  of  Congress  in  2004,  Professor  Marv  Shepherd 
of  the  University  of  Texas  at  Austin  provided  a  comparative  analysis  of  the  size  of 
the  pharmaceutical  market  in  the  United  States  and  Canada.  By  comparing  the 
total  number  of  prescription  drugs  dispensed  in  Canada  with  the  number  of  pre-
scriptions  filled  in  the  United  States  every  day,  Dr.  Shepherd  calculated  that  Can-
ada’s  annual  supply  of  prescription  drugs  would  be  exhausted  in  38  days  if  U.S. 
residents were to purchase all their prescriptions in Canada.1 

This scenario is obviously meant to draw out the worst-case outcome but it effec-
tively illustrates that bulk imports by the United States will very significantly cur-
tail  the  supply  available  to  Canadians.  Indeed,  as  Table  2  illustrates,  if  10  percent 
of  U.S.  prescriptions  were  filled  in  Canada,  this  would  lead  to  a  minimal  increase 
in the size of U.S. supply while significantly reducing the amount of drugs available 
to Canadians. 

Table 2.—Projected Increase on U.S. Supply if 10% of America’s Prescriptions Were Filled in Canada 

Rank 

Product 

Number of 
U.S. Prescriptions 

10% of Canadian 
Supply 

Projected increase 
based on 10% of 
U.S. prescriptions filled 
in Canada 

1 
2 
3 
4 
8 

Lipitor 
Zocor 
Nexium 
Prevacid 
Plavix 

79,170,000 
27,839,000 
27,341,000 
25,020,000 
23,973,000 

1,124,000 
177,000 
194,000 
175,000 
215,000 

1.4% 
0.6% 
0.7% 
0.7% 
0.9% 

Note:  Based  on  2005  figures,  IMS  Health. 
To further illustrate the differences in size between the two pharmaceutical mar-
kets,  the  number  of  U.S.  seniors  is  greater  than  the  total  Canadian  population.  To 
supply just half of U.S. seniors, Canada would have to increase its total annual pre-
scription  drug  supply  by  2.5  times,  an  increase  that  pharmaceutical  companies 
would not be capable of achieving. 

Shortages of prescription drugs are already on the rise in Canada. The Canadian 
Pharmacists Association reported in 2004 that 80 percent of pharmacists had expe-
rienced  one  or  more  drug  shortages  weekly.  Pharmacists  surveyed  also  stated  that 
shortages  were  becoming  more  frequent.2 Shortages  are  caused  by  a  variety  of  fac-
tors  ranging  from  issues  with  the  manufacturing  process  to  shortages  of  raw  mate-
rials and also exports to the Unites States through Internet pharmacies. It is clear, 
however,  that  actively  seeking  bulk  purchases  from  Canada  would  seriously  com-
pound an existing problem with the Canadian supply. 
2. A Threat to the Integrity of Canada’s Price-Control Regimen 

If passed, the Pharmaceutical Market Access and Drug Safety Act of 2007 will, in 
effect, distort and disrupt the Canadian pharmaceutical market. It will do so by pro-
viding  a  strong  incentive  to  big-box  retailers  present  in  Canada  (either  American 
owned or not) to re-route their stock of price-controlled pharmaceutical products for 
sale  at  a  higher  margin  in  their  U.S.  stores.  This  practice,  known  as  ‘‘arbitrage,’’ 
would completely corrupt Canada’s price-control regimen. 

The  resulting  shortages  will  unavoidably  lead  to  higher  prices  in  Canada,  negat-

ing the intended benefit of this legislation to the U.S. 

Canadian  provinces  already  face  tremendous  pressure  to  keep  the  costs  of 
healthcare  manageable.  This  bill  could  seriously  compromise  the  various  measures 
put  in  place  in  Canada  to  negotiate  lower  prices  for  prescription  medication.  Not 
only  would  this  legislation  lead  to  shortages  for  Canadians,  it  could  possibly  force 
provincial  governments  to  further  limit  the  number  of  drugs  placed  on  their 
formularies,  thereby  further  penalizing  Canadian  patients  by  limiting  their  thera-
peutic options. 
3. Limited Benefit to the United States 

Although  the  impacts  of  bulk  importation  on  Canada’s  domestic  drug  supply  and 
on  Canadian  patients  is  real,  what  is  less  clear  is  the  net  benefit  the  legalization 
of bulk imports would have on America’s supply and American consumers. 

1 Marv  Shepherd,  Drug  Importation  Analysis:  Comparison  of  the  Canadian  Pharmaceutical 
Market  Size  with  the  U.S.  and  Implications  for  Drug  Importations,  Center  for  Pharma-
coeconomic  Studies  College  of  Pharmacy,  The  University  of  Texas  at  Austin,  May  5,  2004,  p. 
13, 
http://www.utexas.edu/pharmacy/research/institutes/pharmacoeconomics/ 
candrugmarket.pdf. 

2 Canadian Pharmacists Association, Administrative Burden on Canadian Pharmacists Due to 
Drug  Shortages,  November  2004,  http://www.pharmacists.ca/content/hcp/resourcelcentre/ 
practicelresources/pdf/DrugShortageReport-Final.pdf. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00100 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

97 

Given  the  small  size  of  the  Canadian  market,  it  comes  as  no  surprise  that  the 
U.S.  Department  of  Health  and  Human  Services  concluded  in  December  2004  that 
‘‘total  savings  to  drug  buyers  from  legalized  commercial  importation  would  be  one 
to 2 percent of total drug spending and much less than international price compari-
sons  might  suggest.  The  savings  going  directly  to  individuals  would  be  less  than  1 
percent  of  total  spending.  Most  of  the  savings  would  likely  go  to  third  party  payers, 
such as insurance companies and HMOs.’’ 3 
Conclusion 

Canada’s drug supply and price control systems were intended to meet the health 
care  needs  of  Canadians,  not  to  provide  Americans  with  a  quick  fix  or  a  band-aid 
solution  to  the  cost  of  prescription  drugs  in  your  country.  The  real  purpose  of  this 
bill is not the importation of cheaper prescription drugs, but rather the importation 
into  the  United  States  of  Canadian  price  controls.  The  United  States  should  not  be 
cherry picking parts of Canada’s healthcare system. 

Once U.S. demand depletes Canadian stocks, prices will almost certainly rise, nar-
rowing or possibly even eliminating the difference between U.S. and Canadian phar-
maceutical prices. In short, there is no long-term advantage to be gained in raiding 
Canada’s  regulated  market.  Further,  there  is  always  the  likelihood  that  the  Cana-
dian Parliament would simply ban bulk exports of prescription drugs to the United 
States.  The  undersigned  organizations  have  called  on  the  government  of  Canada  to 
institute such a ban, immediately, in order to protect the Canadian drug supply and 
pricing system and to protect Canadian patients. In fact, Canada’s Health Minister 
has  recently  indicated  to  our  organizations  a  willingness  to  pass  legislation  that 
would do exactly this. 

The Pharmaceutical Market Access and Drug Safety Act of 2007 is deeply flawed. 
It  will  not  solve  the  problems  of  high  drug  costs  in  the  U.S.  but  will  certainly  in-
crease  prices  paid  by  Canadians  and  restrict  the  number  and  quantity  of  prescrip-
tion drugs available to Canadian patients. 

If  adopted,  it  is  clear  that  this  proposed  legislation  will  strain  Canada-U.S.  rela-
tions.  We  urge  Members  of  Congress  to  consider  this  possibility.  We  call  upon  you 
to  see  beyond  the  narrow  scope  of  domestic  issues,  and  to  consider  the  full  range 
of consequences that would attend the passage of this legislation. 

JEFF POSTON, 
Executive Director, 

Canadian Pharmacists Association. 

MARC KEALEY, 
CEO,

Ontario Pharmacists’ Association. 

LOUISE BINDER, 
Chair,

Best Medicines Coalition. 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF PETER PITTS, PRESIDENT, 

CENTER FOR MEDICINE IN THE PUBLIC INTEREST 

Mark  Twain  once  said  that  there’s  a  simple  solution  to  every  complicated  prob-

The  issue  of  broader  access  to  safe  and  effective  drugs  is  an  extraordinarily  com-

And  importation  of  foreign  drugs  is  a  simplistic  solution  with  a  container-full  of 

lem—and it’s usually wrong. 

plicated problem. 

unintended consequences. 

Let  me  get  one  thing  out  of  the  way  right  away.  If  you  walk  into  a  pharmacy  in 
Windsor, Ontario and have your prescription filled by a real pharmacist—the drugs 
you receive will be both safe and effective. 

But—when  the  ‘‘learned  intermediary’’—a  doctor  or  pharmacist—is  replaced  by  a 
greedy intermediary (a storefront drug dealer or an unregulated Internet site) then 
all bets are off. Profiteers masquerading as pharmacists bode poorly for both safety 
and  effectiveness.  Those  who  support  importation  of  foreign  drugs  are  endangering 
the lives of Americans. 

Recently  an  81-year-old  man  suffering  from  epilepsy  and  an  enlarged  prostate 
purchased what he was led to believe were FDA-approved drugs from a website pur-
portedly representing a Canadian pharmacy. 

3 Department  of  Health  and  Human  Services,  Report  On  Prescription  Drug  Importation,  De-

cember 2004, p. 65, http://www.hhs.gov/importtaskforce/Report1220.pdf. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00101 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

98 

Upon  receipt,  he  noticed  that  they  were  from  India.  He  called  the  FDA,  and  we 
determined  that  not  only  were  the  drugs  not  from  Canada,  but  they  weren’t  even 
approved for use in the United States. 

Nature  abhors  a  vacuum.  Large-scale  importation  (because  those  floodgates  can’t 
be  opened  only  part  way)  will  create  the  silent  sound  of  drugs  crossing  the  border 
from Canada and thru Canada into the United States. 

And that vacuum won’t be refilled with safe and effective drugs. 
They’ll be replaced with unapproved knock-offs, gray market substitutes, counter-
feits, and similares from South America coming into the U.S. thru Canada. In fact, 
that’s already happening today. 

Recently, the Canadian Health Minister who, under tremendous political pressure 
to continue a charade, instead told the truth about the cross-border drug trade and 
the dangers that it poses to both Americans and Canadians. 

‘‘I want to make sure that we don’t have . . . 250 million Americans buying drugs 
in  Canada,’’  he  said  in  an  interview  Dec.  12  on  a  CTV  television  show  in  Canada. 
‘‘We cannot be the drugstore for the United States.’’ 

Indeed. The Minister clearly sees that as the Internet pharmacy cowboys soak up 
the  Canadian  drug  supply  for  their  own  profit,  domestic  Canadian  pharmacists  are 
reporting more and more shortages. 

What’s more, our neighbors to the north are becoming ever-more concerned about 
medicines  from  nations  outside  their  regulatory  purview—drugs  that  may  be  sub-
potent, superpotent, expired, or just plain counterfeit. 

The Canadian Health Minister recognizes the danger to the public health of Can-
ada and his government is preparing to take action. Any American who wants a pre-
scription  from  a  Canadian  pharmacy  may  soon  be  required  to  first  visit,  in  person, 
with a physician in Canada. 

Why such a dramatic departure from previous practices? Consider this . . . 
Recently,  a  doctor  in  Toronto  was  indicted  for  co-signing  24,212  prescriptions  for 
American  patients  he  had  never  seen—at  $10  a  pop.  Health  Canada  means  busi-
ness, because when doctors start selling their signatures, health care consumers are 
being sold a bill of goods. 

Canada’s  new  policy  will  end  importation  ‘‘as  we  know  it.’’  The  fantasy  of  ‘‘Can-
ada-only’’  drugs  will  be  showed  to  be  just  that.  And,  according  to  a  recent  poll,  54 
percent of Americans oppose importing drugs from European countries. 

The  FDA  is  faced  with  enough  challenges  policing  drug  safety  at  home;  do  we 
really want them to stretch their resources even further and become responsible for 
drug safety globally? 

According  to  the  recent  report  issued  under  the  signature  of  Admiral  Richard 
Carmona,  the  Surgeon  General  of  the  United  States,  opening  up  our  borders  to 
drugs  ‘‘from  Canada’’  would  result  in  an  uncontrollable  influx  of  untested,  impure, 
expired, and counterfeit drugs from around the world. That’s just a fact. It may not 
be politically popular, but facts are stubborn things. 

The  various  state  and  local  websites  promising  something  for  nothing  have  re-

ceived, according to a recent Wall Street Journal article, ‘‘Tepid response.’’ 

That article continues, ‘‘With great fanfare, at least nine states over the past year 
launched  websites  to  help  their  residents  buy  inexpensive  prescription  drugs  from 
Canada. But so far, the sites aren’t doing much business.’’ 

Fortunately,  the  American  consumer  is  smarter  than  a  lot  of  demagogues  give 

them credit for. 

People ask me—aren’t the drugs from Canada coming into the U.S. genuine? Well, 
I  can  tell  you  this—the  oxycontin  and  vicodin,  the  darvocet  and  the  valium  are— 
at least for now. 

Illegal,  unsafe  importation  presents  the  very  real  danger  of  turning  the  Internet 

into the 21st century’s virtual drug cartel. And we must not let that happen. 

‘‘Buyer  Beware’’  is  bad  health  care  practice  and  even  worse  health  care  policy. 

Americans deserve both safety and savings. Trade-offs are just not acceptable. 

When  the  Governor  of  New  Hampshire  said  he  was  going  to  start  allowing  the 
importation  of  Canadian  drugs,  my  sound-bite  was  that  while  ‘‘Live  free  or  Die’’  is 
a great state motto, it’s irresponsible health care policy. 

But  consider  Minnesota.  Recently  Governor  Tim  Pawlenty  launched  a  state-en-
dorsed  website  called  ‘‘Minnesota  RXConnect.’’  This  website  provides  both  informa-
tion  on  and  facilitation  to  Canadian  websites  that  illegally  sell  non-FDA  approved 
pharmaceuticals. This action is unsafe, unsound, and ill-considered. 

When you recommend that citizens go outside of our regulatory system and enter 
into  a  ‘‘buyer  beware’’  gray  zone,  you  assist  those  who  put  profits  before  patient 
health  and,  by  the  way,  shine  a  bright  light  on  a  path  that  can  (and,  indeed,  is) 
used not only by profiteers masquerading as pharmacists, but by outright criminals 
who do not pause before actively feeding counterfeit drugs into the marketplace. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00102 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

99 

During  pre-announced  visit  by  Minnesota  State  officials  Canadian  pharmacies 
were observed engaging in dangerous practices. Minnesota state officials noted doz-
ens of safety problems. For example: 

ceiving prescription drugs. 

dence that the products would remain stable. 

had been previously returned by U.S. Customs. 

• One  pharmacy  had  its  pharmacists  check  100  new  prescriptions  or  300  refill 
prescriptions  per  hour,  a  volume  so  high  that  there  is  no  way  to  assure  safety. 
• One  pharmacy  failed  to  label  its  products,  instead  they  just  shipped  the  labels 
unattached  in  the  same  shipping  container,  even  when  patients  received  mul-
tiple medications in one shipment. 
• Drugs  requiring  refrigeration  were  being  shipped  un-refrigerated  with  no  evi-
• One  pharmacy  had  no  policy  in  place  for  drug  recalls.  Representatives  of  the 
pharmacy  allegedly  said  that  the  patient  could  contact  the  pharmacy  about  a 
recall ‘‘if they wished’’. 
• One  pharmacy  re-dispensed  medicines  that  were  not  labeled  and  apparently 
• Several  pharmacies  failed  to  send  any  patient  drug  information  to  patients  re-
• All of the pharmacies generally allowed customers to fax in their own prescrip-
tions. This not only fails to assure the validity of the prescription; it means that 
patients  can  get  multiple  drug  orders  from  a  single  prescription,  including  for 
more risky drugs. 
• Only  one  of  the  pharmacies  visited  had  a  thermometer  in  their  refrigerator  to 
verify  that  labeled  storage  requirements  were  being  met  for  refrigerated  prod-
ucts. 
• Many  drugs  obtained  through  at  least  one  of  the  pharmacies  were  apparently 
not  even  of  Canadian  origin,  and  many  of  the  drugs  were  obtained  from  a  dif-
ficult-to-follow path of writing and rewriting prescriptions across multiple Cana-
dian provinces. 
• Equally concerning was the statement from one of the pharmacy presidents who 
allegedly  said,  ‘‘We  won’t  have  any  problems  getting  drugs.  We  have  creative 
ways to get them.’’ 

And these were licensed Canadian pharmarcies! 
A  one-time  pre-arranged  ‘‘visit’’  to  any  Internet  pharmacy  is  no  substitute  for  a 
comprehensive  system  for  assuring  the  safety  of  the  prescription  drugs  used  by 
Americans. 

Minnesota officials knew these facts and still went ahead with their program. 
Wisconsin  residents  who  used  Governor  Doyle’s  website  received  unapproved 
generics  in  place  of  the  brand  name  medicines  they  were  promised—despite  their 
contractual  promise  to  the  Governor  that  they  would  only  provide  ‘‘FDA-Approved’’ 
drugs. 

Sometimes  a  bargain  is  just  too  expensive—and  nowhere  is  that  more  true  then 
when  it  comes  to  counterfeit  prescription  medicines—the  inevitable  follow-on  of  the 
drug importation schemes under consideration by Congress. 

Around  the  world,  millions  of  people  are  exposed  to  a  real  health  threat  every 
day—the danger of taking the wrong medication. This spreading problem has noth-
ing to do with patients mixing up their pills. Rather, it’s caused by the proliferation 
of counterfeit drug traffickers, who are profiting immensely from selling fake medi-
cines. 

To  combat  this  threat,  the  FDA  requires  distributors  to  keep  detailed  records  of 
the  sources  of  the  medications  they  dispense.  But  that’s  a  futile  undertaking.  Drug 
counterfeiters  have  become  so  sophisticated,  they  can  produce  drugs  and  packaging 
that cannot be differentiated from the real thing without complex chemical analysis. 
Paper ‘‘pedigrees’’ are next to useless. 

With huge profits, counterfeiting is increasing at a phenomenal pace. The Center 
for  Medicine  in  the  Public  Interest  estimates  that  counterfeit-drug  commerce  will 
grow  13  percent  annually  through  2010.  Counterfeit  sales  are  increasing  at  nearly 
twice the rate of legitimate pharmaceutical sales. 

Illegal  drugs  are  a  money  machine.  In  2010,  it’s  estimated  that  fake  drugs  will 
generate  $75  billion  in  revenues—a  92  percent  increase  from  2005.  And  the  risks 
of detection and prosecution are low. 

Authorities are concerned. The EU recently released statistics on counterfeit-drug 
sales  in  Europe.  Canadian  authorities  have  made  some  high-profile  arrests.  But 
overall, the results of enforcement have been marginal. 

Two  years  ago,  when  the  FDA  claimed  that  counterfeit  drugs  were  being  used  to 
fund global terrorism, some politicians accused the agency of being in the pocket of 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00103 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

100 

Big  Pharma.  Today,  these  same  politicians  are  strangely  silent.  The  recent  news 
that  North  Korea  has  gone  into  the  business  of  manufacturing  and  selling  counter-
feit  drugs  has  put  a  muzzle  on  the  anti-pharma  gang.  Trashing  patents  to  produce 
generics is one thing. Manufacturing totally useless fakes is entirely different. 

It’s not a stretch to call it health care terrorism. 
The  issue  is  global.  National  borders  mean  nothing  to  these  criminals.  Pharma-
ceuticals  are  easily  smuggled,  because  medical  supplies  are  a  humanitarian  need. 
Law authorities are frequently stymied. Our FDA must work with the World Health 
Organization,  Interpol  and  other  international  public  health  and  law  enforcement 
organizations.  Jurisdictions  overlap.  Fake  drugs,  substituted  for  the  real  thing, 
move  under  the  cover  of  aid  efforts.  And  then  both  can  be  sold  to  double  profits. 
The  war  against  prescription-drug  counterfeiters  is  hampered  by  what  is  known 
as  ‘‘parallel  trade.’’  Individual  drug  packages—140  million  last  year—are  imported 
to the countries of the European Union. Once inside the EU, a wholesaler is allowed 
to repackage each one before sale. 

The  intent  is  humanitarian.  But  the  potential  for  abuse—and  illegal  profits—is 
enormous.  At  the  most  basic  level,  drugs  are  mislabeled.  Dosages  are  misstated;  a 
label indicates tablets instead of capsules; expiration dates don’t match the medica-
tion; and labels are in the wrong language or outdated. 

Even  when  the  ‘‘confusion’’  is  unintentional,  the  results  are  dangerous.  A  drug 
purchased by a consumer from an Internet pharmacy purported to come from a Brit-
ish pharmacist could originate in any EU nation. In Britain, it’s estimated that par-
allel-traded  medicines  account  for  approximately  20  percent  of  all  prescriptions 
filled. No one really knows what’s happening in America. 

Since  the  EU  does  not  require  the  recording  of  batch  numbers  for  parallel-im-
ported  medicines,  there  is  no  way  to  track  shipments  that  are  recalled.  If  a  batch 
of medicines originally intended for sale in Greece is recalled, tracing where the en-
tire  batch  has  gone  (e.g.,  from  Athens  to  London  through  Canada  to  Indianapolis) 
is impossible. 

More dangerous than the lack of quality control is that such practices allow coun-
terfeiters  to  integrate  their  products  into  legitimate  supply  chains.  The  WHO  esti-
mates  that  8  percent  to  10  percent  of  the  global  medicine  supply  chain  is  counter-
feit—rising to 25 percent or higher in some countries. 

The  largest  counterfeit  market  with  close  proximity  to  the  EU  free  trade  zone  is 
Russia,  where  approximately  12  percent  of  drugs  are  said  to  be  counterfeit.  Now 
that  the  Baltic  nations  of  Latvia,  Lithuania,  and  Estonia  have  joined  the  EU,  the 
WHO  has  warned  that  there  is  increased  risk  of  counterfeits  entering  the  supply 
chain. 

It’s time to stop accusing the drug industry of crying wolf about counterfeit drugs. 
Policymakers  must  confront  the  serious  business  of  ensuring  that  drugs  entering 
our  markets  are  legitimate  and  safe.  It’s  an  area  where  mistakes  are  dangerous  to 
everyone’s health. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTION SUBMITTED BY HON. BYRON L. DORGAN TO 

RANDALL W. LUTTER, PH.D. 

Question. The main point of your testimony was that counterfeit drugs are enter-
ing  the  U.S.  drug  supply.  You  also  talked  about  online  pharmacies  that  consumers 
thought  were  in  Canada  but  turned  out  to  be  located  in  other  countries.  I  don’t 
think  anyone  disagrees  that  there  are  currently  no  regulations  in  place  to  protect 
consumers  who  are  often  forced  to  decide  whether  to  import  a  prescription  drug  or 
forego filling a prescription altogether. 

Where we disagree is what should be done to protect consumers, which is the mis-
sion  of  your  agency.  As  you  know,  I  have  introduced  legislation  with  Senators 
Snowe,  Grassley,  Kennedy,  McCain,  Stabenow  and  many  others  to  put  in  place  an 
effective regulatory framework to allow consumers to safely import more affordable, 
FDA-approved  prescription  drugs  from  Canada  and  several  other  countries.  I  was 
troubled that you had not taken the time to read this comprehensive legislation. 

After you take the time to review our legislation, please let me know if you agree 
with  the  conclusion  of  Former  FDA  Commissioner  David  Kessler  that  the  Pharma-
ceutical Market Access and Drug Safety Act of 2007: 

1.  ‘‘Provides  a  sound  framework  for  assuring  that  imported  drugs  are  safe  and 
effective.’’ 
2. ‘‘Provides additional resources to the agency to run such a program.’’ 
3.  Ensures  ‘‘oversight  by  FDA  of  the  chain  of  custody  of  imported  drugs  back 
to FDA-inspected plants.’’ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00104 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

101 

4.  Provides  ‘‘a  mechanism  to  review  imported  drugs  to  ensure  that  they  meet 
FDA’s approval standards.’’ 
5.  Mandates  ‘‘the  registration  and  oversight  of  importers  and  exporters  to  as-
sure that imported drugs meet these standards and are not counterfeit.’’ 

If you disagree with Dr. Kessler, please provide a detailed explanation. 
Answer.  Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  testify  at  the  March  7,  2007,  hearing 
entitled,  ‘‘Policy  Implications  of  Pharmaceutical  Importation  for  U.S.  Consumers,’’ 
before  the  Senate  Subcommittee  on  Interstate  Commerce,  Trade,  and  Tourism.  The 
Food  and  Drug  Administration  (FDA  or  the  agency)  is  responding  to  address  the 
March 9, 2007, correspondence you sent in follow up to that hearing. 

Your  correspondence  included  statements  made  by  former  FDA  Commissioner, 
David Kessler, at an April 19, 2005, hearing entitled, ‘‘Examining S. 334, to amend 
the  Federal  Food,  Drug,  and  Cosmetic  Act  with  respect  to  the  importation  of  pre-
scription  drugs,’’  held  by  the  Senate  Committee  on  Health,  Education,  Labor,  and 
Pensions. Dr. Kessler’s statements focused on the issues of safety, resources, supply 
chain  security,  and  standards  for  approval  of  foreign  versions  of  FDA-approved 
drugs.  You  asked  that  I  explain  my  views  on  the  ‘‘Pharmaceutical  Market  Access 
and  Drug  Safety  Act  of  2007’’  in  the  context  of  these  issues.  The  bulk  of  this  re-
sponse details our views about these issues. 

I  would  like  to  start,  however,  by  commending  you  for  your  efforts  to  address 
American  consumers’  concerns  regarding  access  to  affordable  prescription  medica-
tions.  Nevertheless,  the  agency  continues  to  have  concerns  with  enacting  such  a 
sweeping  importation  program  and  fears  that  intermediaries  would  likely  swallow 
the  bulk  of  cost-savings,  preventing  American  consumers  from  enjoying  much,  if 
any, practical benefit from such a program. We expect such a result might lead con-
sumers to continue to look for substantial savings on their prescription medications 
by  seeking  products  outside  the  legalized  importation  system,  just  as  some  do  now. 
We  continue  to  observe  that  many  consumers  buy  drugs  from  foreign  Internet 
sources  even  though  generic  versions  of  those  products  are  approved  by  FDA  and 
such products are generally cheaper in the United States than abroad. 

We  note  that  legalizing  commercial  importation  may  have  unintended  effects  on 
protection of intellectual property and may reduce incentives for research and devel-
opment,  as  noted  in  the  2004  report  issued  by  the  Health  and  Human  Services’ 
(HHS) Task Force Report on Drug Importation. 
Safety Concerns 

We  have  safety  concerns  related  to  both  the  identification  of  unsafe  and  or  non- 
compliant  drug  products  and  about  the  substitutability  of  foreign  products  for  do-
mestic products. 
Identifying Unsafe/Non-compliant Drug Products 

The  section  of  the  bill  that  would  allow  individuals  to  import  a  qualifying  drug 
from  a  registered  exporter  would  likely  pose  an  overwhelming  resource  burden  for 
the agency and create significant safety concerns. Under such a program, the antici-
pated  high  volume  of  products  would  make  it  extremely  difficult  for  FDA  and  U.S. 
Customs and Border Protection officials to examine adequately all of the personally 
imported  drug  products  to  ensure  that  they  comply.  In  fact,  the  HHS  Task  Force 
estimated  that  it  would  have  cost  $3  billion  annually  to  examine  and  process  each 
of  the  10  million  packages  that  entered  the  U.S.  in  2003.  Even  if  a  lower  level  of 
examination  were  considered  adequate,  the  costs  to  FDA  would  still  be  very  high. 
Despite its registration and inspection fee provisions, the bill likely provides inad-
equate resources to conduct such examination on a routine basis. Resources are lim-
ited  to  2.5  percent  of  the  total  price  of  qualifying  drugs  imported  by  registered  ex-
porters,  an  amount  likely  to  be  a  small  fraction  of  the  cost  of  inspecting  packages 
at  international  mail  facilities.1 This  is  a  particular  concern  because,  once  personal 

1 The  2004  HHS  Task  Force  report  noted  that  individuals  in  the  U.S.  imported  from  Canada 
some  $695  million  of  drugs  amounting  to  12  million  prescriptions  in  2003.  Assuming  that  each 
parcel  contained  two  and  a  half  prescriptions,  the  value  of  a  parcel  would  be  approximately 
$145,  so  that  the  revenues  to  FDA  from  each  parcel  would  be  about  $3.62,  if  the  fees  were 
capped at 2.5 percent of the price of qualifying drugs being imported. But the HHS Task Force 
report notes that the cost of inspecting packages in 2003 was about $264 per package containing 
drugs,  suggesting  that  the  fees  provided  by  the  bill  would  be  grossly  inadequate  for  the  tasks 
asked  of  FDA.  Put  differently,  the  fee  revenue  from  importation  of  drugs  from  Canada  at  this 
scale,  if  capped  at  2.5  percent  of  the  price  of  the  imported  drugs,  would  provide  less  than  $20 
million  to  FDA.  The  HHS  Task  Force  report,  however,  noted  that  the  total  cost  of  inspecting 
Continued 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00105 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

102 

importation  is  given  the  appearance  of  legality,  consumers  may  be  less  vigilant  in 
scrutinizing the drug shipments they receive from abroad. 

S. 242 would establish a complicated system for the regulation of imported drugs. 
This complex system is so vast that it would be enormously resource-intensive, like-
ly  much  greater  than  the  proposed  registration  fees  and  inspection  fees  could  sup-
port.  The  bill  and  its  associated  fees  also  do  not  appear  to  account  for  the  costs  of 
the increased volume of packages likely to inundate the U.S., or address the accom-
panying and likely substantial enforcement work that will arise as a result of legal-
ized  importation  as  more  unscrupulous  vendors  set  up  shop  to  circumvent  the  new 
U.S. system. 
Lack of Substitutability 

The  proposed  bill  provides  a  mechanism  for  foreign  imported  products  to  be  ap-
proved  for  distribution  in  the  U.S.  even  though  these  products  may  not  be  bio-
equivalent  to  the  FDA-approved  product.  This  mechanism  seems  to  by-pass  the  ex-
isting drug approval process for drug products that are not bioequivalent to an FDA- 
approved product, which is through the submission of a new drug application (NDA) 
that  is  thoroughly  reviewed  for  safety  and  efficacy.  Ultimately,  the  bill  appears  to 
establish for imported drugs an alternative to FDA’s existing generic drugs program. 
The bill would allow non-bioequivalent products to be sold in the U.S. as approved 
‘‘variations’’  of  the  innovator  product  under  the  existing  NDA,  which  would  create 
confusion for doctors and pharmacists in prescribing or dispensing, respectively. Dr. 
Todd Cecil of the U.S. Pharmacopeia testified at the April 2005 Senate HELP hear-
ing regarding pharmaceutical equivalence and bioequivalence and his concerns with 
this bill. In addition, doctors cannot anticipate which version of a drug product their 
patients  will  receive,  and  pharmacists  may  not  know  which  version  of  a  drug  the 
doctor  intended  to  prescribe.  The  possibility  of  confusion  is  significant  and  poses  a 
real  public  health  concern  as  this  increases  the  chance  of  error  in  prescribing  and/ 
or  dispensing  of  medications.  In  addition,  the  domestic  and  foreign  versions  of  pre-
scription  drugs  may  become  commingled  in  the  drug  supply  chain.  It  is  unclear 
whether a patient will be able to specify if he wants the foreign version or the origi-
nal  FDA-approved  version  when  he  gets  his  prescription  filled  at  the  pharmacy  or 
receives medication at a hospital or other medical treatment facility. 
Inadequate Resources 

It  is  uncertain  whether  the  anticipated  fee  revenues  will  be  realized  because  the 
market  response  to  legalization  of  importation  cannot  be  accurately  predicted.  This 
uncertainty  could  pose  problems  for  FDA’s  program,  because  large  costs  of  starting 
and  developing  a  program  to  regulate  imports  will  have  to  be  incurred  even  if  the 
volume  of  legalized  imports  is  initially  low.  Although  the  bill  does  assume  certain 
sales  volumes  in  the  first  several  years  for  purposes  of  collecting  inspection  fees, 
with  only  a  few  registered  importers  and  exporters  participating  initially,  the  high 
pro  rata  share  of  fees  may  actually  discourage  participation  and  make  it  difficult 
for  FDA  to  collect  fees  at  the  designated  levels.  Even  once  a  program  is  developed, 
the  bill  is  not  likely  to  provide  the  necessary  funds  to  continue  an  adequate  regu-
latory  program  if  inspection  fees  are  low  because  imports  do  not  reach  the  antici-
pated levels. 
Supply Chain Security 

We are proud of FDA’s efforts with supply chain stakeholders and states to main-
tain a safe and secure drug supply in the U.S. that is premised on a closed, tightly 
regulated  system.  The  type  of  drug  importation  program  in  the  bill  would  increase 
the  number  of  foreign  entities  FDA  would  have  to  monitor  and  regulate.  It  can  be 
difficult for FDA enforcement to reach foreign entities violating our laws and regula-
tions.  This  bill  would  open  the  door  to  more  entities  outside  our  domestic  legal 
framework.  We  also  have  grave  concerns  for  consumers  who  may  be  harmed  from 
products  from  these  foreign  sources.  The  bill  does  not  take  into  account  protecting 
the rights of the consumer if they are injured after using one of these products. 

As we all agree, counterfeit drugs must be kept out of the U.S. drug supply chain. 
FDA is currently using its resources and authorities as efficiently as possible to se-
cure  the  drug  supply  chain  and  protect  American  consumers  from  counterfeit  and 
diverted drugs. Opening the U.S. drug distribution system to foreign markets would 
provide more opportunity for counterfeit drugs to enter our currently closed system 
and  would  significantly  complicate  FDA’s  efforts  to  investigate  irregularities  in  the 
drug supply chain. 

all  incoming  shipments  in  2003  (including  products  from  countries  other  than  Canada),  would 
have amounted to nearly $3 billion, an amount more than 100 times greater. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00106 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

103 

Conducting  foreign  investigations  and  prosecutions  is  inherently  costly  and  dif-
ficult and often is complicated by language barriers and issues of extraterritorial ju-
risdiction and extradition. We are concerned that the bill does not provide sufficient 
enforcement tools and penalties to deter foreign entities from introducing counterfeit 
or otherwise substandard drugs into the U.S. drug supply chain. 
Approval of Foreign Versions 

We  believe  the  bill  creates  complicated  application  and  inspection  requirements 
for  imported  ‘‘foreign’’  versions  of  FDA-approved  products.  These  requirements 
would  be  difficult  to  implement,  as  each  foreign  country  has  its  own  regulatory 
scheme  and  requirements  for  the  information  necessary  to  approve  a  drug  product. 
FDA  would  essentially  have  to  review  foreign  information  in  a  foreign  format,  all 
in  less  time  than  is  required  for  review  of  traditional  NDAs.  In  addition,  the  bill 
would  require  imported  ‘‘foreign’’  versions  of  a  drug  bear  the  labeling  associated 
with the original FDA-approved product. This practice would essentially legalize the 
misbranding of these products, and raises concerns for FDA not only in the approval 
context but also in the counterfeits context. It is difficult enough for FDA and other 
Federal  enforcement  agencies  to  detect  counterfeit  drug  products  and  packaging; 
creating  a  mechanism  that  would  allow  persons  to  label  foreign  drugs  with  repro-
ductions  of  FDA-approved  labeling  would  make  it  even  harder  to  distinguish  be-
tween ‘‘legal’’ foreign products and counterfeits. 

U.S. consumers currently have a number of options available to them when look-
ing for affordable medications within the closed U.S. drug distribution system. Many 
essential  drugs  have  a  generic  alternative  and  some  even  have  many  generics, 
which are generally less expensive than the brand product. We continue to find that 
many  consumers  currently  buying  foreign  products  are  actually  trying  to  purchase, 
or  are  unknowingly  receiving,  a  foreign  product  that  often  is  more  expensive  than 
the U.S. product. In addition, the consumers are at risk when receiving foreign drug 
products,  as  there  are  documented  cases  where  the  wrong  medication  was  received 
(the  haloperidol  case  mentioned  in  my  testimony).  Many  pharmaceutical  companies 
and  Pharmaceutical  Research  and  Manufacturers  Association  of  America  offer  dis-
counts and sometimes even free medications for consumers who cannot afford them. 
Medicare  Part  D  has  also  helped  some  seniors  cut  their  prescription  costs.  Con-
sumers should not feel restricted to higher priced innovator (brand) products. 

Consumers  must  also  understand  that  if  a  medication  is  costly,  they  should  dis-
cuss  other  treatment  options  with  their  doctor  and  pharmacist,  as  most  often  there 
are lower-cost alternatives available. We will continue to strive to make more afford-
able medicines available to consumers, but we remain concerned about the implica-
tions of legalizing drug importation as one of those options. 

In  conclusion,  I  would  like  to  reiterate  concerns  about  the  economic  implications 
of  prescription  drug  importation,  as  stated  in  the  2004  HHS  Task  Force  Report  on 
Drug  Importation.  Even  if  all  the  safety  concerns  could  be  allayed,  these  concerns 
would  remain:  that  savings  to  U.S.  consumers  would  be  small  as  a  percent  of  total 
drug spending; that implementing such a program would incur significant costs; and 
that  legalized  importation  would  likely  adversely  affect  the  future  development  of 
new drugs for American consumers. In 2004, the HHS Task Force Report noted that 
generic  drugs  account  for  most  prescription  drugs  used  in  the  U.S.  and  that  these 
are usually less expensive in the U.S. than abroad. We thus have a well-functioning 
system  of  intellectual  property  rights  that  balances  the  short-term  interests  of  con-
sumers with the long-term research incentives. 

Thank you for the opportunity to address some of our concerns with S. 242. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00107 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

104 

ATTACHMENT 1 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DR. BENJAMIN ZYCHER, SENIOR FELLOW IN ECONOMICS, 

PACIFIC RESEARCH INSTITUTE FOR PUBLIC POLICY * 

BEFORE THE COMMITTEE ON HEALTH, EDUCATION, LABOR, AND PENSIONS 

U.S. SENATE—FEBRUARY 17, 2005 

Pharmaceutical  Importation,  Price  Controls,  Federal  Price  Negotiations, 

and the Interests of Consumers 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman, and distinguished members of this committee, for this 
opportunity  to  offer  my  perspective  on  the  now-prominent  issues  of  pharmaceutical 
importation,  domestic/foreign  pricing  differentials,  and  the  long-term  economic  ef-
fects of pharmaceutical price controls and Federal price negotiations, particularly in 
the context of consumer well-being. 

Well-known principles of economic analysis and existing bodies of data not subject 
to  serious  challenge  yield  several  conclusions  on  the  prospective  adverse  effects  of 
the  importation  of  price-controlled  pharmaceuticals  into  the  U.S.  Moreover,  the  re-
cent  ‘‘free-market’’  argument  favoring  the  importation  of  price-controlled  pharma-
ceuticals is deeply flawed, as discussed below. Similarly, the perverse market effects 
of a possible imposition of Federal negotiating power—Federal ‘‘interference’’—in the 
context of the Medicare program are not difficult to predict. Alternatively, U.S. con-
sumers  would  benefit  from  efforts  to  end  the  free  ride  that  foreign  consumers  are 
able  to  obtain  on  U.S.  research  and  development  investments,  financed  largely  by 
U.S.  consumers.  These  central  observations  and  some  other  ancillary  arguments 
form the basis of my testimony today. 
I. Pharmaceuticals Subject to Price Controls Overseas Are Not ‘‘Cheap’’ 

The  true  economic  cost  of  pharmaceuticals—that  is,  the  real  resource  cost  to  the 
economy  of  developing  and  producing  them—cannot  be  reduced  without  improve-
ments in the economic and regulatory environment, a broad set of issues outside the 
scope  of  today’s  hearing.  The  importation  of  drugs  subject  to  foreign  price  controls, 
far from reducing real economic costs, by necessity would import those price controls 
into the U.S. in terms of prices received by manufacturers. To the extent that lower 
prices for consumers result, that would not represent a true reduction in ‘‘costs’’; in-
stead  it  would  be  a  wealth  transfer  from  pharmaceutical  producers  and  possibly 
from  foreign  consumers  to  U.S.  consumers  in  the  short  run,  with  adverse  con-
sequences for U.S. consumers in long run, as discussed below. The more likely short 
run  outcome  for  U.S.  consumers,  depending  on  market  conditions,  would  be  little 
or  no  price  reductions  but  instead  price  increases  for  various  market  participants 
(intermediaries)  in  the  supply  chain,  since  the  importation  of  price-controlled  phar-
maceuticals  would  not  affect  either  market  demand  conditions  or  market  supply 
conditions on the margin.1 

In the long run—which is not necessarily a long period of time—it is incontrovert-
ible that lower prices will reduce the marginal efficiency of investment, that is, the 
incentive to invest in the research and development of new pharmaceuticals.2 Since 
ultimately it is anticipated consumer demands—for cures, for disease alleviation, for 
better  health,  and  for  reduced  suffering—that  drive  the  research  and  development 
choices of profit-seeking firms, lower anticipated prices will reduce research and de-
velopment  investment  and  thus  the  future  flow  of  new  drugs.  The  adverse  future 
effects  in  terms  of  fewer  cures  and  greater  suffering  will  be  real  economic  costs  at-
tendant  upon  the  importation  of  foreign  price  controls;  but  such  costs  will  not  ap-
pear directly in government budgets or private balance sheets, except to the (signifi-
cant)  extent  that  more-costly  hospitalizations  and  other  substitute  medical  proce-
dures will be used in place of the drugs that will have failed to have been developed 
due  to  the  long  term  effects  of  price  controls.3 Thus  will  the  adoption  of  price  con-
trols  through  the  vehicle  of  the  importation  of  price-controlled  drugs  mortgage  the 

* The  views  expressed  are  those  of  Benjamin  Zycher,  and  do  not  purport  to  represent  the 
views  of  the  Pacific  Research  Institute  for  Public  Policy  or  of  any  of  its  officers  or  contributors. 
1 See,  e.g.,  U.S.  Department  of  Health  and  Human  Services,  Report  on  Prescription  Drug  Im-

portation, December 2004, pp. 65–67. 

2 See Ibid., chapters 7 and 8. See also U.S. Department of Commerce, International Trade Ad-
ministration,  Pharmaceutical  Price  Controls  in  OECD  Countries:  Implications  for  U.S.  Con-
sumers, Pricing, Research and Development and Innovation, December 2004, chapters 2–4. 

3 See,  e.g.,  Frank  R.  Lichtenberg,  ‘‘Are  the  Benefits  of  Newer  Drugs  Worth  Their  Cost?  Evi-

dence From the 1996 MEPS,’’ Health Affairs 20(5), September/October 2001, pp. 241–51. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00108 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

105 

future in favor of the present by weakening incentives for research and development 
investment and other activities yielding streams of new and improved medicines. 

Based upon the recent experience in the non-U.S. OECD and upon simulation ex-
ercises and other analyses, the magnitude of this projected adverse research and de-
velopment  effect  varies  somewhat,  although  it  is  never  predicted  to  be  small.4 My 
view  is  that  all  of  these  estimates  are  biased  downward  because  they  fail  to  take 
into account the fact that the imposition of price controls, whether direct or indirect, 
introduces  an  asymmetry  into  the  statistical  distribution  of  future  returns  to  re-
search and development, in that the price controls have the effect of limiting (trun-
cating)  upside  potential  while  leaving  downside  risk  unaffected.  This  is  an  effect 
separate  from  the  price  reduction  itself,  the  implication  of  which  is  that  the  long 
term effects of price controls in terms of a reduced flow of new and improved drugs 
is likely to prove larger rather than smaller.5 

Some  observers  have  argued  that  there  can  be  an  inefficiently  large  amount  of 
pharmaceutical  research  and  development  investment,  so  that  a  reduced  amount 
still  may  be  efficient.  High  purported  ‘‘profits’’  (either  undefined  or  defined  poorly) 
then  are  used  to  infer  that  current  investment  is  too  high.6 But  if  ‘‘profits’’  are 
(uncompetitively)  high—adjusting  for  investment  risk—we  would  expect  to  see  sig-
nificant entry into the market by new firms. We do not. 

More generally, the current emphasis by some commentators on total revenues or 
total  profits  as  predictors  of  research  and  development  incentives  is  incorrect.  It  is 
the  marginal  efficiency  of  investment  for  a  particular  research  and  development  ef-
fort  that  is  relevant.  Consider,  for  example,  a  firm  earning  enormous  profits,  how-
ever  defined;  would  it  sink  dollars  into  a  project  that  it  knows  will  not  yield  ade-
quate  returns  (however  broadly  defined)?  Regardless  of  overall  revenues  or  profit-
ability,  firms  have  powerful  incentives  to  make  only  efficient  investments,  that  is, 
investments  expected  to  yield  at  least  normal  rates  of  return  with  some  allowance 
for risk. Price controls cannot further that outcome; and competitive capital markets 
will enforce such discipline. 

Finally, an accounting of the true cost of imported drugs subject to price controls 
must  include  some  consideration  of  the  safety  problem,  important  socially  in  par-
ticular  in  the  context  of  contagious  diseases.  That  solutions  to  the  safety  problem 
are  likely  to  prove  highly  elusive  is  evidenced  by  the  fact  that  current  legislation 
under discussion either shunts the issue aside completely, or apparently bestows an 
‘‘FDA-approved’’ imprimatur upon foreign plants not actually approved by the FDA.7 
The  safety  problem  is  discussed  in  detail  in  the  Department  of  Health  and  Human 
Services study noted above; I will not repeat its findings here.8 

In short: As much as we want our medicines to be affordable, we also want them 

to be available when needed. 
II. U.S. Consumers Would Benefit From Policies Reducing the Foreign Free 

Ride 

The  basic  cost  economics  of  pharmaceuticals  are  somewhat  unique,  in  that  large 
fixed costs (for research, development, and production facilities) are accompanied by 
small  marginal  production  costs.9 The  large  fixed  costs—over  $800  million  per 
drug 10—yield  a  body  of  knowledge,  which  itself  is  a  classic  collective  (or  ‘‘public’’) 
good in that those who can find ways to avoid paying their ‘‘fair’’ share thus obtain 
a  free  ride  on  the  efforts  of  others  to  finance  the  research  and  development  invest-
ment.  Foreign  price  controls  on  drugs  have  the  effect  of  yielding  for  foreign  con-
sumers just such a free ride at the expense of U.S. consumers. 

4 See U.S. Department of Commerce, op. cit., chapter 8. 
5 In  order  to  see  this,  suppose  that  market  conditions  shifted  for  some  reason,  yielding  a  re-
duction  in  future  pharmaceutical  demand  and  prices.  That  would  shift  the  entire  distribution 
of investment returns, but would not bias future returns in favor of losses. 

6 This seems to be the argument of Professor Kevin Outterson in his ‘‘Statement’’ to the Com-
mittee on Ways and Means, U.S. House of Representatives (undated), on the U.S.-Australia Free 
Trade Agreement. 

7 See  S.  334,  the  ‘‘Pharmaceutical  Market  Access  and  Drug  Safety  Act  of  2005’’;  and  S.  109, 

the ‘‘Pharmaceutical Market Access Act of 2005.’’ 

8 See fn. 1, supra. 
9 An exception is marginal production cost for biologics, a topic outside the scope of this testi-

mony. 

10 See,  e.g.,  J.  Dimasi,  R.  Hansen,  and  H.  Grabowski,  ‘‘The  Price  on  Innovation:  New  Esti-
mates  of  Drug  Development  Costs,’’  Journal  of  Health  Economics,  22  (2003),  pp.  151–185.  See 
also  Christopher  P.  Adams  and  Van  V.  Brantner,  ‘‘Estimating  the  Costs  of  New  Drug  Develop-
ment: Is It Really $802M?’’ December 2004. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00109 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

106 

Some have argued that policies designed to increase foreign prices would not yield 
benefits  for  U.S.  consumers  because  ‘‘drug  companies  are  under  no  obligation  to 
lower U.S. prices as [foreign] prices increase.’’ 11 

That  argument  is  incorrect,  regardless  of  the  assumption  one  makes  about  the 
competitiveness  of  the  U.S.  pharmaceutical  market.  From  the  viewpoint  of  U.S. 
pharmaceutical producers, an increase in foreign prices analytically is equivalent to 
an  increase  in  foreign  demand;  total  perceived  worldwide  demand  would  increase, 
yielding  an  increase  in  the  marginal  efficiency  of  research  and  development  invest-
ment,  and  so  a  long  run  increase  in  that  investment  and  in  the  flow  of  new  drugs. 
But, ceteris paribus, U.S. demand would not change, so that the increased long run 
supply  of  drugs  would  induce  profit-seeking  U.S.  firms  to  reduce  their  U.S.  prices, 
that is, would put downward pressure on U.S. prices.12 Again: This is true whether 
the  U.S.  market  is  viewed  as  perfectly  competitive  or  as  a  perfectly  discriminating 
monopoly.13 In  the  short  run,  it  is  unclear  whether  U.S.  prices  would  fall;  demand 
and  cost  conditions  would  not  change,  but  producers  might  have  incentives  to  cut 
prices in the expectation of increased competition over the longer term. 
III.  The 

‘‘Free-Market’’  Argument  Favoring  Drug 

Importation 

Is 

Fundamentally Flawed 

Some  prominent  supporters  of  free  markets  have  argued  recently  in  favor  of  the 
importation  of  price-controlled  drugs.  The  argument  in  summary  is  that  an  end  to 
the  import  ban  would  force  pharmaceutical  producers  to  negotiate  more  stringently 
with foreign governments over the prices for drugs, because the prospect of ‘‘cheap’’ 
foreign  drugs  flooding  the  U.S.  market  would  make  it  difficult  to  preserve  U.S. 
prices  sufficient  to  cover  high  R&D  costs.  The  producers  also  could  insist  upon  ‘‘no 
foreign  resale’’  provisions  in  contracts,  which  could  be  enforced  by  limiting  sales  to 
the foreign governments. 

This  argument  is  fundamentally  flawed.  Most  foreign  governments  under  their 
patent laws reserve the right to engage in compulsory licensing under various condi-
tions,  one  of  which  is  a  ‘‘failure  to  work  the  patent.’’  The  precise  meaning  of  that 
phrase  is  unclear,  but  to  foreign  officials  it  might  mean  a  failure  to  sell  all  that  is 
demanded at the controlled price. What is clear is that foreigners will not be happy 
to pay more for medicine. And so it is unlikely that foreigners faced with substantial 
increases  in  their  drug  costs  would  be  fastidious  in  their  adherence  to  the  rule  of 
patent  or  international  trade  law,  as  interpreted  by  U.S.  drug  producers  and  some 
U.S. officials. Indeed, compulsory licensing already has been used, so that price ne-
gotiations  and  trade  environments  are  highly  vulnerable  even  to  implicit  threats  of 
patent theft. 

Moreover,  under  some  prominent  interpretations  of  patent  law,  producers  control 
their patents but not the resale of their patented products. Would contracts to limit 
resale  of  price-controlled  drugs,  even  if  they  could  be  negotiated  and  enforced,  sur-
vive challenge under this interpretation? Such uncertainties inevitably will force the 
producers to sign agreements eroding their ability to recover R&D costs or to protect 
their intellectual property. 

The basic problem with the ‘‘free market’’ position in support of drug importation 
is  that  it  tries  to  reconcile  free  markets  domestically  with  price  controls  overseas. 
That  is  a  circle  that  cannot  be  squared  as  long  as  foreign  governments  can  steal 
patents;  and  in  the  final  analysis,  it  is  likely  to  be  difficult  and  time-consuming  to 
stop a government intent on doing so. What is needed instead are U.S. Government 
efforts,  perhaps  in  the  context  of  trade  policy,  designed  to  end  the  free  ride  that 
many foreigners now obtain at the expense of U.S. consumers. That many U.S. offi-
cials  now  attack  drug  producers—whose  investments  have  saved  millions  of  lives— 
rather  than  the  foreign  theft  of  U.S.  intellectual  property  is  unlikely  to  prove  salu-
tary. 
IV. Federal Price Negotiation Would Not Serve the Interests of Consumers 
Consider  a  large  pharmacy  chain  or  other  sizable  intermediary  between  pharma-
ceutical  producers  and  consumers.  That  intermediary  must  balance  two  competing 
objectives,  which  actually  are  the  objectives  of  its  customers.  It  seeks  to  reduce 
costs, and thus prices for its customers; and it seeks to preserve a formulary broader 
rather  than  narrower,  so  that  it  can  serve  as  broad  a  market  as  possible,  that  is, 

11 See Professor Kevin Outterson, op. cit., at p. 2. 
12 Whether  U.S.  producers  face  competitive  or  monopolistic  market  conditions,  the  increased 
prices from overseas would increase long run incentives to produce new drugs. Because demand 
is  an  inverse  function  of  price—it  is  ‘‘downward  sloping’’—the  greater  flow  of  drugs  would  put 
downward pressure on prices. 

13 The latter assumption would be highly questionable and inconsistent with the evidence, but 

that is an issue outside the scope of this testimony. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00110 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

107 

preserve more rather than less consumer choice. Both objectives are driven by com-
petition  among  pharmacies  and  other  intermediaries;  that  these  objectives  conflict 
is  obvious,  so  that  private  sector  intermediaries,  reflecting  the  preferences  of  their 
customers, must find ways to balance them. 

The  more  obvious  difference  between  such  private  sector  intermediaries  and  the 
Federal Government is the sheer size of the latter as a purchaser; it is almost axio-
matic that the Federal Government has more monopsony power 14 than private sec-
tor  intermediaries.  At  a  more  subtle  level,  the  Federal  Government  has  incentives 
in terms of the cost/formulary tradeoff incentives that differ substantially from those 
constraining private sector intermediaries. Budget pressures are strong at all times, 
so  that  incentives  to  negotiate  substantial  price  reductions  are  powerful.  But  the 
Federal Government is not a profit-seeking firm, so that its incentives to satisfy its 
‘‘customers’’  in  terms  of  broad  formularies  must  be  attenuated  through  political 
processes; voting is simply a weaker constraint than the ability of customers to take 
their business elsewhere. This is a common problem with public sector services: The 
tradeoff incentives between cost (budget) reduction and preservation of service qual-
ity  systematically  are  different  from  those  constraining  private  sector  choices.  This 
bias in favor of price reductions as opposed to formulary availability is obvious over-
seas,15 and arguably has affected U.S. consumers in the vaccine market.16 
V. Conclusions 

The  interests  of  consumers  are  served  by  a  pharmaceutical  sector  offering  medi-
cines  both  affordable  and  available.  More  generally,  consumers  are  served  by  eco-
nomic  efficiency,  that  is,  policies  yielding  an  aggregate  output  basket  as  valuable 
as  possible.  Policies  that  bestow  benefits  upon  one  set  of  consumers  at  the  expense 
of others, perhaps in the future, are inconsistent with that goal; in particular, price 
controls  are  fundamentally  incompatible  with  the  operation  of  free  or  competitive 
markets,  with  the  institutions  of  free  trade,  and  with  the  interests  of  consumers. 
It is incontrovertible that the importation of pharmaceuticals subject to foreign price 
controls  will  have  the  effect  of  importing  the  price  controls  themselves,  with  clear 
and substantial adverse effects over the long term in terms of research and develop-
ment  incentives  and  the  flow  of  new  and  improved  medicines.  Other  analyses  sug-
gest  that  such  policies  will  not  save  much  even  in  the  narrow  dimension  of  budget 
dollars  and  drug  spending;  and  the  longer  term  costs  in  terms  of  substitution  of 
costly  substitute  medical  procedures  and  reduced  human  health  outcomes  are  obvi-
ous. This committee would be wise to reject efforts to allow the importation of phar-
maceuticals subject to foreign price controls. 

Instead, the pursuit of consumer well-being would be served by policies—perhaps 
in  the  context  of  trade  negotiations—ending  the  free  ride  that  foreign  governments 
have  garnered  for  themselves,  through  the  imposition  of  price  controls,  at  the  ex-
pense of the U.S. market. Noninterference—a farsighted policy incorporated into the 
2003  Medicare  legislation—with  competitive  private  sector  negotiations  will  further 
those consumer interests as well. 

ATTACHMENT 2 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED FOR THE RECORD BY THE COMMITTEE 
ON HEALTH,  EDUCATION,  LABOR AND PENSIONS,  U.S.  SENATE TO DR.  BENJAMIN 
ZYCHER,  SENIOR FELLOW,  PACIFIC RESEARCH INSTITUTE FOR PUBLIC POLICY, 
MARCH 2005 
Dear Mr. Chairman, and Distinguished Members of this Committee: 
I  submit  respectfully  for  the  record  the  answers  below  to  the  written  questions 

addressed to me. 
Questions From Senator Enzi 

Question  1.  As  I  am  sure  you  are  aware,  every  free  trade  agreement  that  the 
United States has signed recognizes the importance of allowing legitimate domestic 
regulation. Both WTO agreements as well as NAFTA explicitly permit governments 

14 This essentially is monopoly power on the part of a buyer to force prices down. 
15 See, e.g., Sally C. Pipes, Miracle Cure: How To Solve America’s Health Care Crisis and Why 
Canada Isn’t the Answer, San Francisco: Pacific Research Institute, 2004, pp. 171–179. See also, 
Cambridge Pharma Consultancy, ‘‘Delays In Market Access,’’ December 2002. 

16 See  Institute  of  Medicine,  Financing  Vaccines  in  the  21st  Century,  Washington  D.C.:  Na-
tional Academies Press, 2004, ch. 5. See also, The Global Vaccine Shortage: The Threat To Chil-
dren And What To Do About It, Proceedings of the Albert B. Sabin Vaccine Institute Ninth An-
nual Vaccine Colloquium, 2003, pp. 25–33. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00111 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

108 

to restrict imports for a number of important purposes, like protecting public health 
and  safety,  and  national  security.  Do  you  believe  that  permitting  importation  of 
pharmaceuticals from foreign nations works against such trade agreements? 

Answer. Throughout the postwar GATT and more recent WTO negotiating rounds 
and  through  the  NAFTA  process,  the  central  purpose  of  liberalized  trade  has  been 
the improvement of economic productivity and thus the long term well-being of con-
sumers.  That  improvement  is  achieved  through  the  reduction  of  artificial  barriers 
to efficient resource allocation, so that individuals, firms, and economies can exploit 
both  their  own  comparative  advantages  and  those  of  others  as  well.  In  short:  The 
central  goal  of  free  trade  agreements  is  an  expansion  in  the  value  of  overall  eco-
nomic output, and so a reduction in the aggregate level of real prices. International 
trade  in  pharmaceuticals  is  fully  consistent  with  that  goal,  subject  to  safety  and 
other public health considerations,1 and subject to the absence of other policies that 
might obviate the gains that trade otherwise would yield. In the context of the inter-
national  pharmaceutical  market,  foreign  price  controls  are  foremost  among  such 
perverse policies. Because of the basic economic conditions of pharmaceutical devel-
opment  and  production—for  the  most  part  fixed  costs  are  high  while  marginal  pro-
duction costs are low—foreign governments have strong incentives to obtain a ‘‘free 
ride’’ on (a substantial part of) the fixed costs financed by U.S. consumers, by impos-
ing price controls on retail transactions. These foreign price controls impose several 
types  of  inefficiency  costs,  foremost  among  them  an  inefficient  reduction  in  incen-
tives  for  the  development  of  new  pharmaceuticals.  Accordingly,  the  importation  of 
pharmaceuticals  subject  to  foreign  price  controls  necessarily  would  introduce  those 
controls into the U.S., either at wholesale or at retail depending upon market condi-
tions;  such  pricing  distortions  and  the  perverse  long  term  effects  attendant  upon 
them  are  inconsistent  with  the  efficiency  goals  of  free  trade  agreements,  and  so  in-
deed  would  ‘‘work  against  such  trade  agreements.’’  This  inconsistency  would  take 
the  form  of  reduced  and  distorted  pharmaceutical  investment  over  the  long  term, 
thus increasing real prices by reducing the future availability of new and improved 
medicines.  That  outcome  obviously  is  at  odds  with  the  central  goal  of  efficient  in-
vestment in the context of free trade agreements, thus reducing rather than expand-
ing the value of aggregate output and consumer well-being. 

Question 2. Trade agreements such as the WTO Agreement on Trade-Related As-
pects  of  Intellectual  Property  Rights  (TRIPS)  and  NAFTA  require  governments  to 
protect  intellectual  property  rights.  These  agreements  are  designed  to  ensure  the 
continuing viability of industries involved in the research and development of inno-
vative products, and to prevent unfair competition from companies who would other-
wise  free-ride  on  the  technology  developed  by  others.  Do  you  think  that  unauthor-
ized  importation  of  prescription  pharmaceuticals  would  undermine  the  value  and 
purpose of U.S. patent rights? 

Answer.  The  central  economic  purpose  of  patent  rights  is  the  creation  of  a  tem-
porary stream of ‘‘monopoly’’ returns to investment in pursuit of efficient investment 
incentives  for  innovation  and  research  and  development.2 These  returns  are  engen-
dered  by  a  (marginal)  revenue  stream  temporarily  higher  than  otherwise  would  be 
the  case;  accordingly,  any  policies  that  reduce  such  revenue  streams  artificially  in-
deed  ‘‘would  undermine  the  value  and  purpose  of  U.S.  patent  rights.’’  The  importa-
tion  of  pharmaceuticals  subject  to  price  controls  obviously  would  reduce  the  (ex-
pected)  revenue  stream  for  the  given  drugs  (or  drug  class),  and  so  would  have  the 
effect of undermining the goals of the patent system. Indeed, even without importa-
tion  of  pharmaceuticals,  and  even  without  compulsory  licensing  or  other  such  poli-
cies, the imposition of price controls overseas interferes with patent rights by reduc-
ing  the  marginal  revenues  yielded  by  introduction  of  a  new  or  improved  medicine. 
(Merely consider the extreme case of a drug the price of which is controlled at zero; 
the patent value would be zero as well.) 3 

1 Note  that  profit-seeking  firms  generally  have  efficient  and  powerful  incentives  to  preserve 
the economic value of their brand names and thus the safety and effectiveness of their products. 
In  the  context  of  the  pharmaceutical  market,  the  problem  of  contagion  may  introduce  a  distor-
tion, and the cost of policing counterfeit drugs may yield an efficient role for government activ-
ity. See, e.g., Benjamin Klein and Keith B. Leffler, ‘‘The Role of Market Forces in Assuring Con-
tractual Performance,’’ Journal of Political Economy 89(4), 1981, pp. 615–641. 

2 The issue of the efficient structure and length of patent rights in the pharmaceutical context 

is not addressed here. 

3 The  imposition  of  price  controls  is  very  different  from  differential  pricing.  Such  ‘‘price  dis-
crimination’’  is  efficient,  fully  consistent  with  competitive  market  behavior,  and  makes  con-
sumers  better  off  by  allocating  fixed  costs  in  accordance  with  differing  valuations  placed  upon 
the  knowledge  capital  yielded  by  pharmaceutical  innovation,  thus  moving  the  production  of 
pharmaceuticals closer to the efficient level. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00112 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

109 

Note also that neither overall firm ‘‘revenues’’ nor ‘‘profits’’ is the correct criterion 
for determining whether investment incentives will be efficient; instead we must ask 
whether  a  policy  affects  the  marginal  expected  returns  attendant  upon  investment 
in a given drug.4 

Question 3. You indicate that the magnitude of the projected adverse effect of im-
portation  on  research  and  development  varies  somewhat,  ‘‘although  it  is  never  pre-
dicted to be small.’’ You also mention that all of the estimates are biased downward. 
What  do  you  see  as  the  realistic  potential  effect  on  research  and  development?  Do 
you  feel  that  even  if  importation  leads  to  price  reductions,  U.S.  consumers  would 
end up sacrificing choice in favor of cost? 

Answer.  The  importation  of  pharmaceuticals  subject  to  price  controls  would  yield 
both reduced consumer choice and higher overall health care costs. The reduced con-
sumer  choice  would  be  one  central  adverse  effect  of  the  lessened  research,  develop-
ment, and innovation that inexorably will be engendered over the long run by price 
controls.  The  higher  overall  health  care  costs  will  be  caused  by  the  substitution  of 
hospital and other types of medical services in place of the pharmaceuticals that will 
have failed to have been developed over time.5 In the narrow context of the pharma-
ceutical  market,  any  short  term  reduction  in  drug  costs  (prices)  will  be  offset  par-
tially, fully, or more than fully by the higher real costs of reduced drug availability 
over  the  long  term.6 The  potential  effect  on  research  and  development  is  difficult 
to  measure,  although  a  crude  but  unbiased  approximation  can  be  obtained  by  esti-
mating the reduction in the present value of the expected future revenue stream for 
a  prospective  drug,  and  then  comparing  that  reduced  revenue  base  with  the  cost  of 
developing  new  drugs,  estimated  at  over  $800  million  in  peer-reviewed  journals,  or 
perhaps  with  the  present  value  of  the  expected  costs  of  developing  that  prospective 
drug.7 Such analyses are reasonable as initial starting points for analysis, but they 
are  likely  to  underestimate  the  adverse  effect  of  price  controls  on  research  and  de-
velopment  because  they  are  static  rather  than  dynamic;  they  fail  to  take  into  ac-
count the fact that the imposition of price controls, whether direct or indirect, intro-
duces an asymmetry into the statistical (stochastic) distribution of future returns to 
research  and  development.  This  is  an  effect  distinct  from  the  price  reduction  itself: 
Ex ante, any given potential investment offers upside potential that is limited (trun-
cated)  by  the  price  controls,  while  downside  risks  remain  unaffected.  The  dynamic 
effect,  therefore,  is  to  shift  the  entire  statistical  distribution  of  possible  returns 
downward (or to the left); this means that the standard static measurements of the 
adverse  research  and  development  effects  attendant  upon  the  imposition  of  price 
controls are biased downward. 

Question 4. The Department of Commerce study acknowledged that improvements 
to  health  care  and  life  sciences  are  an  important  global  source  of  gains  in  health 
and  longevity.  According  to  the  study,  ‘‘The  development  of  innovative  pharma-
ceutical products plays a critical role in ensuring these continued gains.’’ The report 
states  that  ‘‘economic  incentives  are  essential’’  in  order  to  encourage  the  continued 
development of new medicines. Do you think legalized importation would reduce the 
‘‘economic incentives’’ that are critical to the development of new medicines? 

Answer.  It  is  incontrovertible  that  the  imposition  of  price  controls  on  pharma-
ceuticals,  whether  directly  or  indirectly  in  the  form  of  competition  from  drugs  sub-
jected  to  price  controls  overseas,  would  weaken  incentives  to  invest  in  pharma-

4 In order to see this, consider the case of a highly profitable pharmaceutical producer; would 
it  invest  in  a  drug  subject  to  severe  (future)  price  controls  merely  because  overall  profits  are 
high?  It  will  do  that  no  more  readily  than  bury  a  $100  bill  in  the  hope  that  a  money  tree  will 
sprout. 

5 See,  e.g.,  Frank  R.  Lichtenberg,  ‘‘Are  the  Benefits  of  Newer  Drugs  Worth  Their  Cost?  Evi-
dence  From  the  1996  MEPS,’’  Health  Affairs  20(5),  September/October  2001,  pp.  241–51.  See 
also Kevin M. Murphy and Robert H. Topel, eds., Measuring the Gains From Medical Research: 
An  Economic  Approach,  Chicago:  University  of  Chicago  Press,  2003.  Even  with  an  adjustment 
for the costs of substitute medical procedures, such measured ‘‘costs’’ underestimate the adverse 
effects  of  pharmaceuticals  made  unavailable  by  the  prior  direct  or  indirect  imposition  of  price 
controls because they exclude the real but difficult-to-measure costs of increased mortality, mor-
bidity, and suffering. 

6 Note  that  because  pharmaceutical  producers  have  incentives  to  invest  only  in  drugs  the  de-
velopment  and  production  costs  of  which  consumers  are  willing  to  bear,  the  reduced  prices  in 
the  short  run  are  likely  to  be  offset  at  least  fully  by  the  longer  term  higher  costs  of  reduced 
drug  availability,  as  a  first-order  approximation.  Moreover,  the  imposition  of  price  controls 
might  not  yield  price  reductions  at  retail  even  in  the  short  run,  as  the  difference  between  con-
trolled  prices  and  market  value  might  be  captured  in  whole  or  in  part  by  various  transaction 
agents (‘‘middlemen’’) under a broad range of market conditions. 

7 See  U.S.  Department  of  Commerce,  International  Trade  Administration,  Pharmaceutical 
Price  Controls  in  OECD  Countries:  Implications  for  U.S.  Consumers,  Pricing,  Research  and  De-
velopment and Innovation, December 2004, chapter 8. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00113 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

110 

ceutical research and development. This is true under any set of assumptions about 
the  competitiveness  of  the  industry,  about  its  maximand,  or  other  parameters;  the 
market for investment capital will recognize immediately the attendant reduction in 
expected  returns  to  investment  in  this  sector,  and  will  reallocate  some  capital  else-
where. As discussed in footnote 4 above, such parameters as the overall profitability 
of  the  industry  (or  given  firms)  or  overall  industry  (or  firm)  revenues  are  not  rel-
evant. For any given prospective investment in a new chemical entity or other devel-
opmental  product,  the  capital  market  will  ask  whether  expected  returns  (on  the 
margin)  justify  the  expected  development  costs.  Price  controls  cannot  improve  the 
marginal efficiency of any such investment. 
Questions From Senator Kennedy 

Question  1.  The  Department  of  Commerce  report  suggests  that  the  increased 
prices  of  name-brand  drugs  in  Europe  could  be  offset  by  reduced  prices  (and  in-
creased utilization) of generic drugs. Do you agree with that assessment? 

Answer.  It  certainly  is  true  that  name-brand  and  generic  drugs  in  the  short  run 
are  substitutes  to  some  substantial  degree.  In  the  long  run,  they  are  more  com-
plementary,  in  that  generic  drugs  over  time  cannot  become  generic  drugs  unless 
they  are  developed  first  as  name-brand  drugs.  In  the  short  run,  an  increase  in  the 
prices  of  name-brand  drugs  would  increase  the  demand  for  generics;  depending  on 
supply  conditions  for  the  latter,  increased  utilization  of  generics  would  be  expected 
to  yield  some  savings  that  might  be  substantial.8 In  the  long  run,  increased  prices 
for name-brand drugs would reduce the prices of generics by increasing competition 
among  them.  The  reasons  that  generic  prices  seem  to  be  higher  in  Europe  than  in 
the  U.S.  (abstracting  from  exchange  rate  issues  and  the  like)  are  unclear;  some  at-
tribute that condition to anticompetitive policies in Europe, but in my view a careful 
analysis of this question is yet to be done. As an aside, the elimination of European 
price controls unambiguously would make U.S. consumers better off, in the long run 
and possibly the short run, by inducing profit-seeking producers to reduce their U.S. 
prices. 

Question 1a. How much could Europe save with increased generic use? 
Answer.  The  best  evidence  that  I  have  seen  on  this  issue  is  presented  in  a  2004 
study  by  the  Boston  Consulting  Group,  which  concludes  in  summary  that  an  in-
crease  in  European  generic  use  to  levels  proportionate  to  those  in  the  U.S.  would 
reduce drug spending by 20 percent.9 

Question 1b. Would increased generic savings impact innovation? 
Answer. Certainly there would be more innovation investment if competition from 
generics were reduced, that is, if name-brand drugs enjoyed more or longer ‘‘monop-
oly’’  positions.  The  presence  of  generics  yields  competition,  as  does  the  presence  of 
name-brand competitors, sometimes called ‘‘me-too’’ drugs quite incorrectly. But the 
possible  reduction  in  innovation  yielded  by  competition  from  generics  is  not  nec-
essarily inefficient if we assume that patent periods are optimal and that other gov-
ernment policies are efficient also. In the context of Europe, if increased generic sav-
ings were caused by a loosening or removal of price controls, then such a shift would 
enhance innovation because the removal of the price control policies would improve 
the investment climate. In short, in the European context, the removal of price con-
trols might induce a shift toward generics, which might increase the savings yielded 
by  the  use  of  generics,  but  that  would  be  salutary  for  long  run  innovation  because 
the removal of the price controls would improve investment incentives. 

Question 2. Would you agree that increased utilization of pharmaceuticals is bene-

ficial to health status? 

Answer. Yes; see footnote 5 above. 
Question 2a. If so, should the Department of Health and Human Services and De-
partment  of  Commerce  reports  have  estimated  the  positive  health  impacts  of  in-
creased consumer access to drugs due to lower prices? 

Answer.  In  the  narrowest  sense,  the  issue  of  what  the  HHS/DOC  studies  should 
have  examined  is  a  question  for  Congress.  More  broadly,  the  purported  price  and 
attendant health effects of ‘‘increased consumer access to drugs due to lower prices’’ 
in  a  real  sense  answers  the  question  (qualitatively)  before  it  has  been  asked:  Price 
controls  increase  ‘‘access’’  in  the  short  run  but  not  the  long  run,  so  that  the  im-

8 For  most  drugs  marginal  production  costs  are  low  and  short  run  scale  economies  seem  not 
to be particularly important; accordingly, supply conditions as a first approximation suggest that 
the  increased  demand  for  generics  would  not  increase  the  prices  of  generic  drugs  substantially. 
9 See  Charles-Andre  Brouwers,  Martin  B.  Silverstein,  and  Tory  Wolff,  Adverse  Consequences 
of  OECD  Government  Interventions  in  Pharmaceutical  Markets  on  the  U.S.  Economy  and  Con-
sumer, Boston Consulting Group, July 1, 2004, esp. exhibit 14. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00114 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

111 

proved  health  outcomes  yielded  by  drug  utilization  in  the  short  run  must  be 
weighed against the adverse long term health effects of reduced pharmaceutical re-
search  and  development.  Is  it  worth  mortgaging  the  future  in  favor  of  the  present? 
I  believe  not;  but  that  is  one  crux  of  the  debate  over  the  importation  of  pharma-
ceuticals subject to foreign price controls. And so any such study must examine not 
only  the  short  term  effects  of  prospective  policy  shifts,  but  the  long  term  effects  as 
well. 

Question  2b.  Should  comparative  effectiveness  play  a  role  in  approval  or  R&D  or 

marketing incentives? 

Answer. If ‘‘R&D or marketing incentives’’ are the products of market forces, then 
comparative  effectiveness  is  a  crucial  parameter  that  should  influence  investment 
choices by producers, and market forces yield precisely that outcome. If, on the other 
hand,  such  incentives  are  imposed  by  regulators  and  other  public  officials—-if  ‘‘evi-
dence-based medicine’’ is used to allocate resources in a top-down decision process— 
then they would be highly inappropriate. Patients respond differently to given medi-
cines; what is ‘‘effective’’ in the aggregate may not be ‘‘effective’’ for specific patients, 
who  in  consultation  with  their  physicians  should  choose  among  alternatives  for  the 
best  solutions  to  their  respective  conditions.  Moreover,  the  differences  in  ‘‘effective-
ness’’  can  manifest  themselves  in  ways  essentially  unobservable  to  analysts;  con-
sider a generic diuretic equal in ‘‘effectiveness’’ with some name-brand hypertension 
drug,  but  which  causes  the  patient  to  visit  the  bathroom  multiple  times  during  the 
night, before work the next day. Only patients in consultation with their physicians 
can evaluate all the relevant tradeoffs in pursuit of ‘‘effectiveness;’’ government pol-
icy  is  too  blunt  an  instrument  to  do  so  without  the  creation  of  important  adverse 
effects in terms of patient well-being. 

Æ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:50 Jan 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00115 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\GPO\DOCS\77867.TXT JACKIE

